_	This fits in with the exponentiation of cardinal numbers, in the sense that , where is the cardinality of "X".
_	Another corollary is that the complete free lattice (on three or more generators) "does not exist", in the sense that it is instead a proper class.
_	Indeed, it is not in dispute that it was the hope and expectation of the several prospective licensees that board prices would advance, and that they would be stabilized in the sense that each licensee together with the licensor would be selling, at a given time, at the minimum prices fixed by the licensor.
_	Lear was "repatriated", in the sense that there were many tactical ideas that Lear's army was to test for overall US knowledge.
_	The symbol formula_69 denotes the wedge product, which is similar to the cross product in the sense that the wedge product of two forms representing oriented lengths represents an oriented area.
_	It is robust in the sense that surveillance outage failure modes are limited to those associated with the ground radar system.
_	Thus the surface is "convex" in the sense that the tangent plane at every point intersects the surface only in this point.
_	"Up until the sixth episode, you get the sense that Shane actually is a bad guy, that he lied to Lori and made her believe that he was dead in order to facilitate him moving in on her," said Kirkman.
_	This is analogous to the American two-party system in the sense that voting on issues and legislation in the Parliament only requires a yes or no vote, which means voter vote for options or candidates that are close to their ideals.
_	Many writers have referred to the Hashid and Bakil confederations as the "two wings" of the Zaidi imamate; in the sense that many of the tribes that belong to these confederations are and were strongly committed to Zaidi Islam, the imams were recognized - to a greater or lesser degree - as the heads of the Zaidi community and could, therefore, count on a measure of support and loyalty.
_	is a nonlinear elliptic partial differential equation (in the sense that its linearization is elliptic), provided one confines attention to convex solutions.
_	Regulations are in some sense equivalent to "Acts of Parliament", in the sense that what they say is law and they do not need to be mediated into national law by means of implementing measures.
_	However, these victories were not decisive in the sense that they ended the war.
_	In the words of the present living imam, Shah Karim al-Husayni Aga Khan IV, "the role of the Imam is to listen, not to talk; there's a big difference, in the sense that members of the community must inform me ... what is of concern to them."
_	"Prime ideals", which generalize prime elements in the sense that the principal ideal generated by a prime element is a prime ideal, are an important tool and object of study in commutative algebra, algebraic number theory and algebraic geometry.
_	The theorem holds also for Hilbert manifolds in the sense that the exponential map of a non-positively curved geodesically complete connected manifold is a covering map (; ).
_	Completeness here is understood in the sense that the exponential map is defined on the whole tangent space of a point.
_	Not 'idiot' in the sense that the characters are always dumb and goofy in an amusing way, but 'idiot' as in 'none of these human beings would ever act this way and this is really frustrating to watch?
_	Overall, human beings are unique in the sense that they are the only species among hominids who have chins.
_	The VCS3 was one of the first "portable" commercially available synthesizers, portable in the sense that the VCS 3 was housed entirely in a small, wooden case, unlike previous machines from American manufacturers such as Moog Music, ARP and Buchla which were housed in large cabinets and could take up entire rooms.
_	This time, however, a new girl has been introduced in Hansa Wadkar, new in the sense that for the first time she has been allowed to shoulder the heroine's role".
_	To qualify for the list, members must be "both fictional (in the sense that we excluded mythological and folkloric figures) and characters (meaning they are part of a narrative story or series of stories)," in addition to being wealthy.
_	At the IGF VIII meeting in Bali in October 2013 a commenter noted that Brazil intends the meeting to be a "summit" in the sense that it will be high level with decision-making authority.
_	In C#, this analysis was formalized by Fruja, and is precise as well as sound, in the sense that all variables assigned along all control flow paths will be considered definitely assigned.
_	If ("V","ψ") is a representation of (say) a group "G", and "W" is a linear subspace of "V" that is preserved by the action of "G" in the sense that "g" · "w" ∈ "W" for all "w" ∈ "W" (Serre calls these "W" "stable under G"), then "W" is called a "subrepresentation": by defining "φ"("g") to be the restriction of "ψ"("g") to "W", ("W", "φ") is a representation of "G" and the inclusion of "W" into "V" is an equivariant map.
_	States and controls only differ in the sense that states need be continuous between phases.
_	However, it is also unique in the sense that it would be released on DVD two months prior to its theatrical debut, with the DVD launch announced to be August 12.
_	He explained that "[...] when you're playing a character of solid blackness, that in itself is very interesting, in the sense that you have no other motivation other than the accumulation of power.
_	The reviewer Key Ray Chong said that the English version is "an entirely new book in the sense that less-substantive chapters or parts have been eliminated, to the extent that the original Chinese narratives are rendered more precise and their impact more powerful for non-Chinese readers".
_	Juan Alberto's adopted mother is Rebeca (Julieta Bracho), who coincidentally is the mother of Ernesto, and therefore Ernesto and Juan Alberto are like brothers in the sense that they grew up together.
_	Weyl's lemma states that if a locally integrable function formula_5 is a weak solution of Laplace's equation, in the sense that
_	The index is a "negative entropy" in the sense that it gets smaller as the disorder gets larger, hence it is a measure of order rather than disorder.
_	For example, the “accident-prone driver” was a belief that was supported by the data in the sense that a small number of drivers do participate in a disproportionate number of accidents, it follows that the identification and removal of this drivers will reduce crashes.
_	In this specification, β is a "survival parameter" in the sense that if a random variable "X" is the duration of time that a given biological or mechanical system manages to survive and "X" ~ Exp(β) then E["X"] = β.
_	The game is virtually endless, in the sense that after a season finishes a new one starts again, and the player has to hire new drivers, prepare new cars, and repeat the cycle of management.
_	In the sense that Bolton wrote of ordinary life and ordinary people, his work shares qualities found in the work of William Stafford.
_	For any finite Markov decision process (FMDP), "Q"-learning finds a policy that is optimal in the sense that it maximizes the expected value of the total reward over all successive steps, starting from the current state.
_	Audio enables people who are blind or visual impaired to access information through hearing, in the sense that print readers would understand it.
_	The intuition behind the test is that if non-linear combinations of the explanatory variables have any power in explaining the response variable, the model is misspecified in the sense that the data generating process might be better approximated by a polynomial or another non-linear functional form.
_	The early ukiyo-e artists have been called "Primitives" in the sense that the print medium was a new challenge to which they adapted these centuries-old techniques—their image designs are not considered "primitive".
_	Also, the Navigation Acts were modified in the sense that the German hinterland was recognized as a legitimate place of origin for Dutch commerce, appreciably softening the protectionist bite of those Acts.
_	In 1983, Richard Stallman announced the GNU (short for "GNU's Not Unix") project, an ambitious effort to create a free software Unix-like system; "free" in the sense that everyone who received a copy would be free to use, study, modify, and redistribute it.
_	In computational geometry, a coreset is a small set of points that approximates the shape of a larger point set, in the sense that applying some geometric measure to the two sets (such as their minimum bounding box volume) results in approximately equal numbers.
_	When formula_62 is the field of complex numbers, the Puiseux expansion of an algebraic curve (as defined above) is convergent in the sense that for a given choice of "n"-th root of "x", they converge for small enough formula_63, hence define an analytic parametrization of each branch of "X" in the neighborhood of "p" (more precisely, the parametrization is by the "n"-th root of "x").
_	Averaging techniques also show that if F is the real or complex numbers, then any "G"-representation preserves an inner product formula_39 on "V" in the sense that
_	For example, the family Myrmeleontidae is cosmopolitan in the sense that every continent except Antarctica is home to some indigenous species within the Myrmeleontidae, but nonetheless no one species, nor even genus, of the Myrmeleontidae is cosmopolitan.
_	the sense that there is insufficient kinetic energy to homogenize the fluids).
_	Just as with a series of scalars, a series of vectors that converges absolutely also converges to some limit vector in the Euclidean space, in the sense that
_	However, Aurora's dreams and fantasies are different in the sense that they are drawn from loneliness and isolation; the character essentially longs "for human connections beyond her three fairy surrogate mothers."
_	The actual entities, the occasions of experience, are logically atomic in the sense that an occasion of experience cannot be cut and separated into two other occasions of experience.
_	Richard Vine of "The Guardian" also gave a positive review, and was pleased that the episode began to examine Jimmy's relationships with Chuck and Kim, who "you really get the sense that she’s fond of him, against her better judgement".
_	Ethical marketing should be part of business ethics in the sense that marketing forms a significant part of any business model.
_	It is introduced in the context of matrix completion to ensure the singular vectors of formula_9 are not too "sparse" in the sense that all coordinates of each singular vector are of comparable magnitude instead of just a few coordinates having significantly larger magnitudes.
_	He has sometimes seemed idiotic, in the sense that he is ignorant of many walks of life.
_	Moreover, these closure properties are effective, in the sense that there are algorithms for computing the differential equation of the result of any of these operations, knowing the differential equations of the input.
_	This limitation or determination is negation in the sense that each finite mode is "not" the whole attribute Extension; it is not the other finite modes.
_	According to the Marxist perspective on crime, "defiance is normal - the sense that men are now consciously involved…
_	The estimate was conservative in the sense that it only assumes the fees from slightly more than 75% of the 12,000 students.
_	Almost all currently popular operating systems, and also many scripting applications allow code too many privileges, usually in the sense that when a user executes code, the system allows that code all rights of that user.
_	Team semantics is three-valued, in the sense that a formula may happen to be positively satisfied by a team on a given structure, or negatively satisfied by it, or neither.
_	However types do exist in the sense that they appear in mental and documented models.
_	The co-music supervisor, Billy Gottlieb, called the episode a "little mini feature film in the sense that we had a lot of camera performances with the music."
_	"With my father and I, it was a great kind of partnership and pairing in the sense that he had a total control of the creative side of the show and I didn't have even the inclination to interject in what he was doing."
_	Mainly, readers are left with the sense that it has been going on a long time, and will continue to do so.
_	Compared with other methods in number theory, sieve theory is comparatively "elementary", in the sense that it does not necessarily require sophisticated concepts from either algebraic number theory or analytic number theory.
_	The lilioids are paraphyletic in the sense that commelinids form a sister group to Asparagales.
_	Advertisement creates values in the sense that it causes recipients to desire additional objects.
_	Northern Bukovina had some historical connections with Galicia, annexed by the Soviet Union in 1939 as part of its invasion of Poland, in the sense that both had previously been part of Austria-Hungary from the second part of the 18th century until 1918.
_	Intuitively, such a cardinal represents a point beyond which initial pieces of the universe of sets start to look similar, in the sense that each is elementarily embeddable into a later one.
_	PL=PL in the sense that for every f in PL, PL is unchanged if it is extended to allow as a subroutine, where A is the input string.
_	Vajrayana Buddhism is esoteric in the sense that the transmission of certain teachings only occurs directly from teacher to student during an empowerment ("abhiṣeka") and their practice requires initiation in a ritual space containing the mandala of the deity.
_	Jobs can be scheduled in any order, but pairs of jobs may be in "conflict" in the sense that they may not be assigned to the same time slot, for example because they both rely on a shared resource.
_	That is a huge advance, yet they are still quite limited and cannot yet know what they look like, "in the sense that the infant cannot recognize its own face".
_	The spatial discontinuities of the table, the objects in the room, the chairs on the right side of the canvas, and the window on the left wall give the sense that this is the artist's environment, dominated by creativity and color more than laws of natural order.
_	It "is" a flat torus in the sense that as metric spaces, it is isometric to a flat square torus.
_	This had to be toned down considerably to make the couple more realistic, in the sense that they would row occasionally, but in the end it would be obvious that they had deep feelings for each other.
_	Constant-Warwick was the first true frigate in the sense that she was a national ship fitted for war.
_	During this time he realised that a problem requires an inventive solution if there is an unresolved contradiction in the sense that improving one parameter impacts negatively on another.
_	There must be an unlawful act that was dangerous in the sense that sober and reasonable persons would recognise that the act was such as to subject Y to the risk of physical harm.
_	A state machine can also have a hierarchy in the sense that states can have sub state machines.
_	"GamePeople's" Andy Robertson thought the title balanced education and gaming, and noted the challenges of the book-to-game adaptation in the sense that gruesome aspects of history had to be toned down because having children physical reenact them would have been to close to home.
_	The energy in such a calculation is virtual in the sense that it was never consumed but rather saved due to some energy efficiency investment being made.
_	Thus, a Banach space is a vector space with a metric that allows the computation of vector length and distance between vectors and is complete in the sense that a Cauchy sequence of vectors always converges to a well defined limit that is within the space.
_	It is different from most other Feluda stories, in the sense that this story is based on Feluda's hometown Kolkata (Calcutta).
_	In some systems, non-administrator users are over-privileged by design, in the sense that they are allowed to modify internal structures of the system.
_	"You get the sense that a vogue for science fiction is being interpreted as the spirit of the Fifties, with emphasis being put on a handful of sci-fi films.
_	The broom is harmless in the sense that it never kills the cat, but it pushes the cat around, enough to make it more difficult if it is not kept busy.
_	In the same vein, Williams sees most novels as “knowable communities” in the sense that the “novelist offers to show people and their relationships in essentially knowable and communicable ways” (p. 163).
_	"It's a 'new' show only in the sense that Dr. Frankenstein's monster was a new man."
_	Mithridates was unfortunate in the sense that he became ruler at the time when the Hellenistic world was in decline and was forced to face three of the most talented generals in the history of ancient Rome.
_	Naturally this strategy need not be the proper one in the sense that we may not meet adequately after all the survival challenges we have in front of us.
_	Woody species have been found to occupy fewer climatic niches than herbaceous species, which was suggested to be a result of their slower generation time; such differences in adaptation may result in niche conservatism among perennial species, in the sense that their climatic niche has not changed much over evolutionary time.
_	In watching these youngsters perform, one has the sense that the Schuhplattler is not only tradition, culture and skill, but can also be packed with energy, laughter and fun.
_	In Plato's and Aristotle's works good politics imply good government (defined as the way decisions are taken in a certain political community), in the sense that the different types of government can be ranked according to their virtues (aristocracy is better than democracy, which is better than oligarchy and tyranny according to Plato, and so on).
_	Today, the rank of "presbyter" is typically what one thinks of as a priest, although technically both a bishop and a presbyter are "priests" in the sense that they share in Christ's ministerial priesthood and offer sacrifice to God in the person of Christ.
_	in the sense that they lead to strong lattice heating and a transient disordered atom zone.
_	The newly founded towns often show a marked regularity in their plan form, in the sense that the streets are often straight and laid out at right angles to one another, and that the house lots are rectangular, and originally largely of the same size.
_	This is also naturally isomorphic to the cohomology of the sub–chain complex formula_3 consisting of all singular cochains formula_4 that have compact support in the sense that there exists some compact formula_5 such that formula_6 vanishes on all chains in formula_7.
_	There is another myth in the sense that the ancient Aryan tribes, who are hypothesized to have spoken Proto-Indo-Iranian, came down in intermittent waves from Central Asia and Afghanistan.
_	Debt overhang can affect firms or banks that have excessive amounts of debt, but are solvent, in the sense that the value of their assets exceeds the value of their liabilities.
_	Claims 2, 3, 5, 6 and 7 were all dependent on claim 1 in the sense that if the TKT method did not involve using a "DNA sequence for use in securing expression (of EPO) in a…host cell" within the meaning of Claim 1, then TKT would not infringe any of the other claims either.
_	Communists denounced the New Deal in 1933 and 1934 as fascist in the sense that it was under the control of big business.
_	Dennis Schwartz considered it to have been one of Steiger's creepiest roles, believing that the poor script had rendered the role awkward and "mildly entertaining in the sense that Steiger is asked to carry the film and hams it up".
_	These picture cards were the first true picture cards of Bhutan, in the sense that the front side was completely used for the drawing, leaving the left side of the divided back open for a message and the right side with the imprinted stamp and address lines, as we are used to in a typical standard picture card lay-out.
_	It can be shown that the definitions of negation, addition and multiplication are consistent, in the sense that:
_	The bridge is noted for being the "most ancient" in Paris, in the sense that, while the oldest bridge in Paris that is "in its original state" is undoubtedly the Pont Neuf, a bridge in some form has existed at the site of the Pont Notre-Dame since antiquity; nonetheless, it has been destroyed and reconstructed numerous times, a fact referred to in the Latin inscription on it to honor its Italian architect, Fra Giovanni Giocondo.
_	Unlike the multiplication-operator version of the spectral theorem, the direct-integral version is unique in the sense that the measure equivalence class of μ (or equivalently its sets of measure 0) is uniquely determined and the measurable function formula_164 is determined almost everywhere with respect to μ.
_	In the first place, without the advantages of an organised state the average individual would be so subject to dangers and hardships of all kinds and to his own passions that he could not be called free in any real sense of the term, least of all in the sense that Spinoza used it.
_	This project was innovative in the sense that it used gas injection from Troll.
_	The "PopMatters" review by Rob Cadwell says about the album, "Above all, its music that requires thought, cerebral in the sense that it’s 'wild mind' music – music played by a gifted pianist exploring the range of her instrument, with no boundaries."
_	In fact Cretans could tell the truth quite often but still all be liars in the sense that liars are people prone to deception for dishonest gain.
_	The ontology is open in the sense that it is available to be used by all under the following two constraints (1) its origin must be acknowledged and (2) it is not to be altered and subsequently redistributed under the original name or with the same identifiers.
_	Soft despotism is different from despotism (also called 'hard despotism') in the sense that it is not obvious to the people.
_	Deeper down was the sense that France owed the world a civilizing mission.
_	A political realignment had occurred in the sense that the white and Coloured electorate the NP/NNP had retained in 1994 had in large part shifted to the DA, though other parties such as the new Independent Democrats had also benefited from the NNP's collapse.
_	Diane Bourne wrote for the "Manchester Evening News" "Sadly, by the end, with group hugs and teary eyes from the girls, you get the sense that this tenth anniversary tour is a farewell, rather than a comeback.
_	Blench believes that there is in fact no "apical" ancestor of Austronesian in the sense that there was no true single Proto-Austronesian language that gave rise to present-day Austronesian languages.
_	Finkelstein has described himself as "an old-fashioned communist," in the sense that he "see[s] no value whatsoever in states."
_	He describes the setting as "adult" in the sense that it is about more than just "kick open the door, kill the monster, take the treasure, repeat", with its "sophisticated graphic look" and the "sense that it makes you think, and might even challenge your most basic ideas about life, the universe, and everything."
_	Segal claims there is no "One size fits all" diet, in the sense that people will respond differently to certain types of food.
_	Some have asserted that Martin Luther taught that faith and reason were antithetical in the sense that questions of faith could not be illuminated by reason.
_	These were not necessarily on local subjects and were often local only in the sense that they were written by local residents.
_	Ahmad, the founder of Ahmadiyya sect in Islam, the soul will give birth to another rarer entity and will resemble the life on this earth in the sense that this entity will bear a similar relationship to the soul, as the soul bears relationship with the human existence on earth.
_	Some martial arts can be described as eclectic in the sense that they borrow techniques from a wide variety of other martial arts.
_	Confusion of causality and determinism is particularly acute in quantum mechanics, this theory being acausal in the sense that it is unable in many cases to identify the causes of actually observed effects or to predict the effects of identical causes, but arguably deterministic in some interpretations (e.g. if the wave function is presumed not to actually collapse as in the many-worlds interpretation, or if its collapse is due to hidden variables, or simply redefining determinism as meaning that probabilities rather than specific effects are determined).
_	This innate mechanism is evolutionary in the sense that the hormones for females are concurrently passed down to other females, and the same with males.
_	That is why his language is the Touch, the sense that implies all the others."
_	Specifically, James laid down that (1) there must be no compelling evidence one way or another (i.e., the issue is "intellectually undecidable"), (2) both options must be "live hypotheses" for the relevant chooser (i.e., the chooser could sincerely believe either option), (3) the choice must be "forced" in the sense that one of the two options must definitely be chosen, and refusing to choose is tantamount to making one of the two choices, and (4) the choice must be "momentous" (i.e., deeply important or significant to the chooser).
_	The rich floral motifs follow Byzantine traditions, and are "Islamic only in the sense that the vocabulary is syncretic and does not include representation of men or animals."
_	As viewers, one has the sense that the figures are caught in a fleeting moment of stillness."
_	An extractor fan of the same cooling capacity ('cooling capacity' in the sense that a fan removes warm air in the tunnels and replaces it with cooler air from outside) used up one-eighth of the electricity of the experimental refrigeration plant.
_	The Faculty of Veterinary Science of the University of Pretoria is unique in the sense that it is the only faculty that trains veterinarians and veterinary nurses in South Africa.
_	Noether's theorem states that for every infinitesimal symmetry transformation that is local (local in the sense that the transformed value of a field at a given point only depends on the field configuration in an arbitrarily small neighborhood of that point), there is a corresponding conserved charge called the Noether charge, which is the space integral of a Noether density (assuming the integral converges and there is a Noether current satisfying the continuity equation).
_	According to Kim, as new learning occurs, deculturation or unlearning of some of the old cultural elements has to occur, at least in the sense that new responses are adopted in situations that previously would have evoked old ones.
_	Bird communication is also continuous in the sense that it utilizes duration and frequency.
_	Pius IX was the first pope to use the term “Magisterium” in the sense that it is understood today, and the concept of the “ordinary and universal Magisterium” was officially established during Vatican I.
_	That being true, a jury might have found that all the accused were embarked upon a [single] venture, in all parts of which each was a participant, and an abettor in the sense that the success of that part with which he was immediately concerned, was dependent upon the success of the whole.
_	This is fair in the sense that all users that experience congestion receive less bandwidth, but it can be frustrating for customers and a major problem for ISPs.
_	We are all ecologies in the sense that our (human) bodies contain gut bacteria, parasite species, etc., and to them our body is not organism but rather more of a microclimate or biome.
_	Although it may not seem essential to conflict resolution, it is meaningful in the sense that it provides incentives, institutional support, and continuity to the political and psychological processes.
_	Director of UNESCO to Vietnam, Katherine Müller, said in Global Education Magazine: "I personally identify with UNESCO’s values in the sense that I truly believe Education, Culture, Social and Natural Sciences, and Communication and Information are some of the most powerful drivers for sustainable development and peace, as a sustainable future cannot exist without sustainable peace.
_	The game is unique in the sense that it is played almost entirely though the viewfinder of a camera; and the game is lost if the player runs out of film before solving the mysteries in a mission.
_	More simply, the flow generates a symmetry, in the sense that moving each point on an object the same distance in the direction of the Killing vector will not distort distances on the object.
_	If intervals are incorrect (in the sense that the game-theoretic value of the node is not contained within the interval), then B* might not be able to identify the correct path.
_	Even more difficult is the problem of BPMN-to-BPEL round-trip engineering: generating BPEL code from BPMN diagrams and maintaining the original BPMN model and the generated BPEL code synchronized, in the sense that any modification to one is propagated to the other.
_	Because an isomorphism preserves linear structure, two isomorphic vector spaces are "essentially the same" from the linear algebra point of view, in the sense that they cannot be distinguished by using vector space properties.
_	The form is symmetric, non-degenerate and associative in the sense that:
_	This article uses the term "trapezoid" in the sense that is current in the United States and Canada.
_	Inattentional blindness is beneficial in the sense that it is a mechanism that has evolved with attention to help filter out irrelevant input, allowing only important information to reach consciousness.
_	Sukhpur is well organized in the sense that the region residing for living & agriculture is separated from each other.
_	Wundt determined that "psychology is an empirical science co-ordinating natural science and humanities, and that the considerations of both complement one another in the sense that only together can they create for us a potential empirical knowledge."
_	Mr Bapterosses was also a precocious marketing man in the sense that he immediately advertised his products under the "FB" brand and associated it with the numerous medals & awards he had received the world over.
_	Yubaba has many similarities to The Coachman from "Pinocchio", in the sense that she transforms humans into pigs in a similar way that the boys of Pleasure Island were transformed into donkeys.
_	It differs from its competitors, such as "Variety", in the sense that it does not dispatch reporters to stories, nor does it engage in conventional reporting practices.
_	Originally, figure skating competitions consisted of compulsory figures and free skating only, and free skating was "free" in the sense that it was completely free from requirements; skaters could perform whatever combination of elements best suited their individual skills.
_	The main reasoning behind this theory is that the compensation is what controls the choice, or in other words the choices which the "rational actors" make are "rational in the sense that they are centered on the satisfaction of wants".
_	She said she feels "like there's a lot of fear of the female or kind of celebration of it in some weird way and something about this movie managed to take the fear and the sense that it's the female that ultimately survives and sort of marry that in a really interesting way".
_	However, self epitopes which appear in very low concentration on APC are termed cryptic in the sense that they do not delete autoreactive T-cells which will then join the peripheral adult T cell repertoire.
_	This means that a smooth plane curve is a plane curve which "locally looks like a line", in the sense that near every point, it may be mapped to a line by a smooth function.
_	It is progressive in the sense that could be falsified.
_	All inertial frames are in a state of constant, rectilinear motion with respect to one another; they are not accelerating in the sense that an accelerometer at rest in one would detect zero acceleration.
_	Many of these societies can be considered to be anarchic in the sense that they explicitly reject the idea of centralized political authority.
_	This was "official" in the sense that it was approved by the British Privy Council in 1919.
_	More recent developments can be found in the books, When the filtering equation is stable (in the sense that it corrects any erroneous initial condition), the bias and the variance of the particle particle estimates
_	As congruences on rings are characterized by their ideals, this notion is a straightforward generalization of the notion from ring theory: a ring is simple in the sense that it has no nontrivial ideals if and only if it is simple in the sense of universal algebra.
_	This is much truer than in other Western languages in the sense that changing the stress position changes the meaning (e.g. ['katabu] means "they wrote" while [katabu'] means "they wrote it").
_	(The former construction is better in the sense that it defines the order on the long line and shows that the topology is the order topology; the latter is better in the sense that it uses gluing along an open set, which is clearer from the topological point of view.)
_	ECR is unique in the sense that both Goods loading and Passenger traffic assume great importance in view of the huge coal loading in the coal bearing of Dhanbad division of Jharkhand state and densely populated area of Bihar.
_	These agreements are binding in the sense that the parties have the expectation that the negotiated rules will be followed.
_	The P&G group did better than Kodak in the 1930s, in the sense that it developed brands like Tide and Cheer, both belonging to the laundry detergent market, in order to gain as much market share as possible and prevent competition from entering the market.
_	The choice formula_22 modulates our notion of proximity in the sense that if formula_23 then formula_24 and if formula_25 then formula_26.
_	"BoxOffice" was less complimentary, calling it "undistinguished, in the sense that its ideas and emotional payloads are both safe and small".
_	Mellers claims that Dylan has succeeded in concentrating contradictory qualities into the Lady: "It's impossible to tell... whether the Lady is a creature of dream or nightmare; but she's beyond good and evil as the cant phrase has it, only in the sense that the simple, hypnotic, even corny waltz tune contains... both fulfilment and regret.
_	You do become closer to him in the sense that first person forces an identification, but I think it's an uncomfortable one then because he's kind of a shit in the last part of the book and you loved him in the first part...
_	He thus subscribed to "niyativada" (fatalism) only in the sense that he thought that "some" future events like salvation for all were strictly determined.
_	"Lawyers and Poetry" described "Houseboating in the Ozarks" as "autobiographical in the sense that Robert Pirsig's "Zen and the Art of Motorcycle Maintenance" is about the life of Robert Pirsig."
_	This process is intrinsically hierarchical in the sense that we can (and often do) seek to further decompose the functions formula_7 into a collection of constituent functions formula_8such that
_	Corey Moss of MTV felt that the song was one of the most personal moments on "Destiny Fulfilled" in the sense that Beyoncé's then-relatively secret relationship with rapper Jay-Z was acknowledged "on record for the first time".
_	According to one view, there is no "formal linking" between equality of opportunity and political structure, in the sense that there can be equality of opportunity in democracies, autocracies and in communist nations, although it is primarily associated with a competitive market economy and embedded within the legal frameworks of democratic societies.
_	which has both a left inverse and a right inverse, in the sense that for suitably chosen formula_38 and formula_39, the following types are both inhabited:
_	Raymond Aron has noted that Weber was not a "liberal in the American sense," and not, "strictly speaking, a democrat in the sense that the French, the English, or the Americans gave the term."
_	On the other hand, Spanish law provides for punishment of lewd acts, which approximates the sense that the French naturist give to "sexual exhibition".
_	"Over a protracted period of time – and "Beerbongs & Bentleys" goes on and on like a charity telethon – there's a paucity of original ideas, the sense that he has virtually nothing to say for himself, and that whatever he has, has already been said umpteen times before with considerably more skill, wit and impact."
_	The term "tegmen" refers to a miscellaneous and arbitrary group of organs in various orders of insects; they certainly are homologous in the sense that they all are derived from insect forewings, but in other senses they are analogous; for example, the evolutionary development of the short elytra of the Dermaptera shared none of the history of the development of tegmina in the Orthoptera, say.
_	"I have the sense that when consensus is forming like ice hardening on a lake, Dyson will do his best to chip at the ice", Steven Weinberg said of him.
_	These problems, however, are not "realistic" in the sense that they come from situations that can be partially met; they seek above all to show extraordinary blows and maneuvers, and to oblige one to envisage well-hidden resistances; moreover, one of the conventions chosen for these problems is that "all the stones of the utterance must be useful", which Dōsetsu sometimes exploits for additional artistic effects, as shown by the example of problem 43, shown in the previous section.
_	These explanations are useful in the sense that they "minimize the use of notions constituting the phenomena to be explained".
_	The resulting flight path looks like scissors in the sense that both fighters approach each other, cross over, and then separate again, over and over while the scissors continues.
_	The Rusori clan is believed to be the original Jita group in the sense that they were the first to arrive in the land of the Jita, as they believe.
_	The above definitions are all "global" in the sense that they don't care about small thin areas that are part of a large fat object.
_	Wilcox's goal for the building was "ultra modern only in the sense that it is ultra-practical."
_	He declared that he hated Jews "in the sense that he hated all corruption".
_	The score was actually not a collaboration, according to Nyman: "Ravenous was a joint composition in the sense that Damon Albarn composed 60% of the tracks and I did the rest."
_	He is also a self-made man in the sense that he has developed a personality on his own.
_	The difficulty lies in the fact that the programs are autonomous in the sense that submitted code will last for the duration of the competition (and across multiple matches) and you can not control or modify their execution.
_	"Of all the literatures in South Africa, Afrikaans literature has been the only one to have become a national literature in the sense that it developed a clear image of itself as a separate entity, and that by way of institutional entrenchment through teaching, distribution, a review culture, journals, etc. it could ensure the continuation of that concept."
_	So the language cannot claim a national readership, while on the other hand being "international" in the sense that it transgresses the national borders.
_	Physician Larry S. Goldman wrote a critical review of the book in WebMD's "Medscape Today", claiming that Whitaker "is ready to throw the baby out with the bath water" because "Mad in America" fails to acknowledge any biological abnormalities in schizophrenia, while at the same conceding that Whitaker's argument is correct in the sense that the true causes of schizophrenia are not known.
_	This album is significant in the sense that it's the first Big Noyd album not to feature Mobb Deep on any songs.
_	In a sense, this formula generalizes Schwarz's lemma to all complex spaces; but it may be vacuous in the sense that the Kobayashi pseudometric "d" may be identically zero.
_	The islands of Madagascar and New Zealand are amphidromic points in the sense that the tide goes around them (counterclockwise in both cases) in about 12 and a half hours, but the amplitude of the tides on their coasts is in some places large.
_	Colors on the Line and spectral colors are the only ones that are fully saturated in the sense that, for any point on the Line, no other possible color being a mixture of red and violet is more saturated than it.
_	The campaign was successful in the sense that the federal Conservatives were shut out of Newfoundland and Labrador in the 2008 election; nationally, however, the campaign had little effect for that election, as that party was elected to another, stronger minority government.
_	It is unique in the sense that it imparts secular as well as religious education simultaneously.
_	Syndication did not exist as such in United Kingdom until the arrival of satellite, cable and later, from 1998 on, digital television, although it could be argued that many ITV programs up to the early 1990s, particularly imported programming was syndicated in the sense that each ITV region bought some programs independently of the ITV Network, and in particular many programs out of prime time made by smaller ITV stations were "part-networked" where some regions would show them and others would not.
_	Malay does not have a grammatical subject in the sense that English does.
_	As part of the ruling that found the book digitisation project was fair use, the judge stated "Google Books is also transformative in the sense that it has transformed book text into data for purposes of substantive research, including data mining and text mining in new areas".
_	The "Dinner Party" project, she insisted throughout, was "cooperative", not collaborative, in the sense that it involved a clear hierarchy but cooperative effort to ensure its successful completion."
_	(At this temperature, the wine is not at a rolling boil, but it is cooking, in the sense that it will evaporate much more quickly than usual.)
_	He also felt that the GS 450h was "balanced nicely by the styling, the quality and the sense that you really are in something a little bit different."
_	However, Coleridge is more concrete than Cowper in the sense that the ego stands in the foreground - in "The Task" the I, though dominant, purports to follow its subject matter.
_	Not only did it fit the theme of the novel perfectly, it's also a great punchy word, instantly and internationally comprehensible, graphically alluring and, as an extra bonus, it's strangely Bondian in the sense that we might be subliminally aware of the '00' of '007' lurking just behind those juxtaposed O's of SOLO".
_	Scholars cited that those mentioned in Church documents can be considered "virtual Jews" in the sense that the citations were indirect and that these mentions were probably symbols of non-Christian behavior.
_	I leave the exhibit with the sense that the painters could not have done anything right, and I think the exhibit should address that question.”
_	Peirce adds, that method and economy are best in research but no outright sin inheres in trying any theory in the sense that the investigation via its trial adoption can proceed unimpeded and undiscouraged, and that "the one unpardonable offence" is a philosophical barricade against truth's advance, an offense to which "metaphysicians in all ages have shown themselves the most addicted".
_	Modern Russian is sometimes said to begin with Pushkin, in the sense that the old "high style" Church Slavonic and vernacular Russian are so closely fused that it is difficult to identify whether any given word or phrase stems from the one or the other.
_	I mean it in the sense that one would say truth is sacred, life is sacred.
_	Hyslop did not design huge futuristic buildings intended to startle the senses, but works that were almost unremarkable, in the sense that their harmony with adjacent buildings, rendered them part of an existing composition.
_	The principle of Irreducibility, in philosophy, has the sense that a complete account of an entity will not be possible at lower levels of explanation and which has novel properties beyond prediction and explanation.
_	In regions where the first derivative is not zero, holomorphic functions are conformal in the sense that they preserve angles and the shape (but not size) of small figures.
_	The heat transfer coefficient is also known as "thermal admittance" in the sense that the material may be seen as admitting heat to flow.
_	The "collapse of the wave function" of the Copenhagen interpretation of quantum theory is explained in the quantum potential approach by the demonstration that information can become "inactive" in the sense that from then on "all the packets of the multi-dimensional wave function that do not correspond to the actual result of measurement have no effect on the particle".
_	These singular points are intimately related in the sense that in order to resolve the pinch point singularity one must blow-up the whole formula_2-axis and not only the pinch point.
_	Freeways in Taiwan are not exactly toll roads in the sense that toll gates/stations are not located at the entrance and exits of the freeway.
_	It is related to personality in the sense that character is based on personality and is initially determined by it.
_	This must be compatible with composition, in the sense that compositions have the product grade.
_	Kelvin wrote in his 1848 paper that his scale was absolute in the sense that it was defined "independently of the properties of any particular kind of matter."
_	Free labor is free both in the sense that the laborers provide it voluntarily and in the sense that they are not remunerated by the beneficiaries of the labor (such as social media companies).
_	Michiko Kakutani wrote in her "New York Times" review: "Though "The Amateur Marriage" can leave the longtime Tyler fan with the sense that the author is simply reconnoitering territory long ago annexed and mapped out, it is so psychologically detailed that the story as a whole stands as one of her more convincing efforts: an ode to the complexities of familial love, the centripetal and centrifugal forces that keep families together and send their members flying apart, the supremely ordinary pleasures and frustrations of middle-class American life."
_	For example, in a crystal net, it is presumed that edges do not “collide” in the sense that when treating them as line segments, they do not intersect.
_	It is an expansion of an art installation in the sense that it includes the sound element and therefore the time element.
_	Much of the trade was legitimate, at least in the sense that the owners of a piece of art were selling in order to raise money often so they could flee Nazi territories.
_	The Gameplay of AFDS is very similar to its predecessor Airforce Delta, in the sense that the player controls various aircraft to engage enemies and accomplish missions.
_	Using the norm it can be shown that these two factorization are actually inequivalent in the sense that the factors do not just differ by a unit in "O".
_	A point on the globe is chosen to be special in the sense that mapped distances and azimuths from that point to any other point will be correct.
_	He said that "Ridley wanted to convey the sense that everything could be natural phenomenon, like an eclipse or tsunami, not just someone waving a stick at the sea."
_	This record is unique in the sense that it featured a mix of original songs (8) and covers (6) of well known Mandarin songs like Singapore's award-winning lyricist Xiaohan’s (小寒) “Together Forever”《我们要一直这么要好》and
_	This solar eclipse is somewhat special in the sense that some unexplained gravity anomalies of about 7 formula_1 10 m/s during the solar eclipse were observed.
_	"We really enjoyed making [their previous single] Can We Dance but with Wild Heart we kind of experimented more with musical genre in the sense that we added a banjo and mandolin.
_	He is also regarded as a trend-setter in the sense that he pioneered the creation of literary works based on the Puranas.
_	VPA is virtual in the sense that the population size is not observed or measured directly but is inferred or back-calculated to have been a certain size in the past in order to support the observed fish catches and an assumed death rate owing to non-fishery related causes.
_	the bound is quite robust in the sense that it is tolerant of changes of the Hamiltonian.
_	The concept is regressive in the sense that it seeks towards the pre-language, the pre-born - in the end fetal huddled perfection."
_	Popper thought that Einstein's theory, as a theory properly grounded in scientific thought and method, was highly "risky", in the sense that it was possible to deduce consequences from it which were, in the light of the then-dominant Newtonian physics, highly improbable (e.g., that light is deflected towards solid bodies—confirmed by Eddington's experiments in 1919), and which would, if they turned out to be false, falsify the whole theory.
_	The Bisha'a is usually performed only to resolve the gravest of civil or criminal offences, and is a voluntary ritual in the sense that consent on the part of the ritual undergoer is required.
_	In Lindeberg, it was shown that formula_33 and formula_34 implies better scale selection properties in the sense that the selected scale levels obtained from a spatio-temporal Gaussian blob with spatial extent formula_35 and temporal extent formula_36 will perfectly match the spatial extent and the temporal duration of the blob, with scale selection performed by detecting spatio-temporal scale-space extrema of the differential expression.
_	The European schools are public schools, in the sense that they accept (for free) the children of European Union civil servants, and those whose parents work for other organisations with some special agreement.
_	UCHS was created to represent a new approach to learning in urban education, new in the sense that it would utilize the latest education, technology, and community resources to provide a meaningful individual program for each student, regardless of race or economic background.
_	The new party is focused on bumiputeras – Malays and Orang Asli – in the sense that full membership is only open to bumiputeras.
_	The reviewer still complained about Nikki and Paulo's participation, considering them "poorly developed" and giving "the sense that they are being shoehorned in".
_	Non-negative matrix factorization (NMF) is a dimension reduction method where only non-negative elements in the matrices are used, which is therefore a promising method in astronomy, in the sense that astrophysical signals are non-negative.
_	Lee has been quoted as saying "Americans are unique in the sense that they can pick the strengths and positive benefits from other cultures and incorporate them into their own society.
_	To some extent this rise in inequality is the natural result of the market forces that have generated the strong growth; but to some extent it is "artificial" in the sense that various government policies exacerbate the tendencies toward higher inequality, rather than mitigate them.
_	However, all these norms are equivalent in the sense that they all define the same topology.
_	We were right in the sense that architecture had to be rethought as something which is long-lived and, over time, could be decorated, embellished, and adorned by subsequent generations."
_	Cognition is like a magical illusion (māyā) in the sense that it is insubstantial and cannot be grasped.
_	Malay does not have a grammatical subject in the sense that English does.
_	"It is like a war, in the sense that there is total absence of peace," Bakare told Swedish radio news in describing conditions in his homeland.
_	The method is a domain-type numerical technique in the sense that the problem is discretized not only on the boundary to satisfy boundary conditions but also inside domain to satisfy governing equation.
_	There are scholars who also explain that the Bosniak identity has been conceptualized differently compared to the Croats and the Serbs in the sense that it has a collective identity, one that is founded on a shared environment, cultural practices and common experiences.
_	Infinitists take the infinite series to be merely potential, in the sense that an individual may have indefinitely many reasons available to them, without having consciously thought through all of these reasons when the need arises.
_	The corporate mantra "Our people are our greatest assets" is literally true in the sense that so-called knowledge workers qualify as extremely valuable, perhaps irreplaceable information assets.
_	If "ω" and "ω' " are principal connections on a principal bundle "P", then the difference "ω' "- "ω" is a formula_1-valued 1-form on "P" which is not only "G"-equivariant, but horizontal in the sense that it vanishes on any section of the vertical bundle "V" of "P".
_	KClO is an oxidizer in the sense that it exothermically transfers oxygen to combustible materials, greatly increasing their rate of combustion relative to that in air.
_	Plenge Jakobsens project is socio-critical in the sense that he examines and discusses political, economical, cultural and social structures forming the foundation of modern life.
_	In many ways, Liverpool Lesbian & Gay Pride of the early 90s paved the way for Homotopia, the city's modern day gay arts festival launched some 12 years later, in the sense that Homotopia took on a similar formula.
_	Nevertheless, industrialisation remained quite traditional in the sense that it did not lead to the growth of modern and large urban centres, but to a conurbation of industrial villages and towns developed around a coal-mine or a factory.
_	Earth is post apocalyptic in the sense that, when the "League of Peoples" offered humanity technological advance in exchange for the promise never to kill other sentient creatures, most of the population of Earth accepted and left the planet.
_	In a letter to Ann Popham he wrote: "I was sometimes unfaithful to Eileen, and I also treated her badly, and I think she treated me badly, too, at times, but it was a real marriage, in the sense that we had been through awful struggles together and she understood all about my work, etc."
_	She describes her work as costumbrista and even naïve, in the sense that the forms are simple and uncomplicated, but with a poetic view of the world.
_	This expression acts as a discriminant in the sense that it is zero "if and only if" there is a non-zero solution in six unknowns "x", "y", "z", (with superscript i = 0 or 1) of the following system of equations
_	Because Romans had never been obligated to cultivate one god or one cult only, religious tolerance was not an issue in the sense that it is for competing monotheistic systems.
_	The town had become a major Taliban drug trafficking station and had been considered to be of symbolic importance to both sides, to the Taliban in the sense that they can take and hold ground in Afghanistan in defiance of the Afghan government and NATO.
_	The transcriptions for partial voicing and devoicing may be used in either the sense of degrees of voicing or in the sense that the voicing is discontinuous.
_	His explanation for the different names given for Joseph's father is that Joseph had a biological father and an adoptive father, and that one of the gospels traces the genealogy through the adoptive father in order to draw parallels between Joseph and Jesus (both having an adoptive father) and as a metaphor for God's relationship with humankind, in the sense that God "adopted" human beings as his children.
_	The 2009/2010 off-season was dominated by the arrival of Brendan Fevola from Carlton, and the hype was focused on Fevola and Jonathan Brown in the sense that the Lions could capitalise on their strong 2009 season.
_	Both approaches are effectively the same approach, in the sense that they both assume an infinite planar structure which gives rise to a discrete Fourier series representation for the fields.
_	Such policies are also asymmetric in the sense that they should be acceptable both to those who believe that people behave rationally and to those who believe that people often behave irrationally.
_	It is thus "practicably impossible to determine whether the conscious parallelism was dependent or interdependent, in the sense that there was or was not a unity of anticompetitive purpose among the seller and acquiescing dealers."
_	It is best to consider the environment in which provisioning occurs to be object oriented, in the sense that the behaviour of the router is defined based on which objects are instantiated and how they are related.
_	It is a "symbiotic relationship" in the sense that lobbying firms can exploit the "experience and connections gleaned from working inside the legislative process", and lawmakers find a "ready pool of experienced talent."
_	The Marmot is based on the .220 Swift with improved characteristics such as steeper sides and shoulder angle, but is not improved in the sense that you cannot fire form factory ammunition in its chamber.
_	This release method is VCS-agnostic in the sense that the user does not need to have these VCSes installed.
_	This definition is natural in the sense that a given well-ordering on the index set provides a unique way to list the next element given a partial enumeration.
_	Her work is formally inventive and often documentary in spirit, in the sense that it honors those whose stories or voices might be lost, were it not for her own writing.
_	Zeus is virtually immortal in the sense that he does not age, is immune to all known diseases and Earthly toxins, and cannot be killed through conventional means.
_	His current work includes the development of a materialist theory of the subject alternative to the conceptions of Alain Badiou and Slavoj Žižek, in the sense that it would relate the discussed issues to the tradition of Western Marxism (Adorno, Lukács, Althusser, Marx).
_	It is akin to an opinion poll in the sense that it asks who the voter plans to vote for or some similar set of questions.
_	Kowalski feels this example is faulty in the sense that the ball has no free will; it merely acts according to the laws of physics, but he acknowledges that if an individual were to have freely chosen to commit murder, then it would hold.
_	He took the playing of fiddle reels as an example: ""how a human hand could perform, on its own, truly astonishing feats – astonishing in the sense that if thought interfered for a moment the feat was destroyed"".
_	However looking at a task that incorporates meaningful play, such as the switch task for children which incorporated a story for motivation to the children, interactions which the children could enjoy (such as finding treasure) created the sense that the children were helping the characters accomplish a goal.
_	Differential diagnosis can be regarded as implementing aspects of the hypothetico-deductive method, in the sense that the potential presence of candidate diseases or conditions can be viewed as hypotheses that physicians further determine as being true or false.
_	In general, there is no restriction on the shape of the lattice of subgroups, in the sense that every lattice is isomorphic to a sublattice of the subgroup lattice of some group.
_	In addition to the structure, the Sony Centre auditorium houses a very sophisticated acoustic system, which gives the audience the sense that the sound is surrounding them (Canadian Architect 18).
_	For Sturzo there will be no true philosophical research if not in the history and at the service of the same, philosophy becomes almost the methodology of history in the sense that it gives method in living and in reading the same.
_	The closure operator is dual to the interior operator , in the sense that
_	The majority of studies on stochastic scheduling models have largely been established based on the assumption of complete information, in the sense that the probability distributions of the random variables involved, such as the processing times and the machine up/downtimes, are completely specified a priori.
_	area-preserving, in the sense that
_	Hypergammon has been 'solved', in the sense that computers can now play perfect hypergammon.
_	In doing so, it enables company members to dialecticize that process—in the sense that a particular "fabel" provides a fixed 'snapshot' of a transitory and constantly developing process in a form that enables comparisons to be made.
_	This is in the sense that a problem belongs to "C" if and only if it has a proof in the theory.
_	IQ scores are fairly stable during development in the sense that while a child's reasoning ability increases, the child's relative ranking in comparison to that of other individuals of the same age is fairly stable during development.
_	Fifth, law agents, such as judges, advocates and officials, are unspecialized in the sense that they lack some complex theories as to good and evil, empirical and social science or justice (proper distribution of goods/privileges and burdens in a society).
_	While not an official holiday of any sort (in the sense that it is not recognized or declared by any government), National Science Fiction Day is given some degree of credence by its recognition by organizations such as the Hallmark Channel and by the Scholastic Corporation.
_	In Isaac Newton's view, space was absolute—in the sense that it existed permanently and independently of whether there was any matter in the space.
_	Roman law was not a direct influence on the civil code in the sense that none of its dispositions were directly extracted from the Corpus Iuris Civilis or from any Roman jurist's passage.
_	In other words, the MP works on the assumption that universal grammar constitutes a perfect design in the sense that it contains only what is necessary to meet humans' conceptual and physical (phonological) needs.
_	He is so in the sense that he is the last important Scholastic writer, and that his works may be considered to form a vast encyclopedia, a complete summary of the Scholastic teaching of the Middle Ages; this is their primary characteristic and their chief merit.
_	While having the undistorted substructure these materials are typically 'unsaturated' in the sense that one of the bands in the band structure is only partially filled.
_	Pitchfork gave the album 7.8 out of a possible 10, noting, "Way beyond sleep aids, you get the sense that Bridges would be a hell of a life coach."
_	At the time that the list was released in December 2011, Mountain stated in response: "I feel like I’ve influenced in the sense that if you want to do it, do it.
_	This perspective is unique in the sense that risk represents both opportunity and danger to the Investor, while it only represents danger to the Program Manager and the Lawyer.
_	A property of prime powers used frequently in analytic number theory is that the set of prime powers which are not prime is a small set in the sense that the infinite sum of their reciprocals converges, although the primes are a large set.
_	And it was the sense that everyone played from their heart.
_	The electrocardiophone is a quintephone in the sense that it creates sound from the "5th classical element" (i.e. from beyond the world of matter).
_	These are absolute, in the sense that they stand alone, and cannot appear as subjects or objects as they are.
_	AKLEH access is quite unique in the sense that the highway has direct tunnel access to the area's underground parking garage will the other road access has drop off point as well as parking garage access.
_	The animator explained, "We don't create realism in the sense that if you're doing a human character, it's not going to look realistic ... the balance is finding an appealing way of drawing using the visual tools that you have in the design to convey the believable emotions that you want to get across."
_	He has the striving to be superior in the sense that we all have ambition to be successful; but so long as this striving is expressed in work it does not lead to false valuations, which are at the root of mental disease."
_	The laws listed above define Boolean algebra, in the sense that they entail the rest of the subject.
_	It is a general meta language in the sense that it does not have a bias for any particular software language.
_	AB stands for "absolute" in the sense that no relative reference object is used (unlike using Vega as a baseline object).
_	When the battery dies, the PCB is rendered permanently inoperable, in the sense that there is no way to reprogram the RAM from within the PCB itself — hence the term "suicide".
_	In reality, the day bombing was "precision bombing" only in the sense that most bombs fell somewhere near a specific designated target such as a railway yard.
_	Note that there will always be ties in the independent variable (individuals are ‘tied’ in the sense that they are in the same group) but there may or may not be ties in the dependent variable.
_	[W]hat surfaces in the film is the fierce dedication [dancers] have to their craft and the sense that they're here singing and performing their guts out in front of choreographers and producers because there's no other place on Earth they'd rather be."
_	We play extreme music, sure, but in the sense that we go to all extremes.
_	The definition of the beard as stated by the scholars of (Arabic) language is: the hair of the face, jawbone and cheeks, in the sense that all the hair on the cheeks, jawbone and chin is part of the beard and removing any of it is counted as a sin, because the Messenger said:
_	Although DDA and DEM are similar in the sense that they both simulate the behavior of interacting discrete bodies, they are quite different theoretically.
_	The leadership style of the "Herr Pastor" was, to some degree, a benevolent dictatorship in the sense that the "Herr Pastor" held supreme decision-making authority.
_	Hurford's model, yet pointed out that it was limited in the sense that it did not take into account the costs of learning a language.
_	It doesn't exist in the sense that it can take an oath.
_	The plain version of HFE is considered to be practically broken in the sense that secure parameters lead to an impractical scheme.
_	The ambient construction is canonical in the sense that it is performed only using the conformal class of the metric: it is conformally invariant.
_	This result serves as a corroboration of Deninger's program mentioned above in the sense that it verifies a prediction made by this program on the analytic side, i.e., the one concerning dynamics on foliated spaces.
_	Some are ancient and some are modern, but they are all factual in the sense that people reported these things and believed they were true."
_	Apart from giving users the sense that they matter – and they really should – it also means that if you do have to take drastic measures and curtail (or even remove) a discussion or thread, it won't seem quite so much like the egregious action of some deus ex machina."
_	Eiffel's view of computation is completely object-oriented in the sense that every operation is relative to an object, the "target".
_	By introducing the latent variable, independence is restored in the sense that within classes variables are independent (local independence).
_	The major technical problem is that, at some stage, the variety formula_5 may become 'too singular', in the sense that the canonical divisor formula_3 is no longer Cartier, so the intersection number formula_7 with a curve formula_8 is not even defined.
_	Art is immanent in the sense that its truth is given in its immediacy in a given work of art, and singular in that its truth is found in art and art alone—hence reviving the ancient materialist concept of "aesthesis".
_	"Darwin on Trial" mentioned "Pandas" as "'creationist' only in the sense that it juxtaposes a paradigm of 'intelligent design' with the dominant paradigm of (naturalistic) evolution," but his use of the term as a focus for his wedge strategy promoting "theistic realism" came later.
_	In complexity theory, computational problems that are co-NP-complete are those that are the hardest problems in co-NP, in the sense that any problem in co-NP can be reformulated as a special case of any co-NP-complete problem with only polynomial overhead.
_	Strategic media runs opposed to tactical media in the sense that it is power (or in this case media influence) coming from a "higher" entity to control those with less power.
_	The game is similar to "Cookie Clicker" in the sense that, once the characters are unlocked they will do the player's job for them and increase the total damage per second the player does.
_	And thus grammatology is not a science of man because it deconstructs any anthropocentrism, in the sense that the inscription in question falls on both sides of the divide human/non-human.
_	Although Gurindam looks similar with Syair which also have the same rhyme at the end of each stanza, it differs in the sense that it completes the message within the same stanza while Syair unfolding the message in several stanzas.
_	Massive gravity is a bimetric theory in the sense that nontrivial interaction terms for the metric formula_44 can only be written down with the help of a second metric, as the only nonderivative term that can be written using one metric is a cosmological constant.
_	It is unified in the sense that it is understood as a single endeavor, and there are no scientists studying alternative realities.
_	The continuity assumption is "stronger than needed" in the sense that it indeed guarantees the existence of a "continuous utility function" representation.
_	He was a deft and farsighted planner in the sense that he modernised Bhutan without destabilizing its culture and tradition.
_	However, this album is no studio tour de force, but a "Live" recording in the sense that Jolly and fellow musicians Chuck Berghofer, Paul Humphrey, John Pisano, Milt Holland, and Emil Richards got together and improvised their way through 12 tunes in the space of four hours.
_	This game is in essence a story-based adventure game, in the sense that much of the game is spent reading the on-screen text, as in a visual novel.
_	For the same reason, most strings are complex in the sense that they cannot be significantly compressed – their "K"("s") is not much smaller than |"s"|, the length of "s" in bits.
_	In cryptography, deniable encryption may be used to describe steganographic techniques, where the very existence of an encrypted file or message is "deniable" in the sense that an adversary cannot prove that an encrypted message exists.
_	This association is a duality in the sense that there is a natural isomorphism between the double dual "A" and "A" (defined via the Poincaré bundle) and that it is contravariant functorial, i.e. it associates to all morphisms "f": "A" → "B" dual morphisms "f": "B" → "A" in a compatible way.
_	"Antiquities of the Jews" 12:253 may be translated to give the sense that the "impious or wicked" had "remained" rather than "dwelt" in the citadel, which could be taken to mean that the Acra had been standing before the revolt and that only the Macedonian garrison was new.
_	"Radio Szczecin" thought the title is unforgettable due to its cultural relevance, in the sense that a game with Polish artists and subtitles made a dent on the world stage.
_	In mathematics, specifically in commutative algebra, the elementary symmetric polynomials are one type of basic building block for symmetric polynomials, in the sense that any symmetric polynomial can be expressed as a polynomial in elementary symmetric polynomials.
_	Registered mail from China Post is only traceable in the sense that the mailman marks the item as delivered when and if it is delivered to the recipients mailbox.
_	The Star Tac was the first wearable cellular telephone, in the sense that it was the first that could be used while being worn.
_	Success of No Woman comes with a fresh western prespictves and looks: in the sense that no elements in the making of the film can be ignored from the perspective of a film critic, Unless it be taken simplistic, not profound."
_	The 2009/2010 off-season was dominated by the arrival of Brendan Fevola from Carlton, and the hype was focused on Fevola and Jonathan Brown in the sense that the Lions could capitalise on their strong 2009 season.
_	Therefore, it defines a safe space, in the sense that as long as we are below the boundary, we are below the threshold value.
_	Sobig is not only a computer worm in the sense that it replicates by itself, but also a Trojan horse in that it masquerades as something other than malware.
_	This change was contentious in the sense that participants in Proof of Work mining were incentivised to reject it because it decreased the fees they could expect to receive, but stakeholders (i.e. PoS Miners) were able to enforce their decision that it should be accepted.
_	Observing changes in such objects allows astronomers to determine whether their spatial extension is "small" or "large", in the sense that notable fluctuations to an object as vast as our Milky Way cannot be seen over a small time period, such as a few years, whereas such substantial changes are possible if the size of the object does not exceed a diameter of a few light-years.
_	"G. batrachiensis" is unique in the sense that it produces two different types of eggs to reproduce and that the parasite occurs only in the tadpole stage of its host.
_	It is called "mini" in the sense that the Chinese university involved is shrunk to one -- Fudan University, and on the side of the U.S., the target is shrunk to three universities: Columbia University, New York University, and the City University of New York.
_	According to Zohny, "Koshary is sort of a very reflective meal of the country in the sense that it's a very chaotic kind of meal".
_	Rain fertilized crops, but the sense that its runoff filled the rivers did not figure in the Greek mythic picture.
_	It is "moving" in the sense that as the point of the base varies, the frame in the fibre changes by an element of the symmetry group "G".
_	Citizenship was not seen as a separate activity from the private life of the individual person, in the sense that there was not a distinction between public and private life.
_	In many ways the ritual can be compared with the old Latin dictum do ut des ("I give so that you may give"), in the sense that it was meant to provide a means of inducing the deities to act in favor of humans.
_	Usually a spray is required to be homogeneous in the sense that its integral curves "t"→Φ(ξ)∈"TM" obey the rule Φ(λξ)=Φ(ξ) in positive reparameterizations.
_	The diocese is unique among the Finnish dioceses in the sense that in some parish areas, the church members are in a minority.
_	The singular-value decomposition is very general in the sense that it can be applied to any matrix whereas eigenvalue decomposition can only be applied to certain classes of square matrices.
_	The isotopic and the isomeric shift are similar in the sense that both are effects in which the finite size of the nucleus manifests itself and both are due to a difference in the electromagnetic interaction energy between the electrons and the nucleus of the atom.
_	The reason FOL itself is simply not used as a computer language is that it is actually too expressive, in the sense that FOL can easily express statements that no computer, no matter how powerful, could ever solve.
_	Some verb roots are defective in the sense that they must occur with either or both of the derivational prefixes.
_	On every pre-abelian category formula_1 there exists an exact structure formula_2 which is maximal in the sense that it contains every other exact structure.
_	In differential geometry, a (smooth) Riemannian manifold or (smooth) Riemannian space ("M","g") is a real, smooth manifold "M" equipped with an inner product formula_1 on the tangent space formula_2 at each point formula_3 that varies smoothly from point to point in the sense that if "X" and "Y" are differentiable vector fields on "M", then formula_4 is a smooth function.
_	The case was also historic in the sense that similar case was put up in the court of Mughal emperor Akbar, in year 1591AD, where representation was challenged on the legal point of proper accountability and proper succession resulting in royal farman(order) issued in favor of 27th Dai Dawood Bin Qutubshah.
_	With Thunderbird, youre left with the sense that, while one day in the right hands this voice will drop something truly special and far reaching, that day is still a few tweaks and stylistic shifts off."
_	The finish should be simple and workmanlike – it is designed to be unfinished in the sense that actor, designer and designer must ‘fill’ the whole space, and the audience complete the furnishings as wallpaper does a room’.
_	This interval is 'exact' in the sense that its coverage probability is never less than the nominal .
_	The Gaussian basis functions are local to the center vector in the sense that
_	The competition is notional in the sense that it is simply a ranking scheme overlaid on all international matches that are otherwise played as part of regular
_	Towns were often "free", in the sense that they were directly protected by the king or emperor, and were not part of a feudal fief.
_	For such temperatures, the model is "frozen" in the sense that (in the thermodynamic limit) the energy per vertex and entropy per vertex are both zero.
_	If the OR is greater than 1, then having "A" is considered to be "associated" with having "B" in the sense that the having of "B" raises (relative to not-having "B") the odds of having "A".
_	Butalia points out that the Partition is, like the holocaust, still very much a "living history", in the sense that many survivors are still around and can be interviewed.
_	It is also unconscious in the sense that society achieves the results without being fully conscious of how it did so.
_	The Zeiss formula is apocryphal, in the sense that it has grown to be a well-known named concept by propagation through the internet, even though it has no official origin, little connection to Carl Zeiss Company, and no recognition or usage in the photographic industry outside the web community.
_	Thurstone showed that in terms of his conceptual framework, Weber's law and the so-called Weber-Fechner law, which are sometimes (and misleadingly) regarded as one and the same, are independent, in the sense that one may be applicable but not the other to a given collection of experimental data.
_	The provision is interpreted by scholarly means in the sense that a person who wishes to convert is free to do so as long as such activity is "made in private."
_	The MSGF method is multiscale in the sense that it links the response of materials to an applied force at atomistic scales to their response at the macroscopic scales.
_	Flying fish are not true fliers in the sense that they do not execute powered flight.
_	They are not of our world, (in the sense that the Faerie, the Gods, and the Demons "are" still of our world.)
_	Steiner takes Descartes' dictum, "I think, therefore I am," to signify the truth that "I am certain . . . that [thinking] exists in the sense that I myself bring it forth," However, Steiner advances the objection (common to many others, beginning in Descartes' own time), that the further claim that "I am" is more problematic.
_	where the sets "U" form a sequence of open sets "U" that decrease to the point "x" in the sense that
_	Fe in the 80s is not Saint Tropez in the 50s, except perhaps in the sense that there is no gap between the classes.
_	The random walk hypothesis considers that asset prices in an organized market evolve at random, in the sense that the expected value of their change is zero but the actual value may turn out to be positive or negative.
_	He considered the manipulation of a photograph to be an expression of individuality, and believed that manipulation was necessary to eliminate the sense that the photograph was produced by an unemotional machine.
_	Jewish women were contradicting their view points in the sense that they were modernizing, but they also tried to keep some traditions alive.
_	In the above example, /Ø/ is underspecified in the sense that it is not specified for person.
_	The controls are discretionary in the sense that a subject with a certain access permission is capable of passing that permission (perhaps indirectly) on to any other subject (unless restrained by mandatory access control)".
_	Imaginary time is "not" imaginary in the sense that it is unreal or made-up (any more than, say, irrational numbers defy logic), it is simply expressed in terms of what mathematicians call imaginary numbers.
_	Furthermore, the rule of proof by contradiction (below) just by itself is inconsistency non-robust in the sense that the negation of every proposition can be proved from a contradiction.
_	Horror fiction scholar John Kenneth Muir also praised the film in his book "Horror Films of the 1980s", writing: "The thrill of a picture like "Terror Train" is the shrewd manner in which it plays against audience expectations; the sense that the slasher film paradigm gives it parameters which it can then undercut, subvert, and if needs be, violate."
_	This text further contrasts the True Body with the "transformation body" ["huashen" 化身 or "bianhuashen", used for "nirmāṇa-kāya"] and the "trace body" ["jishen" 跡身], in the sense that all teachings are traces of Truth (Robinet 1979: 42).
_	He is in a similar situation to his college friend Manifico de Vandimion in the sense that he does not get the respect he feels he deserves from his peers.
_	However this enzyme is unique in the sense that it can put different lengths of carbon side chains onto DHNA to produce different and menaquinols.
_	CAS is equivalent to load-link/store-conditional, in the sense that a constant number of invocations of either primitive can be used to implement the other one in a wait-free manner.
_	Theorem in the actor model provides a fairly general way to represent concurrent systems that are closed in the sense that they do not receive communications from outside.
_	Keckler's voice is unique in the sense that it spans three octaves.
_	Bounded intervals are bounded sets, in the sense that their diameter (which is equal to the absolute difference between the endpoints) is finite.
_	For example, an individual consumer is assumed to be rational in the sense that he maximizes a utility function, which expresses his subjective sense of well-being as a function of the amounts of various goods he consumes; firms are assumed to maximize profit or some related goal.
_	In the "Los Angeles Review of Books", Emily Drabinski writes, "What emerges from these pages is the sense that Google’s algorithms of oppression comprise just one of the hidden infrastructures that govern our daily lives, and that the others are likely just as hard-coded with white supremacy and misogyny as the one that Noble explores."
_	Every village in the Punjab, through the Tehsildar (taxman), had an ample supply of the Punjabi "qaida" (beginners book), which was compulsory for females and thus, almost every Punjabi woman was literate in the sense that she could read and write the "lundee" form of Gurmukhi.
_	About his mother, Vikernes states that she was "very race conscious", in the sense that she was afraid that Vikernes "was going to come home with a black girl!"
_	The trio of Hopkins-penned tunes... merely extends the sense that Garcia’s visits to Keystone Berkeley primarily provided an excuse for the musicians to get together and improvise on a theme.
_	Bop in the sense that she has taken the essence of our music and transported it to another art form".
_	They are risky to the borrower in the sense that they are mostly indexed to the Wall Street Journal prime rate, which is considered a Spot Index, or a financial indicator that is subject to immediate change (as are the loans based upon the Prime Rate).
_	This can be used as an argument against having additionality, in the sense that non-additional (i.e., emission reductions that would have taken place under BAU) emission reductions should be credited.
_	Delivering the verdict on 29 March 1961, Justice Rumpff stated:""On all the evidence presented to this court and on our findings of fact, it is impossible for this court to come to the conclusion that the African National Congress has acquired or adopted a policy to overthrow the state by violence, that is, in the sense that the masses had to be prepared or conditioned to commit direct acts of violence against the state.""
_	In theory, under certain circumstances, private markets will allocate goods and services among individuals efficiently (in the sense that no waste occurs and that individual tastes are matching with the economy's productive abilities).
_	Similarly, the use of e-mails facilitates language revitalization in the sense that speakers of a minority language who moved to a location where their native language is not being spoken can take advantage of the Internet to communicate with their family and friends, thus maintaining the use of their native language.
_	For example, Publius Cornelius Scipio received the agnomen "Africanus" after his victory over the Carthaginian general Hannibal at Zama, Africa ("Africanus" here means "of Africa" in the sense that his fame derives from Africa, rather than being born in Africa, which would have been "Afer"); and the same procedure occurred in the names of Quintus Caecilius Metellus "Numidicus" (conqueror of Numidia) and Quintus Caecilius Metellus "Macedonicus".
_	Here, the preposition "in" is missing from the Japanese ("missing" in the sense that the corresponding postposition would be used with the main clause verb in Japanese)
_	Although it is sometimes claimed that least squares (or classical statistical methods in general) are robust, they are only robust in the sense that the type I error rate does not increase under violations of the model.
_	This implies that the Bryant–Kusner parametrization of Boy's surfaces is "optimal" in the sense that it is the "least bent" immersion of a projective plane into three-space.
_	It was unusual in the sense that it provided its pupils with a secular education parallel to their religious studies, enabling them to earn a livelihood rather than having to take up rabbinic positions.
_	FliNak is different from FLiBe in the sense that is a basic melt—or it has an excess of fluorine ions.
_	Issues were unique in the sense that these subjects were the only ones found on definitive stamps for more than a decade.
_	Two Foster networks that have identical poles and zeroes will be equivalent circuits in the sense that their immittance functions will be identical.
_	Newton metres and joules are dimensionally equivalent in the sense that they have the same expression in SI base units:
_	OPM objects and OPM processes depend on each other in the sense that an object cannot be transformed without a process, while a process cannot happen without transforming at least one object.
_	20 is a conformal map, which means that if two curves passing through a point "a" of "U" form an angle "α" (in the sense that the tangent lines to the curves at "a" form an angle "α"), then the images of the two curves form the "same" angle "α" at "f"("a").
_	If is optimal in the sense that it has the minimal expected word length for , then (Shannon 1948):
_	It is known to be neither provable nor refutable using the axioms of Zermelo–Fraenkel set theory including the axiom of choice (ZFC), the standard foundation of modern mathematics, in the sense that some models of ZFC satisfy CH, while others violate it.
_	Formally, is the "most general" algebra in which these rules hold for the multiplication, in the sense that any unital associative -algebra containing with alternating multiplication on must contain a homomorphic image of .
_	Xwejni Redoubt was unusual in the sense that it had a semicircular or rectangular platform, while most redoubts were pentagonal.
_	Part of the reason for the broad appeal of his work was the sense that the reader could really learn knowledge of geology, biology, astronomy, paleontology, oceanography and the exotic locations and cultures of world through the adventures of Verne's protagonists.
_	Novelty is understood in the sense that these properties are not present in similar macroscale objects or much different from the properties of those (e.g., nanorods vs. usual macroscopic beam structures).
_	That you say as a theologian that I am a universalist is evident, in the sense that I believe that Jesus was sent into the world to save the sinners that we all are.
_	Likewise, engineers proceed in design “blindly” in the sense that “the outcome is not completely foreseeable” thus the “best” potential variations are in some degree invisible.
_	In parenthood, the human parent imitates the divine parent, in the sense that education could be understood as a form of the pursuit of "salvation", the "right path" for that child.
_	The head of Mercedes-Benz Canada suggested that the brand "has been able to attract 'middle-class' consumers even during the recession because of the sense that owning a Mercedes-Benz comes with 'membership in a club'."
_	In law, every member of a police force is a Constable whatever their actual rank, in the sense that, despite being a low-ranking or high-ranking officer, all have the same powers of arrest.
_	It is a part of universal algebra, in the sense that it relates to all types of algebraic structure (with finitary operations).
_	A file viewer is limited-functionality software in the sense that it does not have a capability to create a file, or modify the content of an existing one.
_	Writing for The A.V. Club, Todd VanDerWerff rated the episode a "C", and wrote that "There are good moments in every episode sent out to critics—five in total—but they’re not enough to overcome the crushing sameness of so much of what happens here, nor are they enough to overcome the sense that this show, ambitious as it is, has absolutely no center."
_	Producer Gary Goodman explained that they wanted someone "...that would be appealing on a television screen... in the sense that you were comfortable with her accent and her character".
_	This relationship is perfect, in the sense that an increase in "x" is "always" accompanied by an increase in "y".
_	The ladies’ mausoleums are peculiar in the sense that they appear to look like vaulted wagon structures.
_	Sklansky's strategy is an equilibrium strategy in the sense that it is optimal against someone playing an optimal strategy against it.
_	and furthermore this solution is "close" to a in the sense that
_	Nerdrum, according to Vine, later considered the work to be naive in the sense that Rousseau defines the word, in which mankind is seen as innocent and innately good.
_	Another theory has to do with thermoregulation in the sense that a black beetle heats up faster than yellow and then once they have warmed up theoretically there will be less moisture in the cuticle which leads to changing to a colour which does not heat as quickly so they won't overheat.
_	In particular, the other minds reply argues that we cannot use our experience of consciousness to answer questions about other minds (even the mind of a computer), and the epiphenomena reply argues that Searle's consciousness does not "exist" in the sense that Searle thinks it does.
_	It was considered horribly organized, or at least the women athletes were not accorded the same respect as the men in the sense that they had to conduct heats, semi-finals and finals all in the same day.
_	It is even more irrational in the sense that the creation of new products, calling for the disposal of old products, fuels the economy and encourages the need to work more to buy more.
_	In a "Rain Taxi" interview, Hoenigman explains that "Burn Your Belongings" was an experimental work in the sense that he had no idea what the outcome would be: "I had some theories and some things I wanted to try, and I just let it fly from there.
_	In this model the racemic state is unstable in the sense that the slightest enantiomeric excess will be amplified to a completely homochiral state.
_	The trefoil knot is chiral, in the sense that a trefoil knot can be distinguished from its own mirror image.
_	Security is also gained, in the sense that the inbound port is not left open when not actively in use.
_	These transmitting devices are collaborating in the sense that both devices must be synchronized in time and frequency so that the intentional overlapping occurs under controlled circumstances.
_	In his 1982 "New York Times" review, cited above, Caldwell also observed that "the question of artistic influences is unusually complicated in the case of Mr. Kipniss" and that "the sense that one gets in all of [his] work is of a genuinely individual sensibility."
_	In recent years, there has been attention to the problem of bright students from low-income backgrounds not applying to top colleges, and attending less challenging colleges instead or skipping college entirely; this phenomenon has been called undermatching in the sense that these students are not properly paired or "matched" with academically challenging colleges; there have been efforts at some colleges such as Williams to actively seek out bright low-income students.
_	Olson argues that Dewey and Cutter’s insistence on a universal language is “a harmful characteristic in the sense that it marginalizes and excludes "Others" – concepts outside of a white, male, Eurocentric, Christocentric, heterosexual, able-bodied, bourgeois mainstream.”
_	The variables are then maximally related in the sense that knowing the value of one variable provides complete information about the values of all the other variables, and the variables can be figuratively regarded as "cogs," in which the position of one cog determines the positions of all the others (Rothstein 1952).
_	Anglicans, Lutherans, and some Methodists also believe that their churches are "Catholic" in the sense that they too are in continuity with the original universal church founded by the Apostles.
_	When analyzing the inventory of segmental units in any given language, some segments will be found to be "marginal," in the sense that they are only found in onomatopoeic words, interjections, loan words, or a very limited number of ordinary words, but not throughout the language.
_	The coins issued during the Tang Dynasty were unusual in their day, in the sense that the obverse inscription consisted of four characters instead of two.
_	A PTF is a permanent correction with respect to the VRM (Version, Release, Modification) level of the product to which it is applicable, and is a temporary fix in the sense that the problem correction will temporarily be available as a permanent fix, and later will be incorporated into the product base code, and will thereby no longer be a fix, although the associated PTF and/or APAR numbers will, as a rule, be included in the source documentation associated with the ensuing base code update.
_	of the same sort (in the sense that they belong to the same
_	Improving it in the sense that they desire to shift the focus to a more humanitarian goal.
_	Coffee, cocoa and tea with an UTZ certification has added value in the sense that it assures buyers that it has been produced according to an internationally recognized standard for responsible production, i.e. according to the UTZ Certified Code of Conduct.
_	If technology monopolizes an activity, students can begin to develop the sense that "life would scarcely be thinkable without technology."
_	Social capital affects health risk behavior in the sense that individuals who are embedded in a network or community rich in support, social trust, information, and norms, have resources that help achieve health goals.
_	The same study also examined reasons for "not" passing along emails, and noted that the most common reason was "the sense that the content was old."
_	This was in the sense that the client sought a service from Messenger, as a government appointed civil celebrant, and as a professional ceremony provider.
_	is continuous in the product topology, and moreover that the second derivative defined by () is also continuous in the sense that
_	It's cool, it doesn't only work out for me in the sense that I get a great band that wants to be there.
_	At this time, the legislative assembly was the most democratic (in the sense that members were elected) but with the power of the Councils to ‘veto’ anything they did not approve of, it also made the assembly the least powerful.
_	The diagram is tree-shaped in the sense that it branches between each 'level', allowing the player to choose one sequence or another.
_	This is a classical result in the sense that it does not take into account that electrons obey Fermi–Dirac statistics.
_	The overhang seats are problematic in the sense that they distort the proportional representation (resulting from the second votes).
_	Virtual circuit switching is a packet switching technology that emulates circuit switching, in the sense that the connection is established before any packets are transferred, and packets are delivered in order.
_	Kenny's entry into politics was unusual in the sense that neither he nor his family were steeped in politics at the time.
_	Inclusion is the canonical partial order in the sense that every partially ordered set ("X", formula_12) is isomorphic to some collection of sets ordered by inclusion.
_	The duality pairing between Φ and Φ is then compatible with the inner product on "H", in the sense that:
_	It is free in the sense that users can change the software to fit individual needs.
_	The Word is "not" God in the sense that he is the "same person" as the "theos" mentioned in 1:1a; he is not God the Father (God absolutely as in common NT usage) or the Trinity.
_	It dominates alpha-beta pruning in the sense that it will never examine a node that can be pruned by alpha-beta; however, it relies on accurate node ordering to capitalize on this advantage.
_	Human beings are "controlled" by these motivations in the sense that they do not have influence on them but are rather defined by them.
_	(At least not in the sense that former SDBs broke with their church and formed the SDAs.)
_	However, McNeill also declares Sale's work to be "unhistorical, in the sense that [it] selects from the often cloudy record of Columbus's actual motives and deeds what suits the researcher's 20th-century purposes."
_	The Nash embedding theorem is a global theorem in the sense that the whole manifold is embedded into R.
_	At paragraph [55] of Elias LJ's judgment (following the paragraphing from the neutral citation given below) two senses of the word 'substantial' are identified: (i) something substantial is more than something which is merely trivial or minimal owing to the fact that it has "substance", or (ii) something substantial is big or large (e.g. in the sense that a substantial salary is a large one).
_	Old people are 'suitable' candidates for this kind of accusation in the sense that they are isolated and vulnerable, and they are 'suitable' candidates for 'social security' for precisely the same reasons."
_	In the case of a finitely generated group, the ends of the group are defined to be the ends of the Cayley graph for the finite set of generators; this definition is invariant under the choice of generators, in the sense that if two different finite set of generators are chosen, the ends of the two Cayley graphs are in one-to-one correspondence with each other.
_	And in fact, Cantor's diagonal argument "is" constructive, in the sense that given a bijection between the real numbers and natural numbers, one constructs a real number that doesn't fit, and thereby proves a contradiction.
_	They postulate that these elements of reality are local, in the sense that each belongs to a certain point in spacetime.
_	In his "Diplomacy & Adventure" memoir, he states that his writer's credo is based on Robert Louis Stevenson's, in the sense that you have to live first to have stories to tell.
_	Suburbs of Sydney that developed in the 1990s—such as Cherrybrook, Castle Hill, and Menai—are notable in the sense that large tracts of these developments contain almost exclusively Federation revival homes.
_	These are hunting wasps in the sense that they hunt animal food, generally insects, but they do not subtly paralyse them; instead they more or less butcher them and carry the most nutritious portions back to the colony to feed the young progressively.
_	In contrast, David Walters in ‘New Urbanism and neighborhoods’ explains that Everyday Urbanism follows the roots of Postmodern planning theory in the sense that is less concerned with design as a practice and constructs a theory of explanation by hypothesizing meanings contained in the urban condition, therefore, not a theory of action as Crawford suggests.
_	Consequently, evidence obtained under different experimental conditions cannot be comprehended within a single picture, but must be regarded as complementary in the sense that only the totality of the phenomenena exhausts the possible information about the objects.
_	The rule is sound (or truth-preserving) if it preserves validity in the sense that whenever any interpretation satisfies the hypothesis, that interpretation also satisfies the conclusion.
_	Of overarching importance to great achievements in any culture, Murray argues, are the sense that life has purpose and belief in ideals of beauty, truth, and goodness.
_	The campaign was successful in the sense that it brought into focus Meerut and harshness of British rule in India, which were hitherto unknown to many.
_	They are, however, a tangible component of International Relations in the sense that they encompass the space in which a wide range of non-state actors engage in the fostering of intercultural dialogue which can be either in favour of, or against, the national interests of state actors.
_	They wanted to sit “in the thick December dusk, by just such a wide-hooded fireplace, under just such black oak rafters, with the sense that beyond the mullioned panes the downs were darkened to a deeper solitude.
_	She is slightly weird in the sense that she is a fan of Tyler’s band, Puddle of Agony.
_	While the madrasa college could also issue degrees at all levels, the "jāmiʻah"s (such as and al-Azhar University) differed in the sense that they were larger institutions, more universal in terms of their complete source of studies, had individual faculties for different subjects, and could house a number of mosques, madaris, and other institutions within them.
_	However, until now there is no theory of Quantum gravity unifying GR and QFT in the sense that it could be used when objects become extremely small and heavy.
_	The main purpose is to characterize one or another class of computational complexity in the sense that a function is provably total if and only if it belongs to a given complexity class.
_	While First Nations workers were valuable assets to the canneries, they were not always reliable in the sense that they did not always return year after year.
_	EGT is different from other theoretical approaches in the sense that it recognizes that governance and its elements are constantly changing in interplay with each other.
_	During Hughes' era, the journal was traditional in the sense that double-blind review was not applied.
_	Japanese iced tea products mirror the market for hot tea in the sense that they are mostly green tea and oolong products, usually unflavoured and mostly unsweetened.
_	Firstly, it is very exclusively gendered in the sense that few men wear high heels in present times.
_	As nobles increasingly lived better quality lives, there arose a new consciousness of those on top and those below, and the sense that being a peasant was not a position of equality.
_	Among all the victims of Soviet psychiatry, Tarsis was the sole exception in the sense that he did not emphasised the 'injustice' of confining 'sane dissidents' to psychiatric hospitals and did not thereby imply that the psychiatric confinement of 'insane patients' was proper and just.
_	Smiley is sometimes considered the anti-Bond in the sense that Bond is an unrealistic figure and is more a portrayal of a male fantasy than a realistic government agent.
_	This is barren in the sense that there are just one train which comes in at 8:30 am & 3:00 pm and leaves after 15 minutes and halts at tundla junction and stays there.
_	The hallmark of Lovecraft's work is cosmicism: the sense that ordinary life is a thin shell over a reality that is so alien and abstract in comparison that merely contemplating it would damage the sanity of the ordinary person.
_	He follows in the steps of Charles Willeford in the sense that his characters never "think", they only "act": there are no inner monologues.
_	Cit and acit are different from Isvara, in the sense that they have attributes (Guna) and capacities (Swabhaava), which are different from those of Isvara.
_	If they are read in the sense that visitors to the Acropolis read them along the Parthenon from the Propylaea from west to east (from North XXXII to North I), then they tell of the fall of Troy and the departure of the Greeks.
_	However, if a sufficiently large mass such as a mountain is nearby, its gravitational attraction should pull the pendulum's plumb-bob slightly out of true (in the sense that it doesn't point to the centre of mass of the Earth).
_	SS4 was ground-breaking in the sense that it combined the advantages of part-time and full-time four-wheel drive with four available options: 2H (high-range rear-wheel drive), 4H (high-range full-time four-wheel drive), 4HLc (high-range four-wheel drive with locked center differential) and 4LLc (low-range four-wheel drive with locked center differential).
_	As a consequence of the Bianchi identities, the Ricci tensor of a Riemannian manifold is symmetric, in the sense that
_	This may be considered to be a form of external constraint, in the sense that the organism is constrained not by its makeup or genetics, but by its environment.
_	A volume form on a manifold has no local structure in the sense that it is not possible on small open sets to distinguish between the given volume form and the volume form on Euclidean space .
_	Rogers is seriously cool, in the sense that the word means calm, stoic, intriguing and impressive, and suggests reserved confidence, a self-conscious aplomb in behaviour that distances itself from authority rather than directly confronts it.
_	All Australians who upheld the White Australia policy were racist in the sense that they upheld a policy which discriminated against coloured migrants...
_	This is a cochain complex in the sense that (also written ).
_	The theory "ACF" has a "universal domain property", in the sense that every structure "N" satisfying the universal axioms of "ACF" is a substructure of a sufficiently large algebraically closed field formula_5, and additionally any two such embeddings "N" → "M" induce an automorphism of "M".
_	Money is infinitely divisible in the sense that it is based upon the real number system.
_	It is compatible with the wedge product in the sense that for differential forms "α" and "β" on "N",
_	Note the Irish word is ("cassock") but the word may be translated as coat, cloak, or even uniform, in the sense that all of these troops were uniformly attired in red.
_	When urban schools do a poor job of educating their Latino/a and Black students, this benefits Whites in the sense that it unjustly advantages them in the competition for higher levels of education and jobs.
_	Whilst usually less popular, micros are thus more important in the sense that they include a much wider span of the "tree of life" (i.e., phylogenetic diversity).
_	This occurs when the intervening act or event was actually planned, intended or foreseen by the accused, in the sense that it was a calculated part of the causal sequence.
_	Some think of mutual credit as a type of currency but this can be problematic because no currency or money is 'issued' in the sense that most people would understand it.
_	Second, Buchanan argues that Deleuze is a dialectical thinker in the sense that his philosophy has a larger purpose than that of simply creating a system of interlinked concepts.
_	A strongly negative answer to whether it was definitive arrived in September 1930 at the historic mathematical Congress of Königsberg, in which Kurt Gödel announced his first theorem of incompleteness: the usual axiomatic systems are incomplete, in the sense that they cannot prove every truth which is expressible in their language.
_	Within that context it is significant that such a track should be built during a time of nationwide double-digit unemployment, and noteworthy in the sense that it contributed to Aiken’s success as an equestrian center and “Winter Colony” during those difficult days.
_	The atmosphere of the show was very different from the usual Americans in the sense that it was extremely informal.
_	Moreover, this "O"(-1) is a universal bundle in the sense that when a line bundle "L" gives a factorization "f" = "p" ∘ "g", "L" is the pullback of "O"(-1) along "g".
_	Despite these efforts to stop Patman, his investigative course ultimately proved to be Nixon's undoing in the sense that the money trail, as reported on in the "Washington Post", helped lead to the establishment of the Ervin Senate Select Committee on Watergate in April 1973.
_	Paradoxically, the new intersection is actually more complex than the previous one, in the sense that there are now more ramps connecting the two highways than before.
_	Although not actually an 'official' memorial to the Battle of Britain in the sense that government paid for it, the window and chapel have since been viewed as such.
_	At that time, the Basilica's floor was covered with soil from Jerusalem, thus acquiring the title "in Hierusalem"; it is not dedicated to the Holy Cross which is in Jerusalem, but the Basilica itself is "in Jerusalem" in the sense that a "piece" of Jerusalem was moved to Rome for its foundation.
_	Some existing smartphones have been used as medical devices in the sense that text reminders have been sent to a patient about prescription renewals, and downloadable apps allow cameras in cell phones to act as sensors to track heart and breathing rates.
_	"After Dark" is real in the sense that what you see is what you get, which isn't the case with something that's been edited to give the illusion of being real.
_	In fact, wider research proved the original hypothesis wrong, in the sense that it is not life alone but the whole Earth system that does the regulating.
_	The two integers "a" and "b" are coprime if and only if the point with coordinates ("a", "b") in a Cartesian coordinate system is "visible" from the origin (0,0), in the sense that there is no point with integer coordinates on the line segment between the origin and ("a", "b").
_	Unity Church followers believe in the divinity of Jesus, but only in the sense that all humans are the children of God and share that divine potential.
_	The Immigration Department considers that his or her original name (in the format of 'Tai Man CHAN') is an alias, and that the newly lodged name (usually in the format of 'Peter Tai Man CHAN' or 'Tai Man Peter CHAN') is the proper name of the applicant (in the sense that such name is the 'proper name' of the applicant).
_	He took a class on versification taught by Penelope Laurans which gave him the sense that he had an "ear for verse" but his work was "less than diligent" in his own estimation.
_	The Tulu Film has no organised industry as such - in the sense that there is no comprehensive production, distribution and exhibition systems as it exists in the film industries of other Indian languages.
_	The function "F" is called computable if there is a Turing machine that computes it (in the sense that for any finite binary string "x" such that "F(x) = y" the Turing machine halts with "y" on its tape when given the input "x").
_	Stiglitz and Weiss developed a model to illustrate how credit rationing can be an "equilibrium" feature of the market, in the sense that the rationed borrower would be willing to obtain the funds at an interest rate higher than the one charged by the lender, who will not be willing to lend the extra funds, as the higher rate would imply lower expected profits.
_	For example, the two representations 0.999... and 1 are equivalent in the sense that they represent the same number.
_	The Śrauta ritual system, states Knipe, "is an extended one, in the sense that a simple domestic routine has been replaced by one far more demanding on the religious energies of the sacrificer and his wife," and is initiated by augmenting a family's single fire Grihya system to a three fire Śrauta system.
_	Girth is the dual concept to edge connectivity, in the sense that the girth of a planar graph is the edge connectivity of its dual graph, and vice versa.
_	Professor Robert Alter of the University of California, Berkeley, wrote that Moses hyperbolically expressed the sense that holding on to a monopoly of power (equated with access to God’s spirit) was not what impelled him, and pointed rather to an ideal of radical spiritual egalitarianism whereby God granted access to the spirit to anyone God chose.
_	Holi played at Barsana is unique in the sense that here women chase men away with sticks.
_	While the theorem is related to Roth's theorem, its real use lies in the fact that it is effective, in the sense that the constant "C" can be worked out for any given ξ.
_	Through contemporary cognitive science, it has been discovered that most of our thought actually is unconscious, not in the Freudian sense of being repressed, but in the sense that it operates beneath the level of cognitive awareness, inaccessible to consciousness and operating too fast to focus on.
_	He doesn't break much new ground, nor does he lend the sense that he's forcibly trying to reclaim past glory.
_	Contributing to the sense that season six was doomed, in the first sketch the cast shared a bed with Gould and introduced themselves – Charles Rocket proclaimed himself to be a cross between Chevy Chase and Bill Murray, and Gilbert Gottfried (prior to adopting his signature screechy, obnoxious voice) referred to himself as a cross between John Belushi "and that guy from last year who did Rod Serling, and no one can remember his name" (referring to Harry Shearer).
_	It is unique in the sense that it does not sound like the typical rhythmic Chinese opera.
_	Their mis-recognition in psychoanalysis (and analytical therapy), together with the ignorance of maternal Eros of com-passion leads to catastrophic blows to the matrixial daughter-mother tissue and hurts the maternal potentiality of the daughter herself, in the sense that attacking the "non-I" is always also attacking the "I" that dwells inside an "I"-and-"non-I" trans-subjective matrixial (feminine-maternal) tissue.
_	The notion of solid modeling as practised today relies on the specific need for informational completeness in mechanical geometric modeling systems, in the sense that any computer model should support all geometric queries that may be asked of its corresponding physical object.
_	Addams's autobiographical persona manifests her ideology and supports her popularized public activist persona as the "Mother of Social Work," in the sense that she represents herself as a celibate matron, who served the suffering immigrant masses through Hull-House, as if they were her own children.
_	Instead, the theorem states that approximates in the sense that the relative error of this approximation approaches 0 as increases without bound.
_	The expected value operator formula_27 is linear in the sense that
_	Only a few weeks of shooting, but he works both fast and slow, in the sense that there are a lot of takes.
_	David Farren, an environmental lawyer, argued that the Carolina Bays Parkway was a "developer's road" in the sense that it encouraged more "fringe" growth rather than allay current traffic problems.
_	In the sense that it is awarded to a student on completion of a project, the medal is analogous to the RIBA President's Medals Students Award, but is not as prestigious.
_	This means that a linear operator preserves vector space operations, in the sense that it does not matter whether you apply the linear operator before or after the operations of addition and scalar multiplication.
_	This function is universal in the sense that it is partial computable, and for any partial computable function "f" there is an "e" such that, for all "x", "f"("x") = Ψ("e","x"), where the equality means that either both sides are undefined or both are defined and are equal.
_	In one sense this is a sideshow, a digression from the main line of the narrative, which is concerned with the crowd only as an abstract force; in another, however, it brings to the fore the sense that it is only through these social clichés that the crowd can be made humanly understandable.
_	According to music blog Indie Shuffle, ""Howl" gives the listener the sense that the band has not only matured with their songwriting, but have understood how to take ownership of a sound that is singularly theirs while uniquely Chicago."
_	in the sense that this is a nonnegative-definite matrix.
_	Though not revealed in volumes 1 - 6, the reader has the sense that he has known Bun-nyuh's family for quite some time.
_	There is the sense that he has served one human in particular, Bun-nyuh, for centuries.
_	The detection is heterodyne in the sense that the scattered field of the probe beam by the thermal lens interferes in the backwards direction with a well-defined retroreflected part of the incidence probing beam.
_	It is a limitation in that a large part of one's facticity consists of things one couldn't have chosen (birthplace, etc.), but a condition of freedom in the sense that one's values most likely depend on it.
_	If a non-Jew wishes to become a Jew, in the sense that they practice Judaism and thus are accepted as a Jew, they are, depending on the Jewish religious tradition, typically welcome.
_	A related mental arrow arises because one has the sense that one's perception is a continuous movement from the known (past) to the unknown (future).
_	The company is unique in the sense that it does not solely rely on advertisements to survive as it also has a line of apparel.
_	The "T" predicate is primitive recursive in the sense that there is a primitive recursive function that, given inputs for the predicate, correctly determine the truth value of the predicate on those inputs.
_	Proponents claim that it is not essentially different from traditional national currencies in the sense that both types of money are in digital form.
_	The drawings are made as accurately as possible in the sense that they include every detail of people's everyday existence, such as clutter, rubbish and graffiti: features of the present environment.
_	The University of Oxford is a "public university" in the sense that it receives some public money from the government, but it is a "private university" in the sense that it is entirely self-governing and, in theory, could choose to become entirely private by rejecting public funds.
_	It is a flexible arrangement in the sense that subsequent questions an be tailored to clarify earlier answers.
_	Some of the networks commonly referred to as "anonymous P2P" are truly anonymous, in the sense that network nodes carry no identifiers.
_	As for open formulas, dependence logic corresponds to the downwards monotone fragment of existential second-order logic, in the sense that a nonempty class of teams is definable by a dependence logic formula if and only if the corresponding class of relations is downwards monotone and definable by an existential second-order formula.
_	Group schemes arise naturally as symmetries of schemes, and they generalize algebraic groups, in the sense that all algebraic groups have group scheme structure, but group schemes are not necessarily connected, smooth, or defined over a field.
_	This was a sort of union in the modern understanding of the word, in the sense that it was a social club, an organisation militating for workers’ rights, a school of adult education, and a political party all in one.
_	The Caroni itself and its tributary the Paragua are rivers with a "staircase", in the sense that many falls and rapids are alternated with stretches with gentle slopes, with many meanders and oxbow lakes (naturally cut off meanders).
_	"He was of the faith chiefly in the sense that the church he currently did not attend was Catholic" (Kingsley Amis, "One Fat Englishman" (1963), chapter 8).
_	Aristotle accepted the past as fixed, in the sense that past events were irrevocable.
_	If one considers the possibility that a positive and a negative pion are virtually related in the sense that they can annihilate and transform into a pair of two neutral pions (or two photons), i.e. a pair of identical particles, we are faced with a more complex situation, which has to be handled within the second quantisation approach.
_	LaFerrari literally means "The Ferrari" in Italian and in some other Romance languages, in this context in the sense that it is the "definitive" Ferrari.
_	However, it is unique in the sense that the new platforms designed to accommodate new PNR diesel multiple units are not connected to the station's original platforms, unlike solutions employed at stations such as España, where the new platforms are directly connected to the original ones.
_	While the EU is a superpower in the sense that it is the largest political union, single market and aid donor in the world, it is not a superpower in the defense or foreign policy spheres.
_	This can reduce blood pH. Glycolysis coupled with lactate production is neutral in the sense that it does not produce excess hydrogen cations; however, pyruvate production does produce them.
_	The dreaming portion has experiences and therefore has primary consciousness, while the waking self recognizes the dreaming and can be seen as having a sort of secondary consciousness in the sense that there is an awareness of mental state.
_	Apparently, the commandments assumed that it was their right to approve locations on unoccupied land, and they could have interpreted the miles of hunting land around the villages as unoccupied in the sense that other land in the district used by Americans for hunting was considered unoccupied.
_	But, the interdiscourse has also primacy in the sense that it "defines the relations between discursive entities (or formations) that are constitutive of the discursive entities".
_	In 1990, Ainsworth put in print her blessing for the new ‘D’ classification, though she urged that the addition be regarded as ‘open-ended, in the sense that subcategories may be distinguished’, as she worried that the D classification might be too encompassing and might subsume too many different forms of behaviour
_	This is true in the sense that it is the oldest rugby-playing club in Germany but other clubs have an older rugby department.
_	"The Monthly" critic Luke Davies accepted the film as a fun romp, comparing it to Will Ferrell's previous movies "" and "" and wrote positively of Ferrell's performance, describing that "there is a parodic exhilaration to everything Ferrell does; there's always the sense that any scene is precariously close to being a blooper reel."
_	where exp(κ) = "κ" and inductively exp(κ)=2. This is sharp in the sense that exp(κ) cannot be replaced by exp(κ) on the left hand side.
_	There is a cultural dominance in the sense that each one believes they know what is best for the crew members aboard the ship.
_	It is a matter of a shift mechanism, a “pitch-shift”, in the sense that the frequencies of the modes are all multiplied by a common factor, therefore leaving unchanged their relationships.
_	Diners differ from restaurants in the sense that they were set up as prefabricated buildings, mostly manufactured from aluminum or stainless steel.
_	Smith said that the miniseries format permitted "a stronger sense of focus ... with every episode giving the sense that the story is building to a larger conclusion".
_	This was the first high-speed rail project—in the sense that "high-speed" is now used—to be commenced in Europe.
_	A linear belief function is a special type of belief function in the sense that its focal elements are exclusive, parallel sub-hyperplanes over the certainty hyperplane and its mass function is a normal distribution across the sub-hyperplanes.
_	This is an exhibition of contemporary art, not in the sense that it was done recently, but in that it is cased in the mentality, technology and philosophy of radical art of the most recent times.
_	Furthermore, distributions are "locally determined" in the sense that a distribution on all of "U" can be assembled from a distribution on an open cover of "U" satisfying some compatibility conditions on the overlap.
_	Measured in terms of the number of single-agent encryptions, the algorithm in [GOL05] is optimal when no collisions occur, in the sense that any protocol that is fair to every player must perform at least as many encryption operations.
_	Optimal feedback control is related to UCM theory in the sense that the optimal control law may not act along certain dimensions (the UCM) of lesser importance to the nervous system.
_	The SRB system is middleware in the sense that it is built on top of other major software packages (various storage systems, real-time data sources, a relational database management system, etc.) and it has callable library functions that can be utilized by higher level software.
_	His personal philosophy is highly influenced by the teachings of the Sikh religion, particularly in the sense that one should always set aside a percentage of time, effort and money to do “God’s work."
_	With respect to agreeableness, for example, the authors hypothesized that, relative to those high in agreeableness, less agreeable employees do not have natural inclinations for tolerance and empathy, and therefore "need other incentives to motivate helping such as the sense that relationship partners are trustworthy"(p. 1290).
_	Personas are useful in the sense that they create a common shared understanding of the user group for which the design process is built around.
_	One is the thin line between visibility and invisibility, the other is the sense that the pursuit of the officer is both relentless and inescapable.
_	Unemployment is argued to be "beneficial" to the people who are not unemployed in the sense that it averts inflation, which itself has damaging effects, by providing (in Marxian terms) a reserve army of labour, that keeps wages in check.
_	The final article of the constitution declared that it was intended to be a provisional document, in the sense that it was subject to amendment.
_	The geometric mean is also the arithmetic-harmonic mean in the sense that if two sequences (formula_18) and (formula_19) are defined:
_	In this case, the linear map described by is the best linear approximation of near the point , in the sense that
_	The Australian celebrity photographer Pedro Virgil who had taken the photos of the players defended his work saying about the calendar: "It is provocative in the sense that the guys are naked... but in this case it is tasteful," he said.
_	Short range entangled states are trivial in the sense that they all belong to one phase.
_	Harp singers often "add dots" to their music, in the sense that they will make the notes falling on the strong musical beat about one and a half times as long as written, with the following note shortened to half of its written duration in compensation.
_	He has been lucky in the sense that he has never had a long break from skiing due to serious injuries.
_	Her presence in the exhibition space is considered as performance, even if she does not make a performance in the sense that she is directly involved in the process of the artwork, but her continuous blending into the viewers' attendance gives the impression of a performance.
_	When asked about the film's genre, Gilroy stated: "I see "Nightcrawler" as having genre elements in the sense that it’s a thriller.
_	We use language “semi-automatically”, in the sense that speakers and writers make semi-conscious choices within the various complex overlapping systems of which language is composed, including those of transitivity, modality (Michael Halliday 1994), lexical sets (e.g. "freedom", "liberty", "deliverance"), modification, and so on.
_	Thus, the Cantor set is a homogeneous space in the sense that for any two points formula_34 and formula_35 in the Cantor set formula_1, there exists a homeomorphism formula_37 with formula_38.
_	The baserri is designed to be modular in the sense that additional wings can be added onto the primary structure to allow the building to be extended if necessary.
_	This is a horror story in the sense that it violates a Christian taboo.
_	Justice Rumpff stated: "On all the evidence presented to this court and on our findings of fact, it is impossible for this court to come to the conclusion that the African National Congress has acquired or adopted a policy to overthrow the state by violence, that is, in the sense that the masses had to be prepared or conditioned to commit direct acts of violence against the state."
_	Rather such a reservation will be generally be severable, in the sense that the covenant will be operative for the reserving party without benefit of the reservation.
_	They were similar in the sense that they were the only ones with a cultural presence and objects around whom German society's grand narrative was being built, thus Rommel was the only German general who would have been capable of challenging Hitler's rule, had he ever crossed the Rubicon from his "apolitical-to-the-core" military world and developed a serious, critical view of Hitler's political dealings.
_	These simple transplantation methods follow from earlier observations by developmental biologists that germ stem cells are autonomous in the sense that they can begin the processes to become both sperm and eggs.
_	This function is then harmonic in the sense that it satisfies the mean-value property with respect to a measure on the Möbius group induced from the usual Lebesgue measure of the disc, suitably normalized.
_	Nevertheless, it was different from the albums of the genre in the sense that it incorporated the "space traveling" concept and included melodic love songs connected with it.
_	An Ehresmann connection on "E" is a smooth subbundle "H" of "TE", called the horizontal bundle of the connection, which is complementary to "V", in the sense that it defines a direct sum decomposition "TE" = "H"⊕"V" .
_	The variance of the mean, 1/"N" (the square of the standard error) is equal to the reciprocal of the Fisher information from the sample and thus, by the Cramér–Rao inequality, the sample mean is efficient in the sense that its efficiency is unity (100%).
_	Equivalently, we may assume that Home has a comparative advantage in cloth in the sense that it has a lower opportunity cost for cloth in terms of wine than Foreign:
_	For sufficiently large "m" the pair of planes are essentially uncorrelated, in the sense that the uncertainty in their relative positions is so large that it is comparable to the lattice spacing, "a".
_	The universe was "predicative" in the sense that the dependent product of a family of objects from V over an object that was not in V such as, for example, V itself, was not assumed to be in V.
_	The operator "S" is a compression of "T", in the sense that
_	In fact, it will be shown below that puzzles forming a time reversal symmetry pair are interdependent one on the other, in the sense that the solving algorithm of one makes use of the solving algorithm of the other.
_	This is an appropriate title for a student at the Technical University of Delft, in the sense that they are known for their wide knowledge of different kinds of sciences.
_	This sense of homesickness is not necessarily rooted in a sense of being away from home, but in the sense that even at home, the protagonists are still searching for their place within the day-to-day world.
_	Both in this sense – and in the sense that social rules are never learned identically and undergo different rates of adaptation and change over time – the concept of rule, and of culture generally, is distributive.  – making the patterns understandable and meaningful for those sharing in the rule knowledge.
_	Furthermore, her family is dysfunctional in the sense that her father, Russell (Robert Wisden) is unable to exhibit his emotions and Dawn's brother often hurls emotional abuse at his sister.
_	A fuzzy number is a generalization of a regular, real number in the sense that it does not refer to one single value but rather to a connected set of possible values, where each possible value has its own weight between 0 and 1.
_	The new garments are performance enhancing, in the sense that they allow wearers to carry out everyday activities easily.
_	AdaBoost is adaptive in the sense that subsequent weak learners are tweaked in favor of those instances misclassified by previous classifiers.
_	The extracts below are from later legal codes and textbooks, but are also valuable in the sense that they are based on, and frequently quote from, the actual text of Augustus' laws.
_	This mechanism is truthful in the sense that the optimal strategy for a bidder is to accept down to its true cost.
_	In mathematics, especially in abstract algebra, a quasigroup is an algebraic structure resembling a group in the sense that "division" is always possible.
_	Cyberbullying presents unique challenges in the sense that the perpetrator can attempt to be anonymous, and attacks can happen at any time of day or night.
_	Prices of consumer goods, in particular, were now considered free in the sense that negotiation became possible between producers and the distributor.
_	The triple-burning candle on his groin evokes the sense that sexuality continues even in sickness/otherness.
_	These three types are usually under the assumption that complete information is available in the sense that the probability distributions of the random variables involved are known in advance.
_	Having found that his detention for the entire period was unlawful, in the sense that section 12(1)(a) of the Constitution was unjustifiably and unreasonably violated, the question now arose:
_	Many of these individuals are Jewish only in the sense that their parents or grandparents happen to be Jews.
_	T-duality states that a string propagating around a circle of radius is equivalent to a string propagating around a circle of radius in the sense that all observable quantities in one description are identified with quantities in the dual description.
_	Totally cyclic orientations are dual to acyclic orientations (orientations that turn into a directed acyclic graph) in the sense that, if is a planar graph, and orientations of are transferred to orientations of the planar dual graph of by turning each edge 90 degrees clockwise, then a totally cyclic orientation of corresponds in this way to an acyclic orientation of the dual graph and vice versa.
_	According to a column published in "The Clinic", the New Right is different from the old dictatorial right of Augusto Pinochet, in the sense that it embraces democracy.
_	For him, since such Muslims as had not accepted one appointed by God ("ma'mur minallah") within Islam were neither deniers of God nor Muhammad, they were still part of the Muslim community and were Muslims only in the sense that they belonged to the "Ummah" of Muhammad and as such were entitled to be treated as members of Muslim society ("mu'ashira"), which, according to him, was different from saying that they are Muslims and not "kafirs".
_	He held, therefore, that non-Ahmadi Muslims were to be classified as disbelievers albeit within the remit of Islam and not in the sense that they had a religion other than Islam; and, further, that the movement passed no judgement as to their fate in the hereafter and never proactively expressed this opinion of them.
_	A standard result about the labelled semantics is that it agrees with the reduction semantics in the sense that
_	Halin graphs are not necessarily pancyclic, but they are almost pancyclic in the sense that there is at most one missing cycle length.
_	Oscar's Grind is the same as Martingale-based and Labouchère system in the sense that if you have an infinite amount to wager and time, every session will make a profit.
_	The protocol is "asynchronous" in the sense that requests do not have to wait for synchronized replies or ACKs, avoiding round-trip delay time and achieving improved performance.
_	Planned development differs from natural development, in the sense that it is a program sponsored by the government to accelerate the development process.
_	The education that Christians receive has differed in kind from that of Muslims in the sense that many more children of Christian parents have attended Western-oriented foreign and private schools.
_	Michael Packenham, writing in "The Baltimore Sun", described him as "a magnificent stand-up comedian ... Buckley's work, his very presence, projected the sense that life's most immortal truths lie in the inextricable weaving together of love and irony -- affection for all humanity married to laughter."
_	More generally, the FVU will be 1 if the explanatory variables "X" tell us nothing about "Y" in the sense that the predicted values of "Y" do not covary with "Y".
_	The Kontsevich invariant is a universal quantum invariant in the sense that any quantum invariant may be recovered by substituting the appropriate weight system into any Jacobi diagram.
_	Cooke then said, "Nor is it in dispute that, if the meaning of the statutory language is sufficiently clear, the New Zealand Parliament can make a person compellable to answer questions on certain subjects from an official - again in the sense that a refusal to answer may result in penalties."
_	Christopher Orr of "The Atlantic" said, "It's difficult to shake the sense that the film was assembled hurriedly and somewhat haphazardly.
_	Overall, the fact that mosques contained medreses comes to show the relevance of education to religion in the sense that education took place within the framework of religion and religion established social life by trying to create a common religious orthodoxy.
_	In group theory, an inverse semigroup (occasionally called an inversion semigroup) "S" is a semigroup in which every element "x" in "S" has a unique "inverse" "y" in "S" in the sense that "x = xyx" and "y = yxy", i.e. a regular semigroup in which every element has a unique inverse.
_	Superdelegates are "unpledged" in the sense that they themselves decide which candidate to support.
_	While reviewing "The Tree of Life", "New York Times" critic A. O. Scott compared the director to innovative "homegrown romantics" such as the writers Walt Whitman, Hart Crane, James Agee, and Herman Melville, in the sense that their "definitive writings" also "did not sit comfortably or find universal favor in their own time" but nonetheless "leaned perpetually into the future, pushing their readers forward toward a new horizon of understanding".
_	The 2004 exhibition "The Subject of Palestine," which Halaby curated for the DePaul Art Museum, was described by the Chicago Tribune as presenting "the work of 16 contemporary Palestinian artists that even the least informed of viewers are likely to come away with the sense that they have seen and grasped something important."
_	A valuation (as defined in domain theory/measure theory) is said to be continuous if for "every directed family" formula_4 "of open sets" (i.e. an indexed family of open sets which is also directed in the sense that for each pair of indexes formula_5 and formula_6 belonging to the index set formula_7, there exists an index formula_8 such that formula_9 and formula_10) the following equality holds:
_	is equivalent to the dependence logic sentence formula_156, in the sense that the former expression is true in a model if and only if the latter expression is true.
_	This quest for honor was a major cause of the war in the sense that most Americans who were not involved in mercantile interests or threatened by Indian attack strongly endorsed the preservation of national honor.
_	This is a schema in the sense that formula_146 can be instantiated with any formula formula_147 containing zero or more instances of a variable formula_111.
_	They are similar to the New York Yankees in the sense that they have fans all over the country, being a sure sellout in any stadium, also hated by many outside the capital.
_	This creek is historic in the sense that it flows through the campus of UPLB.
_	The last "P" in the word "SPIP" stands for both "Partagé" (shared) and "Participatif" (participative), in the sense that the software is designed for collective online editing.
_	Thus, by maximizing the entropy over a suitable set of probability distributions on "X", one finds the distribution that is least informative in the sense that it contains the least amount of information consistent with the constraints that define the set.
_	They are phases in the sense that, during a specific time he painted primarily that category of painting, though not to the exclusion of all else.
_	But they are "categories" in the sense that, throughout his career, he has produced works that have characteristics of any of the different classifications or will revisit any past phase.
_	The stone walls were also no longer continuous, so as not to create the sense that the memorial was walled off from the surrounding area.
_	It is the simplest of the four methods in the sense that it produces an interest rate approximating if not exactly equal the expected rate.
_	Had the approach been more humorous or satirical, without necessarily sacrificing the sense that these characters believe it all — in the manner of "Melvin and Howard", for example — it might be more palatable."
_	This can also form a turning point in the sense that through such projects all members of the participating universities will be affected.
_	In chemical thermodynamics, activity (symbol ) is a measure of the "effective concentration" of a species in a mixture, in the sense that the species' chemical potential depends on the activity of a real solution in the same way that it would depend on concentration for an ideal solution.
_	Brahman is Nirguna in the sense that impure qualities do not touch it.
_	The level of development of society’s productive forces (i.e., society’s technological powers, including tools, machinery, raw materials, and labour power) determines society’s economic structure, in the sense that it selects a structure of economic relations that tends best to facilitate further technological growth.
_	Speaking at the general public in the United States Aziz explained Pakistan's nuclear arsenal policy: our (atomic) program is entirely deterrent in nature, in the sense that if India—we have to have enough parity to defend ourselves.
_	The fundamental components of protein are nitrogen-containing amino acids, some of which are essential in the sense that humans cannot make them internally.
_	The group of homeomorphisms of the Hilbert cube [0,1] is a universal Polish group, in the sense that every Polish group is isomorphic to a closed subgroup of it.
_	The camera matrix derived here may appear trivial in the sense that it contains very few non-zero elements.
_	'Indubitable' beliefs remain fallible, however, in the sense that later inquiry might give us cause to doubt them.
_	In a set of rules, an inference rule could be redundant in the sense that it is "admissible" or "derivable".
_	Conversion of the West and East Germanic tribes took place "top to bottom", in the sense that missionaries aimed at converting Germanic nobility first, which would then impose their new faith on the general population
_	His parents disapproved of the idea, Zemeckis later said, "But only in the sense that they were concerned... for my family and my friends and the world that I grew up in, this was the kind of dream that really was impossible.
_	Interpolation studies the family of spaces that are intermediate spaces between and in the sense that
_	All versions of the specification remain valid, in the sense that DNG files conforming to old versions should still be read and processed by DNG readers capable of processing later versions.
_	This was a major achievement in the sense that for the first time in Turkish football history,a town team (other than that of Istanbul, Ankara and Izmir) was promoted to the Turkish Premier Division.
_	The "Guardian" review said that "Lodge's novel boils down neatly into an intellectually and erotically charged dialogue on the nature of the mind", yet felt that "Lodge cannot quite eradicate the sense that some of the cerebral jousting has a more natural home in a novel than on stage".
_	Both conferences also had "exclusive agreements" with the Rose Bowl game, in the sense that member schools were not allowed to play in any other bowl game.
_	In more technical terms, we can say that the dependency relation between the "gap" (the canonical, empty position) and its "filler" (the wh-expression) is unbounded in the sense that there is no upper bound on how deeply embedded within the given sentence the gap may appear.
_	Thus, there is the sense that these architects could not carry out their sincere visions to help the Soviet people because of unrelenting bureaucracy, whether it be national or local.
_	The play has the true fierceness of dream logic - the sense that you are watching events that unfold that are both unpredictable and ineluctable.
_	Mateus Nogueira, his companion, agrees and upholds this characterization by stating that these natives are worse than all others in the sense that they do not grasp Christianity.
_	These numbers are analogues in the sense that
_	Jane Chance, however, considers the book to be a children's novel only in the sense that it appeals to the child in an adult reader.
_	SML modules provide not only namespace control but also abstraction, in the sense that they allow programmers to define abstract data types.
_	These are "open" classes, in the sense that they readily accept new members, by coinage, borrowing, or compounding.
_	is an orthogonal decomposition in the sense that
_	Jason Powell of "Pro Wrestling Dot Net" commented that Rhodes choosing to leave was "surprising in the sense that Cody and his family have worked for WWE for so long".
_	Furthermore, the inequality is rigid in the sense that if the first Dirichlet eigenvalue is equal to that of the corresponding ball, then the domain must actually be a ball.
_	Typically, the Higgs boson is "unnatural" in the sense that quantum mechanical fluctuations produce corrections to its mass that lift it to such high values that it cannot play the role for which it was introduced.
_	But, as Doble reminds us, 'Legend is history, in the sense that the legends and traditions of a people are part of its history.
_	Because of this they are called the "chosen people" by virtue of being "sons of Israel"; that is, the biological male descendants of Israel, who is referred to as their "father" in the sense that he is their lineal male ancestor.
_	Additionally, Pinsky revealed in a 1999 interview with "Bomb Magazine" that he enjoys jazz for its "physical immediacy, improvisation and also the sense that a lifetime of suffering and study and thought and emotion is behind some single phrase."
_	The performance of Lorde was well received by media outlets, with "Billboard" picked it as the fifth best performance of the festival, while "Rolling Stone" deemed it the best part of Lollapalooza in Chicago, writing, "She danced like she was trying to fling her arms off her body, but just as with her voice, the sense that she was in absolute possession of her abilities never waned.
_	Most of the DJs and live musicians who play at Chillits could be considered amateur, in the sense that they do not attempt to make a living from playing music but instead donate their time and services.
_	Therefore, in the sense that all the prophets of God are united in the same 'Cause of God', having the same underlying message, and all 'abiding in the same tabernacle, soaring in the same heaven, seated upon the same throne, uttering the same speech, and proclaiming the same Faith', they can all claim to be 'the return of all the Prophets'.
_	In pedagogic terms, the program became transformation geometry, a mixed blessing in the sense that it builds on stronger intuitions than the style of Euclid, but is less easily converted into a logical system.
_	It is however an analog to cocaine in the sense that it functions as a partial DARI on DAT, although doing so when said DAT is compromised by amphetamine-type mediated release of DA.
_	This composition by Rajaji is one of its kind, in the sense that the author does not elicit any favour from God but only maintains that he has no regrets or dissatisfaction about anything in life.
_	John Addiego of "Northwest Review" extaled, “Throughout Cervantes’ book there is the sense that an enormous but generally neglected audience being addressed.
_	This leads Galileo to conclude that a belief in atoms, in the sense that matter is "composed of infinitely many unquantifiable atoms" is sufficient to solve the problem of the wheel.
_	T differed from race O in the sense that it produced T-toxin (host-selective toxin).
_	The table also is periodic in the sense that the group of invariants in formula_46 dimensions is the same as the group of invariants in formula_70 dimensions.
_	According to Sapolsky, humans are somewhat in the middle of this spectrum, in the sense that humans form pair bonds, but there is the possibility of cheating or changing partners.
_	In particular, heated scholarly debate has focused on this text's discussion at 1.43-44 of how the Epicurean gods may be said to "exist"; David Sedley, for example, holds that Epicureans, as represented in this text and elsewhere, think that "gods are our own graphic idealization of the life to which we aspire", whereas David Konstan maintains that "the Epicurean gods are real, in the sense that they exist as atomic compounds and possess the properties that pertain to the concept, or prolēpsis, that people have of them."
_	This is a projection, in the sense that the Euclidean distance to the constraint is minimized, because (i) the discrete Fourier transform, as a unitary transformation, preserves distance, and (ii) rescaling the modulus (without modifying the phase) is the smallest change that realizes the modulus constraint.
_	We kind of got lucky with "Mary's Prayer", in the sense that it just happened to fit, whereas the records were pretty eclectic.
_	The Talmud entertains the notion that the Kohanim are "different" from the nation of Israel in the sense that they are called "Children of Knowledge" (Bnei Deah), with the Kohen possessing an ability to instruct Torah even in his stage of youth.
_	Manson also explained that the acoustic songs were "acoustic" in the sense that they were not recorded with electronic instruments, but he said the album's sonic landscape would be "intrinsically electronic".
_	It differs from a bar graph, in the sense that a bar graph relates two variables, but a histogram relates only one.
_	It can be categorized as a work of historical fiction in that it relates a time when the author was only a child, and also in the sense that the particulars of that time and place are carefully delineated.
_	Goodman considers Sombra to be "evil in the sense that she's kind of only out for herself", but will stay loyal to her employer, Talon, as well as the situation continues to work out for her and further her own agendas.
_	It is unincorporated in the sense that Senate Properties is "not" a legal person separate from the State, and compared to incorporated companies, the organization has limited jurisdiction over its activities.
_	Li's findings show that an ethnoburb can be culturally positive in the sense that it allows for more opportunities than.a
_	I mean, I'm really proud of it because that's really one that goes over-the-top in the sense that it's got images - it has religious imagery of resurrection, it's got images of fertility and rebirth, it has really very good sexual images, images of cars - which I always like.
_	So only in November 1785 there was movement in the sense that the two Holland members of the commission, the pensionaries Zeebergh and van Berckel moved in the States of Holland that the officers whose conduct had been criticized by the commission should be brought before the proper Admiralty courts to be tried.
_	There are several theories of epistemology which could arguably be said to be pessimistic in the sense that they consider it difficult or even impossible to obtain knowledge about the world.
_	In conversations held during the final year of his life with the historian Merker nevertheless insisted that he did not participate in the central policy decisions; from 1948 he had the sense that he had no future within the party leadership.
_	In the mathematical field of differential geometry, a calibrated manifold is a Riemannian manifold ("M","g") of dimension "n" equipped with a differential "p"-form "φ" (for some 0 ≤ "p" ≤ "n") which is a calibration in the sense that
_	A keyer differs from a keyboard in the sense that it lacks a traditional "board"; the keys are arranged in a cluster which is often held in the hand.
_	The Barracuda Blade, which acts similar to the spins swords in the sense that it can also utilize Samurai disks.
_	Models developed according to the HJM framework are different from the so-called short-rate models in the sense that HJM-type models capture the full dynamics of the entire forward rate curve, while the short-rate models only capture the dynamics of a point on the curve (the short rate).
_	In the introduction, we mentioned that the truncated Karhunen–Loeve expansion was the best approximation of the original process in the sense that it reduces the total mean-square error resulting of its truncation.
_	Buhs maintains that Bigfoot does not actually inhabit the forests, but, is "real" in the sense that the stories told about the creature are "part of the American cultural landscape".
_	These methods are also more robust in the sense that they can be more easily adapted to deal with a variety of side constraints.
_	After the release of his debut solo album "Justified" in 2002, Timberlake thought he "lost his voice" in the sense that he did not like what he was doing.
_	Genes interact in the sense that they affect each other's function.
_	It’s a multicultural community in the sense that a lot of cultures live there, but there’s a difference between tolerance and acceptance.
_	Before films were even narrative forms in the sense that they are recognized today, industrial concerns funded the making of what film scholar Tom Gunning described as "cinematic attractions", short films of one or two minutes.
_	Even earlier, at one year of age, infants have some rudiments of empathy, in the sense that they understand that, just like their own actions, other people's actions have goals.
_	The light emerging from the mica was ""de"polarized" in the sense that there was no orientation of the calcite that made one image disappear; yet it was not ordinary (""un"polarized") light, for which the two images would be of the same color.
_	In music, certain music keyboards can be considered displacement receivers in the sense that they respond to displacement, rather than velocity (as is more commonly the case).
_	In the set theoretic axiomatization of an antimatroid there are certain special sets called "paths" that determine the whole antimatroid, in the sense that the sets of the antimatroid are exactly the unions of paths.
_	His understanding of dementia was a traditional and distinctly non-modern one in the sense that he did not conceptualise it as irreversible state.
_	I don’t know that it’s doing for me what it used to, in the sense that Jack’s sort of really represented a freedom from something.
_	deference can be inapplicable for only three reasons: (1) the statute is unambiguous, so there is no room for administrative interpretation; (2) no interpretation has been made by personnel of the agency responsible for administering the statute; or (3) the interpretation made by such personnel was not authoritative, in the sense that it does not represent the official position of the expert agency.
_	Additionally, the film's happy ending feels resolute in the sense that all of the plot's problems are solved.
_	ML translation is one-to-many in the sense that a single OPM element (entity or link) usually translates to several SysML elements that belong in different SysML diagram types.
_	Thus, backdating can be misleading to shareholders in the sense that it results in option grants that are more favorable than the shareholders approved in adopting the stock option plan.
_	Suppose that the sequence converges pointwise to a function "f" and is dominated by some integrable function "g" in the sense that
_	The Taylor polynomial is the unique "asymptotic best fit" polynomial in the sense that if there exists a function and a "k"-th order polynomial "p" such that
_	Scars are unexpected in the sense that stationary classical distributions at the same energy are completely uniform in space with no special concentrations along periodic orbits, and quantum chaos theory of energy spectra gave no hint of their existence.
_	Its cohomology class is, up to a real constant factor, the first Chern class of the canonical bundle, and is therefore a topological invariant of (for compact ) in the sense that it depends only on the topology of and the homotopy class of the complex structure.
_	A curvature collineation (often abbreviated to CC) is vector field which preserves the Riemann tensor in the sense that,
_	Several well-known cubics (e.g., Thompson cubic, Darboux cubic, Neuberg cubic) are self-isogonal-conjugate, in the sense that if "X" is on the cubic, then "X" is also on the cubic.
_	By 1908 the term was starting to be applied to politics, in the sense that crossing the floor in a vote was "spilling the beans".
_	He went on to say "This is not just another police operation in the sense that one of the detained, Francisco Javier López Peña, is in all likelihood at this moment the person with most political and military weight in the terrorist group ETA."
_	However, switches to selfing in annuals may result in an "evolutionary dead end," in the sense that it is probably unlikely to return to an outcrossing (allogamous) state.
_	Pelt (Bestiary) – “I have often had the sense that technology is naked, that it has drifted from its animal roots.
_	It gave you the sense that there's no bottom line any more in anyone's behavior."
_	In short, an exact cover is "exact" in the sense that each element in "X" is contained in "exactly one" subset in formula_2.
_	As mentioned above, the concept had occupied a central position in the metaphysics of Leibniz, and is closely related to his monad in the sense that each sentient entity contains its own entire universe within it.
_	Robert O. Gjerdingen sees a change in Wanhal's style as he redirected his attention towards the middle class, his music becoming didactic in the sense that it employed musical figures in a clear and self-referential manner, rather than the seamless continuity from figure to figure that had characterized his earlier pieces.
_	On 1 October 1913, Count Szapáry was appointed as ambassador at St. Petersburg which was significant in the sense that he was considered a Russophobe and was far less willing to accommodate the Russians than his predecessor had been.
_	"I got the sense that a lawyer could do good things for folk and was important to our community.
_	The overall algorithm used should be secure in the sense that there should be no known way of taking a shortcut that would make it possible to calculate the enhanced key with less processor work than by using the key stretching algorithm itself.
_	This situation can exist in a formal capacity, such as in the United Arab Emirates (in which seven historically independent Emirates now serve as constituent states of a federation, the President of which is chosen from among the Emirs), or in a more informal one, in which theoretically independent territories are in feudal suzerainty to stronger neighbors or foreign powers (the position of the princely states in India under the British Raj), and thus can be said to lack sovereignty in the sense that they cannot, for practical purposes, conduct their affairs of state unhampered.
_	Katz's definition of a "p"-adic modular form is similar, except that "E" is now an elliptic curve over some algebra "R" (with "p" nilpotent) over the ring of integers "R" of a finite extension of the "p"-adic numbers, such that "E" is not supersingular, in the sense that the Eisenstein series "E" is invertible at ("E",ω).
_	The idea of the conceptual that I mean to be invoking is to be understood in close connection with the idea of rationality, in the sense that is in play in the traditional separation of mature human beings, as rational animals, from the rest of the animal kingdom.
_	Virtually all of the information was new, in the sense that it hadn’t appeared in the dozens of books which had been written about the RAF, new too were the many photographs that were just a selection of the thousands he collected and commissioned.
_	The Oachira Temple is unique in the sense that it does not have covered structures for temples.
_	According to Robert C. Cooper, the essence of the story is "that sort of fear and terror of a tragedy combined with the sense that there is hope for us in the basic ways in which human beings survive".
_	In the midst of this morally ambiguous and complex universe, Mercy gets the sense that she has a larger role to play.
_	The Dedekind–MacNeille completion is the smallest complete lattice with embedded in it, in the sense that, if is any lattice completion of , then the Dedekind–MacNeille completion is a partially ordered subset of .
_	The epignetic clock method applies to all examined racial/ethnic groups in the sense that DNAm age is highly correlated with chronological age.
_	In many civil law countries, prosecutors are trained and employed as part of the judiciary; they are law-trained jurists, but may not necessarily be lawyers in the sense that the word is used in the common law world.
_	It has been seen as an "equalizing principle" in the sense that most other people have the same status.
_	This is the sense that Balducci catches in various cultural itineraries: the structuralism of Claude Lévi-Strauss, the "ecology of mind" of Gregory Bateson, the generative grammar of Noam Chomsky.
_	However Taleb has also stated that considering the power law as a model instead of a model with lighter tails (e.g., a Gaussian) “converts black swans into gray ones”, in the sense that the power law model gives non-negligible probability to large events.
_	Gaelic sports at all levels are amateur, in the sense that the athletes even those playing at elite level do not receive payment for their performance
_	Rhodesia had limited democracy in the sense that it had the Westminster parliamentary system with multiple political parties contesting the seats in parliament, but as the voting was dominated by the White settler minority, and Black Africans only had a minority level of representation at that time, it was regarded internationally as a racist country.
_	When longitudinal studies are observational, in the sense that they observe the state of the world without manipulating it, it has been argued that they may have less power to detect causal relationships than experiments.
_	New Holland was a "railway village" in the sense that Crewe was a railway town.
_	Formally, the "right Kan extension of formula_3 along formula_4" consists of a functor formula_13 and a natural transformation formula_14 which is couniversal with respect to the specification, in the sense that for any functor formula_15 and natural transformation formula_16, a unique natural transformation formula_17 is defined and fits into a commutative diagram
_	They are vase-shaped, in the sense that they are biconical.
_	String theories are quantum theories of gravity in the sense that they reduce to classical general relativity plus field theory at low energies, but are fully quantum mechanical, contain a graviton, and are thought to be mathematically consistent.
_	Balance, equilibrioception, or vestibular sense is the sense that allows an organism to sense body movement, direction, and acceleration, and to attain and maintain postural equilibrium and balance.
_	The song is more similar to "Am I Dreaming", in the sense that both feature a soothing tropical melody.
_	It is a "refugium" in the sense that it permits organisms to be maintained that would not survive in the main system, whether food animals, anaerobic denitrifying bacteria, or photosynthesizers.
_	The claim is that this conformal field theory is equivalent to the gravitational theory on the bulk anti-de Sitter space in the sense that there is a "dictionary" for translating calculations in one theory into calculations in the other.
_	It is unique in the sense that the temple consists of three temples conjoined through narrow passages.
_	In some cases, a calculated p-box will also be best-possible in the sense that "only" possible distributions are within the p-box, but this is not always guaranteed.
_	Herlihy concludes the matter stating, "the medieval experience shows us not a Malthusian crisis but a stalemate, in the sense that the community was maintaining at stable levels very large numbers over a lengthy period" and states that the phenomenon should be referred to as more of a deadlock, rather than a crisis, to describe Europe before the epidemics.
_	And then I just had the sense that I had encountered God, that he knew my name and I was shocked."
_	Males tailor their ejaculate in the sense that the first ejaculate is meant to prolong the refractory period of the female, and every subsequent ejaculate is meant to maximize efficiency in sperm competition.
_	However, he may be understood as a rational egoist in the sense that he considered it irrational not to act in one's self-interest.
_	Lacunza's interpretation of Biblical prophecy led him to believe that during the period before the "day of the Lord" there would be an apostasy within the Catholic Church which would make it part of a general system which he labelled Antichrist, in the sense that there would be a general "falling away" in doctrine among the churches, resulting in moral apostasy.
_	GeoWalls are examples of passive Virtual Reality, in the sense that there is no head tracking.
_	In an interview, Basa described his role David quite difficult in the sense that he doesn't want his character to look stereotype.
_	Daniel Gordis wrote that the plan's implementation would be highly demoralizing to those Arabs who would not be removed and might give them the sense that Israel does not want them.
_	If an oriented coloring is complete, in the sense that no two colors can be merged to produce a coloring with fewer colors, then it corresponds uniquely to a graph homomorphism into a tournament.
_	On the other hand, an archetype could be the original, in the sense that it is not a copy, but the concrete surviving, unmodified text.
_	But it must also be universal, in the sense that, while every nation is permitted to admit into its ecclesiastical compositions those special forms which may be said to constitute its native music, still these forms must be subordinated in such a manner to the general characteristics of sacred music, that no one of any nation may receive an impression other than good on hearing them.".
_	HDP co-leader Selahattin Demirtaş was widely seen as the victor of the election, in the sense that as well as exceeding many vote share projections, his party won the same amount of MPs (80 seats) as the Nationalist Movement Party.
_	During and after the International Conference on Population and Development (ICPD), some interested parties attempted to interpret the term ‘reproductive health’ in the sense that it implies abortion as a means of family planning or, indeed, a right to abortion.
_	The actor, Naveen Andrews, said, "we were all pretty nervous, in the sense that we all felt we owed a real obligation, not just to Iraqis but the entire Arab world about how this character would be played."
_	However, Leibniz was a pluralist in the sense that substances are disseminated in the world in an infinite number.
_	He pointed out that if the speakers/interviewees could not state their stance clearly, they had to "pay the price" in the sense that reporters might make twist their words to make a story more dramatic.
_	The configurations of the Penrose or Escher type are illusory in the sense that only on a detailed logical analysis it becomes apparent that they are not physically realizable.
_	Parker's sculpting style can best be described as "realism" in the sense that he wants his finished product to look exactly like the wild animal would appear in its natural environment.
_	His first point is to argue that phyletic gradualism — understood in the sense that evolution proceeds at a single uniform rate of speed, called "constant speedism" by Dawkins — is a "caricature of Darwinism" and "does not really exist".
_	The resulting determinant bundle is responsible for the phenomenon of tensor densities, in the sense that for an orientable manifold it has a global section, and its tensor powers with any real exponent may be defined and used to 'twist' any vector bundle by tensor product.
_	"Of all the literatures in South Africa, Afrikaans literature has been the only one to have become a national literature in the sense that it developed a clear image of itself as a separate entity, and that by way of institutional entrenchment through teaching, distribution, a review culture, journals, etc. it could ensure the continuation of that concept."
_	So the language cannot claim a national readership, while on the other hand being "international" in the sense that it transgresses the national borders.
_	Technically, the Silos monks are surpassed by other choirs, but they are undoubtedly authentic in the sense that they sing Gregorian chant as part of their daily worship.
_	He proposes that the last factor be replaced with , where is the fraction of communicating civilizations become "immortal" (in the sense that they simply do not die out), and representing the length of time during which this process has been going on.
_	The scientific modifications in Longquan Monastery can be described in the sense that there is a shift from deep philosophy to more practical teachings, such as resolving family conflict.
_	Of their outdoor work, FAILE argues that "it gives a person the sense that it is there just for them.
_	Sinfonia No. 3, subtitled Sounds and Motions for Organ, is a secular work, in the sense that it was designed to explore the full range of expressive capabilities of the symphonic organ.
_	It should be noted that Spencer was not a determinist in the sense that he never said that
_	The competition is notional in the sense that it is simply a ranking scheme overlaid on all international matches that are otherwise played as part of regular
_	" 'his hunting partner (in the sense that the partner referred to, being very proficient, has many companions in hunting)
_	"So, individual freedom as our ancestor knew it is largely gone because one who works for another is not exactly free in the sense that one is who finances his business and works for himself," Davis stated late in his Extension career.
_	Ebert gave the film three stars out of four, saying: "There is rarely the sense that a living, breathing and (dare I say?) fallible human inhabits the body of the Dalai Lama.
_	Morris believed that all work should be artistic, in the sense that the worker should find it both pleasurable and an outlet for creativity.
_	The reciprocal of is the probability that any three positive integers, chosen at random, will be relatively prime (in the sense that as goes to infinity, the probability that three positive integers less than chosen uniformly at random will be relatively prime approaches this value).
_	White "invariably asked questions that were both pointed and powerful," he recalls, and Mr. Abrams never once "had the sense that anything I said pleased him."
_	The last few decades of the 19th century marked the beginning of modernization in Ethiopian history in the sense that they opened the door to new and better conditions of life and work.
_	in the sense that it is a vector bundle isomorphism between and In the associated coordinates on "TM" it reads as
_	The political basis for the Bretton Woods system was in the confluence of two key conditions: the shared experiences of two World Wars, with the sense that failure to deal with economic problems after the first war had led to the second; and the concentration of power in a small number of states.
_	The Alliance, according to Holmes, was unique in the sense that it served as a "blueprint" to map out the Government's research and development support for GA innovation revitalization.
_	"In the early eighties, you had the sense that there was nothing you couldn't do in L.A."
_	This is somewhat similar to Abrahamic sin in the sense that pāpa is considered a crime against the laws of God, which is known as (1) Dharma, or moral order, and (2) one's own self, but another term "aparadha" is used for grave offences.
_	The second condition means that the connection is a metric connection in the sense that the Riemannian metric is parallel: .
_	It is metric in the sense that it uses metres, but it is based on volume so that Canadian units can be easily converted into barrels.
_	When Carol gets the sense that her building is a target, she informs Marina about it and has her help in evacuating the tenants.
_	Most other bees, including familiar insects such as carpenter bees, leafcutter bees and mason bees are solitary in the sense that every female is fertile, and typically inhabits a nest she constructs herself.
_	Athenian democracy was not only "direct" in the sense that decisions were made by the assembled people, but also the "most direct" in the sense that the people through the assembly, boule and courts of law controlled the entire political process and a large proportion of citizens were involved constantly in the public business.
_	The mode is "dialectical" in the sense that it presents the steps of the argument to the PGC as inferences made by an agent, rather than as statements true of the world itself.
_	This mode of argumentation is also "necessary" both in the sense that its initial premise is inescapable from any agent's standpoint and that the subsequent steps of the proof are logically deduced from this premise.
_	In addition, Ricochet could be treated as an "always-on" connection (in the sense that, once connected to the network, it could stay connected even when not in use without tying up scarce resources, unlike a dialup connection), much the way broadband is today.
_	The technical terms are considered preferable because they are less likely to convey the sense that the trait mentioned is inferior, simpler, or less adaptive (e.g., as in lower and higher plants).
_	It is self-adjoint with respect to the scalar product of formula_42 in the sense that its transpose operator
_	It was Dr. Ketchledges's strong belief that the persistent problem of vandalism was closely related to the issue of maintenance in the sense that vandalism could be addressed and decreased only if the Parks Department seriously took on the responsibility of increased maintenance and supervision."
_	One might say of course that the more important word there is still Catholic, the sense that the adjective abides while the noun is provisional."
_	Whilst, Schubert apart, these composers certainly knew each other (with Haydn and Mozart even being occasional chamber-music partners), there is no sense in which they were engaged in a collaborative effort in the sense that one would associate with 20th-century schools such as the Second Viennese School, or Les Six.
_	The "behaviorally modern", on the other hand, define themselves as "Modern Orthodox" only in the sense that they are neither Haredi ("Ultra-Orthodox") nor Conservative: these, in other words, are "not deeply concerned with philosophical ideas", and, often, are not as careful in their observance.
_	The first welfare theorem is informative in the sense that it points to the sources of inefficiency in markets.
_	A is abelian and let E be any strictly full additive subcategory which is closed under taking extensions in the sense that given an exact sequence
_	In a finite, connected, "simple", planar graph, any face (except possibly the outer one) is bounded by at least three edges and every edge touches at most two faces; using Euler's formula, one can then show that these graphs are "sparse" in the sense that if "v" ≥ 3:
_	and solves (P1) in the sense that if formula_10 denotes the characteristic operator for "X" (which agrees with "A" on "C" functions), then
_	Flying fish are not true fliers in the sense that they do not execute powered flight.
_	Note that "completeness" has a different meaning here than it does in the context of Gödel's first incompleteness theorem, which states that no "recursive", "consistent" set of non-logical axioms formula_40 of the Theory of Arithmetic is "complete", in the sense that there will always exist an arithmetic statement formula_1 such that neither formula_1 nor formula_49 can be proved from the given set of axioms.
_	This mechanic allows for luck management, as the players can choose which cards they play and when, and is an equaliser in the sense that all players must play through the same deck eventually, thus giving them equal or very similar chances of success or failure.
_	Instead, Burton argues, the show gives the viewing public the sense that the government is effectively and fairly administrating border security policy.
_	The absolute that is grasped is always perfect in the sense that it is perfectly what it is, and infinite in the sense that it can be grasped as a whole through a simple, indivisible act of intuition, yet lends itself to boundless enumeration when analysed.
_	Adipose tissue host progenitor cells with reported interesting cardiomyogenic and vasculogenic potential in the sense that they improve heart functions and reduce infarction size in rodent animal models.
_	The Allmusic review by Stacia Proefrock awarded the album 3 stars noting that "While this album may not contain the precise and complex structures of Zorn's other experimental work, one gets the sense that he gave himself free rein to play a little, and came up with something new".
_	A mainstream political view is that the comparison of the two terms is valid, but that they are somewhat mutually exclusive in the sense that striving for either type of equality would require sacrificing the other to an extent and that achieving equality of opportunity necessarily brings about "certain inequalities of outcome".
_	The Talmud—relative to other Rabbinic sources—takes a unique approach to Christianity in the sense that in differentiates between Yeshu himself—who is portrayed as a complete Jew wanting to remain under his Rabbi's tutelage—and the religion he ultimately established -which the Talmud frowns upon.
_	More precisely, a right Haar measure on a locally compact group "G" is a countably additive measure μ defined on the Borel sets of "G" which is "right invariant" in the sense that μ("Ax") = μ("A") for "x" an element of "G" and "A" a Borel subset of "G" and also satisfies some regularity conditions (spelled out in detail in the article on Haar measure).
_	Although the versions are "technically" in mono (in the sense that the sound in both the right and left channels is the same), they are not the actual mono mixes released by Capitol in 1965.
_	Context-sensitive grammars are more general than context-free grammars, in the sense that there are languages that can be described by CSG but not by context-free grammars.
_	This final limitation to the scope of estoppel operates in the sense that the doctrine applies to representations relating to past and present events only by excluding the future events executory promise.
_	This association is a duality in the sense that there is a natural isomorphism between the double dual "A" and "A" (defined via the Poincaré bundle) and that it is contravariant functorial, i.e. it associates to all morphisms "f": "A" → "B" dual morphisms "f": "B" → "A" in a compatible way.
_	Ross argued that the book was unfair in the sense that it was difficult to fully understand Tinkler today given that so much of his life went undocumented such as the "missing years" from 1931 to 1934, that such flaws were a tribute to how "thought-provoking" "Empire Made Me" was, and that a less ambitious historian than Bickers would have produced a less interesting book.
_	Father Hardon's work "The Catholic Catechism" was a significant post–Vatican II work in the sense that it essentially brought modern Catholic teaching and faith into one book, unlike any other before.
_	Thus one of the models of the given program is special in the sense that it correctly represents the behavior of SLDNF resolution.
_	Toulouse was perhaps faring a little better than northern France in the sense that its proximity to Muslim Spain meant there was a strong flow of knowledge and culture coming from the schools and printing houses of Córdoba.
_	By performing a carefully chosen Möbius transformation of a circle packing before transforming it into a polyhedron, it is possible to find a polyhedral realization that realizes all the symmetries of the underlying graph, in the sense that every graph automorphism is a symmetry of the polyhedral realization.
_	In Tenrikyo, God is immanent in the sense that God provides for all matter in the universe, such as human bodies, living organisms and inanimate objects, and sustains all of the physical processes behind them.
_	PCI-X is backward compatible to PCI in the sense that the entire bus falls back to PCI if any card on the bus does not support PCI-X.
_	Ribbon microphones are similar to moving coil microphones in the sense that both produce sound by means of magnetic induction.
_	However, Spiritist Centres usually are dedicated buildings, in the sense that they usually must follow some architectural guidelines.
_	Similarly, English judges were beholden to Parliament, in the sense that their judgments can be overturned by that body.
_	They become unbound in the sense that they do not have to serve their own egos and consciences.
_	It is known that the endomorphism ring End("M") is a semilocal ring which is very close to a local ring in the sense that End("M") has at most two maximal right ideals.
_	His work was also designed to be less than perfect in the sense that certain movements or gestures would likely, but not always produce a corresponding sound.
_	Vinick is (like Goldwater) moderately pro-choice in the sense that he is opposed to partial-birth abortion and in favor of parental consent laws.
_	The warning was given because "The theme was likely to frighten and disturb child viewers, particularly because the violence – which included easily accessible weapons such as baseball bats – was realistic in the sense that it could happen in New Zealand."
_	It is the cause in the sense that the virtues, which are defined to be the "perfected ability" of man as a spiritual person (spiritual personhood in the classical western understanding means having intelligence and free will), achieve their "perfection" only when they are founded upon prudence, that is to say upon the perfected ability to make right decisions.
_	Albert fully agrees with Aristotle in the sense that friendship is a virtue.
_	Pirlo wrote of Park, "The midfielder must have been the first nuclear-powered South Korean in history, in the sense that he rushed about the pitch at the speed of an electron."
_	A December 2000 article in the "Journal of Contemporary Ethnography", examining Ybor City's "bohemian" culture of the mid-1990s, held up Pee Shy as a prototypical "DIY band turned corporate sellout," at least in the sense that the members' decision to sign with a major label had been controversial with some of their friends and indie rock compatriots.
_	Bob Black in his long critique of Bookchin's philosophy called "Anarchy After Leftism" said about post-left anarchy that "[i]t is, unlike Bookchinism, "individualistic" in the sense that if the freedom and happiness of the individual – i.e., each and every really existing person, every Tom, Dick and Murray – is not the measure of the good society, what is?".
_	As Polanyi points out, these are actually “fictitious commodities” in the sense that they are not truly discrete “products.”
_	As a result, the notion grew that particle and wave properties were mutually incompatible, or complementary, in the sense that different measurement apparatuses would be required to observe them.
_	Also the sense that God created the world as a self operating system is what motivated many Christians throughout the Middle Ages to investigate nature.
_	It was a fictional book, but Stone developed an interest towards it and called it "very Fyodor Dostoyevsky", in the sense that none of it is realistic.
_	This is moderated by trait modifiability, in the sense that we can find the former event to be especially true for unmodifiable traits.
_	When used without any qualification, a total coloring is always assumed to be proper in the sense that no adjacent vertices, no adjacent edges, and no edge and its end-vertices are assigned the same color.
_	It is different from a season ticket in the sense that, while both of them grant unlimited travel to the holder, season tickets normally target commuting travellers, whereas rail passes usually target tourists.
_	This bound is rather sharp, in the sense that formula_23 cannot be replaced with a larger number which would yield a strict inequality for all positive formula_3
_	It is a rolling release in the sense that once installed, end-users are guaranteed to continuously receive security and software updates for their Solus installation without having to worry that their operating system will reach end-of-life.
_	Safety (in the sense of being very low risk) and the sense that a co-counselling session is a safe space is important to the methods.
_	His mission is 'conservative' in the sense that He is expected "not to lose anything from what he has been given", and 'eschatological' in that He is to raise up the gift of His Father on the last day (John 6:39).
_	Jimbalakudunj occupies a unique location in the West Kimberley settlement pattern in the sense that it is proximate to the midway point between the coastal regional centres of Broome/Derby and the inland regional centre of Fitzroy Crossing.
_	McLennan stated "We really sat down for the first time in years and wrote together in the sense that anything new we'd come up with the night before we'd go through and rearrange and discard or put it into something else.
_	in many countries, education is still far from being a knowledge industry in the sense that its own practices are not yet being transformed by knowledge about the efficacy of those practices.” (OECD, 2009, p. 3)
_	The rebranding reinforced the sense that the airport was something owned by the locality."
_	Homeomorphism groups are topological invariants in the sense that the homeomorphism groups of homeomorphic topological spaces are isomorphic as groups.
_	Patt's tuning is a regular tuning, in the sense that all of the intervals between its successive open strings are major thirds; in contrast, the standard guitar-tuning has one major-third amid four fourths.
_	The quality of life he was greatly compromised in the sense that if the State Railways had maintained a monopoly on the transportation, Certainly you would have had the deconcentration of berths rafts (note, naval units destined for the ferrying of vehicles).
_	It is independent in the sense that the Board currently operates without official obligation to accept the requests or advice of any elected official with regard to actions on the money supply, and its methods of funding also preserve independence.
_	Each of these sets of intervals formula_12 covers formula_6 in the sense that when the intervals are combined together by union, they contain formula_6.
_	Such a view of history might not be "powerful" in the sense that Acemoglu and Robinson would like, but it has the virtue of being accurate and useful.
_	Although we have seen films like Luck By Chance, Khoya Khoya Chand and more recently, Mere Dost Picture Abhi Baaki Hai, this film is not repetitive in the sense that there is no sense of having seen it.
_	This paper reconciles Paul Samuelson's revealed preference approach to demand theory with the earlier ordinal utility approach of Eugene Slutsky and Sir John Hicks, by showing that demand functions satisfy his Strong Axiom if and only if they can be generated by maximising a set of preferences that are "well-behaved" in the sense that they satisfy the axioms of choice theory, that is, they are reflexive, transitive, complete, monotonic, convex and continuous—essentially the conditions required for a Hicksian approach to demand theory.
_	I think a proper folk song needs to be instructive and entertaining, in the sense that the melody has its own captivating logic, I think a good folk song is like a machine, all elements perfectly calibrated, and this song is the Large Hadron Collider, smashing things together to get to the bottom of the universe."
_	Malcolm Warner, curator of the Yale Center for British Art, interpreted the work differently, writing in 1996 that "the quiet sound of the lyre's single string is all that is left of the full music of religious faith; those who still listen are blindfolded in the sense that, even if real reasons for Hope exist, they cannot see them; Hope remains a virtue, but in the age of scientific materialism a weak and ambiguous one".
_	Parylene AF-4 is a PTFE (Teflon) analogue in the sense that its aliphatic chemistry has the repeat unit -CF- and as a result has superior oxidative and UV stability.
_	According to one account, Tocqueville's political position became untenable during this time in the sense that he was mistrusted by both the left and right and was looking for an excuse to leave France.
_	The online review was cursory in the sense that it did not realize the expansion of the online version.
_	An Euclidean disk that fills a circle can be replaced, without decreasing the distances between boundary points, by a Finsler disk that fills the same circle =10 times (in the sense that its boundary wraps around the circle times), but whose Holmes–Thompson area is less than times the area of the disk.
_	Her blindness is part of her mutation in the sense that she has no eyes, but rather has skin where eyes would normally be.
_	They are not therefore truly 'common' land in the sense that anyone can use them, and this distinction meant that it was often very easy for commonties to be divided between landowners after a series of Acts permitting this were passed by the Parliament of Scotland in the 17th century, most notably the 1695 Act for the Division of Commonties.
_	He argues that for Baudrillard, all religions are hyper-real in the sense that they ascribe reality to the socially constructed.
_	To acclimatize audiences to the different style of the series, taking into consideration that the show was given a late airtime and so "it’s on at the end of their very long day", Hawley had several of the early episodes begin with a "hypnotic quality ... often [with] a little ethereal voice-over, to give the sense that we are not rooted in a physical time and place."
_	The real number system is the unique "complete ordered field", in the sense that any other complete ordered field is isomorphic to it.
_	Director James Cameron acknowledged that the film is "certainly about imperialism in the sense that the way human history has always worked is that people with more military or technological might tend to supplant or destroy people who are weaker, usually for their resources."
_	However, an action can still be free in the sense that it is not constrained or otherwise subject to external forces.
_	Cit and acit are different from Isvara, in the sense that they have attributes and capacities, which are different from those of Isvara.
_	Inquisitively, they are parameter-symmetrical in the sense that they hold formula_54
_	Edith graciously soothes Pamela's bitterness over the sense that her life is without purpose, explaining that this means she can do whatever she wants with her life.
_	In other words, the particle position is extremely uncertain in the sense that it could be essentially anywhere along the wave packet.
_	One could say that covalent bonding is more "directional" in the sense that the energy penalty for not adhering to the optimum bond angles is large, whereas ionic bonding has no such penalty.
_	Note that the reciprocal is not true, in the sense that the GDM framework includes methods such that the function formula_20 cannot be computed from the function formula_21.
_	Several instrumental values can be identified which are convergent in the sense that their attainment would increase the chances of the agent's goal being realized for a wide range of final goals and a wide range of situations, implying that these instrumental values are likely to be pursued by a broad spectrum of situated intelligent agents.
_	Successful startups are typically more scalable than an established business, in the sense that the startup has the potential to grow rapidly with a limited investment of capital, labor or land.
_	The rfKMC algorithm is efficient in the sense that every iteration is guaranteed to produce a transition.
_	It is characterized by the fact that loxodromes (rhumb lines) from one chosen central point (the intersection of the central meridian and central latitude) are shown straight lines, correct in azimuth from the center, and are "true to scale" in the sense that distances measured along such lines are proportional to lengths of the corresponding rhumb lines on the surface of the earth.
_	Let G be an abelian group with a map formula_93 which is bilinear, in the sense that
_	In a variety of essays and books he lays out key concepts such as "the hidden possibilities of things" – the sense that the world has much more depth and possibility than it may seem – and correlatively the need to thematize and resist self-validating reduction, the process by which some being or some part of the world are reduced to less than they might be, and then that very reduction is taken as an excuse and validation for itself, the obliterated possibilities now thoroughly out of view.
_	New Holland was a "railway village" in the sense that Crewe was a railway town.
_	It was instant in the sense that it could be very quickly and easily developed in the Polavision processing unit after it was removed from the Polavision camera, ready for viewing in only a few minutes.
_	I don’t mean growth is required as if its written in a legal document somewhere, but is required in the sense that our economy only functions well when its growing.
_	The black swan concept is important and poses a valid criticism of people, firms, and societies that are irresponsible in the sense that they are overly confident in their ability to anticipate and manage risk.
_	Organ/tissue gifting differs from commodification in the sense that anonymity and social trust are emphasized to reduce the offer and request of monetary compensation.
_	It also supports evolutionary theory, in the sense that all vertebrates develop similarly and have a common ancestor.
_	Similarly, Albrecht Ritschl rejected the pre-existence of Christ, asserting that Christ was the "Son of God" only in the sense that "God had revealed himself in Christ" and Christ "accomplished a religious and ethical work in us which only God could have done."
_	Access Control – Chui access control is a hardware as a service, in the sense that the hardware is managed through the software as a service.
_	Process philosophy is Heraclitan in the sense that a fundamental ontological category is change.
_	May 5, 2010 Jonathan Holland of Variety magazine describe it as "typically challenging, potentially divisive item from Spanish auteur Julio Medem, and a partial return to form", but despite praising the acting and craft of the film Holland writes "there’s the sense that he’s more interested in his ideas than in his people."
_	Analytic continuation along a curve is essentially unique, in the sense that given two analytic continuations formula_7 and formula_26 formula_27 of formula_5 along formula_29 the functions formula_30 and formula_31 coincide on formula_32
_	Although VoWLAN and 3G have certain feature similarities, VoWLAN is different in the sense that it uses a wireless internet network (typically 802.11) rather than a cellular network.
_	The "wanting" of incentive salience differs from "liking" in the sense that liking is the pleasure that is immediately gained from the acquisition or consumption of a rewarding stimulus; the "wanting" of incentive salience serves a "motivational magnet" quality of a rewarding stimulus that makes it a desirable and attractive goal, transforming it from a mere sensory experience into something that commands attention, induces approach, and causes it to be sought out.
_	This similarity of early theatre to ritual is negatively attested by Aristotle, who in his "Poetics" defined theatre in contrast to the performances of sacred mysteries: theatre did not require the spectator to fast, drink the kykeon, or march in a procession; however theatre did resemble the sacred mysteries in the sense that it brought purification and healing to the spectator by means of a vision, the "theama".
_	In other ways, however, the painting is a step away from International Gothic in the sense that Masaccio has created a more realistic approach to the subject:
_	Writing of this and Titian's other mythological paintings from the same years, Sydney Joseph Freedberg said they "convey the sense that an extraordinary reach of classical expression has been achieved in them, as sensuous experience, as much as that of the spirit and the mind, assumes the stature of idea.
_	It is a "fair" distribution in the sense that it is the only distribution with certain desirable properties listed below.
_	This bound is "sharp" in the sense that the worst-case complexity and the average-case complexity are formula_5 which means that there is a constant formula_6 such that these complexities are larger than formula_7
_	However, neither group of countries was pro-gender equality in the sense that policies aimed at equal rights between the sexes are popular.
_	The control function, from the French "contrôler", is used in the sense that a manager must receive feedback about a process in order to make necessary adjustments and must analyze the deviations.
_	That's when I really began to get the sense that horses are very special creatures.
_	There has been criticism of the more prominent natural horsemanship practitioners in general, including Parelli (as well as Clinton Anderson and John Lyons), with suggestions that the movement is cultlike, in the sense that some practitioners and their followers condemn all other training methods, and that it is "gimmicky and over-commercialized," sells overpriced materials, and charges "exorbitant" prices for clinics and to obtain certification as a trainer.
_	Intuitively, one should think of "a" + "b" as the "union" or the "least upper bound" of "a" and "b" and of "ab" as some multiplication which is monotonic, in the sense that "a" ≤ "b" implies "ax" ≤ "bx".
_	Formally, a linear continuum is a linearly ordered set "S" of more than one element that is densely ordered, i.e., between any two distinct elements there is another (and hence infinitely many others), and which "lacks gaps" in the sense that every non-empty subset with an upper bound has a least upper bound.
_	Rundgren felt Johansen's wild singing often sounded screamed or drunken but were eloquent in the sense that Johansen demonstrated a "propensity to incorporate certain cultural references into the music", particularly on "Personality Crisis".
_	His conclusion was that China did not have feudalism in the sense that Marxists use, that Chinese military governments did not lead to a European-style military aristocracy.
_	As the Presto card is meant to replace paper transfers along with cash, tickets, tokens and paper passes, local transit operators have generally adopted the Presto card's transfer policies in their paper transfers (in the sense that, with the exception of the TTC, GO Transit, Union Pearson Express and OC Transpo, all local transit operators accept each other's transfers, and will not reissue transfers originally issued by other local transit operators), except for a generally longer transfer window provided by the Presto card.
_	Even if it did have a large storage capacity, the Court reasoned, the size of an item shouldn't be relevant in the sense that it would make it increasingly difficult for law enforcement to uphold the law when such distinctions in container size could be made.
_	they are incompatible in the sense that these measurements' maximum simultaneous precision is constrained by the uncertainty principle.
_	In a September 2009 interview, Thorn commented that "new sincerity" had begun as "a silly, philosophical movement that me and some friends made up in college" and that "everything that we said was a joke, but at the same time it wasn’t all a joke in the sense that we weren’t being arch or we weren’t being campy.
_	For a fixed semiring formula_58 that generates formula_2 in the sense that formula_60, the distribution of a random measure is also uniquely determined by the integral over all positive simple formula_61-measurable functions formula_41.
_	It must also be determined whether the Bill of Rights applies to the conduct of the respondent, in the sense that the respondent has obligations under the Bill of Rights.
_	The horse surprised me today in the sense that he has improved".
_	Bradman said that the Victorian all-rounder "was never a great cricketer in the sense that some others were great, but he was a very good player and what he lacked in ability he made up for in effort".
_	Burke calls "The Longest War"’s discussion of the inner workings of al-Qaeda "revelatory," noting that some members of al-Qaeda actually opposed carrying out the 9/11 attacks because they had the sense that the U.S.’s likely response would shut down their safe haven in Afghanistan.
_	Its quality is so fine that scholars have debated whether it is a fourth-century original, in the sense that workshop repetitions are all "originals" or a later copy made during the Hellenistic period.
_	It is important to keep in mind that formal charges are just that – formal, in the sense that this system is a formalism.
_	The relationship is unique in the sense that the federal government must constantly reevaluate and tweak its border security policy to address the perceived threats posed to the United States through the form of human terrorism or the smuggling and detonation of a weapon of mass destruction.
_	impulse approximations, in the sense that one-body current operators
_	Hordern described "King John" as being "a difficult play in the sense that it has no common purpose or apparent theme".
_	His policy with investigations is to ensure the client's safety above all else, and unlike Shotaro, he is truly hardboiled in the sense that he will make difficult decisions when he needs to, and follows through with it.
_	Of the six Hindu darsanas, the Mimamsa and the Vedanta "are rooted primarily in the Vedic "sruti" tradition and are sometimes called "smarta" schools in the sense that they develop "smarta" orthodox current of thoughts that are based, like "smriti", directly on "sruti".
_	The concept is generally used in the sense that the person really existed in the past, as opposed to being legendary.
_	This is a (generalized) sphere in the sense that it is a collection of points for which the "distance" (determined by the quadratic form) from the origin is constant, but visually it is a hyperboloid, as in the image shown.
_	Primitive achondrites, also called PAC group, are called in this way because their chemical composition is "primitive" in the sense that it is similar to the composition of chondrites, but their texture is igneous, indicative of melting processes.
_	This greatly simplifies his logical theory, in the sense that there is economy in the roots of the theory: there is a very limited number of elements.
_	but is tied to the canon, in the sense that each church used their respective Gospel given to them by their communities' founding Apostle.
_	This aspect of the piece conveys the sense that "The General Goes Zapping Charlie Cong" is a character profile of the General, even though the central issue of the piece is civilian casualties.
_	This procedure is sharp in the sense that for some configurations, the FCR approaches "q".
_	Of these, two annular and one total eclipse will be non-central, in the sense that the very center (axis) of the moon's shadow will miss the earth (for more information see gamma).
_	Storing points out that many "Anti-Federalists" actually considered themselves Federalists in the sense that a federation is a structure over sovereign states.
_	First, most of them are voltage-dependent in the sense that they conduct better in one direction than the other (in other words, they are rectifiers); second, some of them are capable of being shut off by chemical ligands even though they do not require ligands in order to operate.
_	Arabic–Dongolawi bilingualism is replacive in the sense that Dongolawi is threatened by complete replacement by Arabic (Jakobi 2008).
_	This is an exhibition of contemporary art, not in the sense that it was done recently, but in that it is cased in the mentality, technology and philosophy of radical art of the most recent times.
_	Though Beatrice was rumored to be greatly loved by Frederick and thereby attributed influence over him in the sense that he had great affection for her, there is nothing to indicate that she acted as his political adviser and she is confirmed to be directly involved in a major political affair only once.
_	Süskind likens the two figures to each other in that both ventured into the realm of death because of their love; however, Süskind is critical of Jesus for his almost political motives and his "distance and inhumanity", in the sense that he was completely immune to the frenzy of love.
_	Its fundamental group formula_5 is an invariant of the knot in the sense that equivalent knots have isomorphic knot groups.
_	Karel Lambert wrote in 1967: "In fact, one may regard free logic... literally as a theory about singular existence, in the sense that it lays down certain minimum conditions for that concept."
_	Because Hilbert-style systems have very few deduction rules, it is common to prove metatheorems that show that additional deduction rules add no deductive power, in the sense that a deduction using the new deduction rules can be converted into a deduction using only the original deduction rules.
_	The shortcoming of "High Spirits" lies in the sense that these show tunes, from the musical based on Noël Coward's play Blithe Spirit, are really fairly average West End/Broadway fare".
_	Several classes of graphs are self-complementary, in the sense that the complement of any graph in one of these classes is another graph in the same class.
_	The media are accused of distorting reality, in the sense that people portrayed in the media are either naturally thin and thus unrepresentative of normality or unnaturally thin by forcing their bodies to look like the ideal image by putting excessive pressure on themselves to look a certain way.
_	Vom Gröller is a professional image-maker, not a commercial one, yet professional in the sense that she is and has been a photographer and filmmaker for over 40 years, not to mention one of Austria's great, if profoundly unrecognized, artists.
_	In a small way, it was his Anglican church music which came closest to establishing a continuous tradition, at least in the sense that some of it continued to be performed in choral foundations after the Restoration and into the eighteenth century.
_	The concept is different compared to dark field microscopy, in the sense that iSCAT doesn't reject the reflected (background) light.
_	It differs from slang in the sense that it also uses some English linguistic structures.
_	The LSA is efficient in the sense that the events are processed essentially in an event-driven fashion, rather than in a
_	This rule is based on public policy and the sense that it is improper to make a person serve
_	Different versions of this axiom are all equivalent in the sense that any ordered field that satisfies one form of completeness satisfies all of them, apart from Cauchy completeness and nested intervals theorem, which are strictly weaker in that there are non Archimedean fields that are ordered and Cauchy complete.
_	In the Balkans, meze is very similar to Mediterranean antipasti in the sense that cured cold-cuts, cheese and salads are dominant ingredients and that it typically doesn't include cooked meals.
_	This victory was significant in the sense that Turfan's location was the closest to the Xiongnu of all the western states, thereby they lost their access into the Western Regions with this Han conquest.
_	There was also the sense that Texas was either closely divided or leaning Republican in the mid-term elections of the Jimmy Carter presidency, as exhibited by the last reelection of Senator John Tower and the first Republican gubernatorial victory since 1869, with the triumph of Bill Clements.
_	A post disputation argument is considered manipulative in the sense that often it is not used to clarify a party's initial stance but to change it so they appear correct after the truth has been discovered.
_	This contributes to the sense that Augie, as the Everyman, is lost in a chaotic world, but it also enhances the sense that the Everyman, as an autonomous creation, is in control of his own fate.
_	The Lambek–Moser theorem is universal, in the sense that it can explain any partition of the integers into two infinite parts.
_	Clinomorphism, whilst being a linguistic behaviour which exemplifies particular "errors" and deliberate misrepresentations, may also be a natural tendency in the sense that it is potentially an understandable consequence of the need to abbreviate or to simply use a clinomorphism as a metaphor to convey an otherwise difficult to describe idea, in much the same way as anthropomorphism might be (where we attribute the human characteristics or presence of a mind to anything non-human, purely for ease of description of a particular phenomenon, rather than as a result of holding a genuinely animistic or pantheistic belief).
_	They were collective in the sense that they embodied the fundamental characteristics of a thing rather than its specific peculiarities.
_	The nature of the program is noncontributory, in the sense that Georgians do not have to contribute for enrollment.
_	They differ from these, in the sense that "S-parameters" do not use open or short circuit conditions to characterize a linear electrical network; instead, matched loads are used.
_	It's the sense that Gilliam, like Thompson, is always totally in command of the medium, while abandoning himself utterly to unpredictable forces beyond his control."
_	The interaction between employees and customers as a touchpoint is vital in the sense that employees have the opportunity to get to know their customers and be able to grasp what is important to them as a consumer of their brand.
_	Serial robots with less than six independent joints are always singular in the sense that they can never span a six-dimensional twist space.
_	Houses and cars are investment goods in the sense that the purchaser expects to be able to resell the asset in the future.
_	They are also consumption goods in the sense that the owner is able to use the asset while he owns it.
_	The synthetic methodology and the characterization of the product often go hand in hand in the sense that not one but a series of reaction mixtures are prepared and subjected to heat treatment.
_	UMAX offers some semi-free (in the sense that some versions/updates cost money and some do not) basic scanner software for Microsoft Windows (up to Windows XP) and Mac OS:
_	Mac Donald has criticized welfare and blamed philanthropic institutions such as the Ford Foundation and the Carnegie Corporation for suggesting that welfare is a right; in particular, she has criticized welfare as having a negative impact in the sense that "generations have grown up fatherless and dependent".
_	Though scholars have varying interpretations of the details, Aristotle's "common sense" was in any case not rational, in the sense that it implied no ability to explain the perception.
_	Taylor says that he and his brother are very competitive in the sense that they enjoy "showing off" to each other when they have new songs that they are working on.
_	The final shape of the star after star formation is an equilibrium shape, in the sense that the effective gravity in the equatorial region (being diminished) cannot pull the star to a more spherical shape.
_	In Lindeberg , it was shown that formula_186 and formula_187 implies better scale selection properties in the sense that the selected scale levels obtained from a spatio-temporal Gaussian blob with spatial extent formula_188 and temporal extent formula_189 will perfectly match the spatial extent and the temporal duration of the blob, with scale selection performed by detecting spatio-temporal scale-space extrema of the differential expression.
_	Reynolds added in the same article: "We don't collect old songs in the sense that the academic cats do...
_	Arguably, these characterizations are "imagined" in the sense that they reflect the philosophical and religious realities of neither "East' nor West."
_	The title of this project is a pun on the phrase "working class", in the sense that McCartney, despite his elevated stature, still cherishes his Liverpool roots and is proud of them.
_	It wasn’t until Irving Finkel organized a colloquium in 1990 that grew into the International Board Game Studies Association, Gonzalo Frasca popularized the term "ludology" (from the Latin word for game, ludus) in 1999, the publication of the first issues of academic journals like "Board Game Studies" in 1998 and "Game Studies" in 2001, and the creation of the Digital Games Research Association in 2003, that scholars began to get the sense that the study of games could (and should) be considered a field in its own right.
_	The concept of relativistic mass that Einstein introduced in 1905, "m", although amply validated every day in particle accelerators around the globe (or indeed in any instrumentation whose use depends on high velocity particles, such as electron microscopes, old-fashioned color television sets, etc.), has nevertheless not proven to be a "fruitful" concept in physics in the sense that it is not a concept that has served as a basis for other theoretical development.
_	Skocpol argues that these three cases, despite being spread over a century and a half, are similar in the sense that all three were social revolutions.
_	But Nothing Is Lost, in the sense that it contains much more emphasis on world music influences and parts performed on various instruments by Posford, Ram and guest musicians, compared to first two albums which were heavier on sampling and with more influences from dub and electronic dance music.
_	In other words, the trusted computing base is “trusted” first and foremost in the sense that it "has" to be trusted, and not necessarily that it is trustworthy.
_	The two strings 0010 and 1000 may be distinguished from each other by a three-state automaton in which the transitions from the start state go to two different states, both of which are terminal in the sense that subsequent transitions from these two states always return to the same state.
_	Suddenly, he could not shake the sense that he, too, should follow such a path.
_	An example of successful crowdfunding can be seen with the band Good Tiger, who is a "supergroup" in the sense that it is composed of successful musicians from multiple bands.
_	Basa finds his role quite difficult in the sense that he doesn't want his character to look "stereotype" or just like any other homosexual role seen in media.
_	Argumentation theory is interdisciplinary in the sense that no one discipline will be able to provide a complete account.
_	It is stable in the sense that an elementary reaction forms the reactive intermediate and the elementary reaction in the next step is needed to destroy it.
_	Often used by scholars is the term pseudepigrapha, or "falsely inscribed" or "falsely attributed", in the sense that the writings were written by an anonymous author who appended the name of an apostle to his work, such as in the Gospel of Peter or The Æthiopic Apocalypse of Enoch: almost all books, in both Old and New Testaments, called "apocrypha" in the Protestant tradition are pseudepigrapha.
_	Whilst a "safe" lake in the sense that access and egress are easy, during periods of moderate or stronger, due westerly winds swimming can become very challenging as waves can quickly form and swimmers are advised to stay close to shore.
_	This led him to question whether individuals exist in modern societies in the sense that "individual" is commonly understood (Mills, 1959, 7–12).
_	The statue mixes both realism and the allegory to classical mythology; also expressing the sense that the artists communicates with a superior realm.
_	Her interest in environment is related to food in the sense that when environment is destroyed, foods disappear.
_	These levels are sustainable in the sense that the turf can make use of the nutrients in the manure left behind by the chickens, and in the sense that, at this stocking density, the chickens will not completely destroy the turf through scratching.
_	The effect of the "Saamco" case was to exclude from liability the damages attributable to a fall in the property market notwithstanding that those losses were foreseeable in the sense of being “not unlikely” (property values go down as well as up) and had been caused by the negligent valuation in the sense that, but for the valuation, the bank would not have lent at all and there was no evidence to show that it would have lost its money in some other way.
_	Roger Ebert of the "Chicago Sun-Times" gave the film three out of four stars, stating "[It works] in the sense that the classic Hollywood noirs worked:
_	He did not like Michael's on-Island storyline either, noting he "got the sense that the actors and directors weren't quite sure what to make of these scenes".
_	It may be "extreme", only in the sense that it falls outside the "normal" way of seeing things.
_	Whenever two posets are order isomorphic, they can be considered to be "essentially the same" in the sense that one of the orders can be obtained from the other just by renaming of elements.
_	This definition is a generalization of the definition of a probability space in Kolmogorovian probability theory, in the sense that every (classical) probability space gives rise to a quantum probability space if "A" is chosen as the *-algebra of almost everywhere bounded complex-valued measurable functions.
_	It is a rare occurrence in the sense that if the set of cubic fields is ordered by discriminant, then the proportion of cubic fields which are cyclic approaches zero as the bound on the discriminant approaches infinity.
_	distributions is a purely linear theory, in the sense that the product of two distributions cannot consistently be defined (in general), as was proved by Laurent Schwartz in the 1950s.
_	"The approach tendencies created by mere exposure may be preattitudinal in the sense that they do not require the type of deliberate processing that is required to form brand attitude."
_	You get the sense that they're stepping into a bigger role.
_	However, I would rather describe myself as a devo-realist, in the sense that what is here is here.
_	A morphism between two chain complexes, formula_23 is a family of homomorphisms of abelian groups formula_24 that commute with the differentials, in the sense that formula_25 for all "n".
_	In abstract algebra, a partially ordered ring is a ring ("A", +, · ), together with a "compatible partial order", i.e. a partial order formula_1 on the underlying set "A" that is compatible with the ring operations in the sense that it satisfies:
_	This is efficient in the sense that one may not be able to find a Pareto improvement - which makes all players (including the one with everything in this case) better off (for a strict Pareto improvement), or not worse off.
_	However, as applied to crypto-Jews, the term marrano may also derive from the Spanish verb "marrar" (of Germanic rather than Arabic origin) meaning "to deviate" or "to err", in the sense that they deviated from their newly adopted faith by secretly continuing to practice Judaism.
_	Both were successful in the sense that they were completed expeditiously however they were able to draw few if any teams from beyond the New York area.
_	Then "P" forms an extreme case for the 1/3–2/3 conjecture in the sense that, for each pair "x", "y" of elements, one of the two elements occurs earlier than the other in at most 1/3 of the linear extensions of "P".
_	In November 2015, the Intellectual Property Office clarified in an informational document that, based on the opinion of the European Court of Justice, "copyright can only subsist in subject matter that is original in the sense that it is the author’s own 'intellectual creation'.
_	The 55-minute work is described as a slightly surreal song cycle about beginnings and endings and the sense that ‘after this, things will never be the same again.’
_	The phrase may also refer to a country's laws extending beyond its boundaries in the sense that they may authorise the courts of that country to enforce their jurisdiction against parties appearing before them in with respect to acts they allegedly engaged in outside that country.
_	In the sense that it is associated with irresistible urges to perform unwanted repetitive behavior, trichotillomania is akin to some of these conditions, and rates of trichotillomania among relatives of OCD patients is higher than expected by chance.
_	A discernible shift occurred in the sense that he now focuses more on a critique of political economy.
_	These games are worth a survey in the sense that the InterClub Center wants to determine the behavior of kicking girls and the public's reactions to accommodating the instances of many girls turning to an ever-growing female football development.
_	Transfinite numbers are numbers that are "infinite" in the sense that they are larger than all finite numbers, yet not necessarily absolutely infinite.
_	The material in the collection may be divided into two types: the first, namely "An Infinite Summer" and "Palely Loitering" are more straightforward works of science fiction involving time travel, while the other three are early parts of Priest's "Dream Archipelago" sequence, described by John Clute as "intensify[ing] the sense that Priest's landscapes had now become forms of expression of the psyche, and are of intense interest for the dream-like convolutions of psychic terrain so displayed."
_	and that is best possible, in the sense that for any larger constant than , there are some irrational numbers for which only finitely many such approximations exist.
_	Here are some statements that require the axiom of choice in the sense that they are not provable from ZF but are provable from ZFC (ZF plus AC).
_	This programme is unique in the sense that NAL has started work for creation of an airplane, in equal partnership with a private production agency cum development partner, M/s Mahindra Plexion Technologies Private Ltd., a unit of the reputed Mahindra & Mahindra industrial house.
_	Ebert praised the film and gave it 4 out of 4 stars writing "Gus Van Sant's "Elephant" is a violent movie in the sense that many innocent people are shot dead.
_	In particular, it is possible that individual cognition is probabilistic in the sense that individual estimates are drawn from an "internal probability distribution."
_	He wrote that white moderates, including clergymen, posed a challenge comparable to that of white supremacists, in the sense that, "Shallow understanding from people of good will is more frustrating than absolute misunderstanding from people of ill will.
_	In Nazi Germany, the term "Jewish Question" (in ) referred to the sense that the existence of Jews in Germany posed a problem for the state.
_	There are more Vaffas guarding these workers, some of whom have been "shanghaied", in the sense that their memories and tissues were stolen by Tweed without their knowledge.
_	Siwi is not a written language, in the sense that Siwi people normally write in Standard Arabic.
_	Similarly, the Edge's lyrics "tapped into many of the ideas behind Zoo TV, the sense that we were being bombarded by so much information that you find yourself shutting down and unable to respond."
_	It was an age of "enlightenment" in the sense that the insistence and drive for reasonable explanations of nature and mankind was a rage.
_	"I feel it's a fantastic opportunity – because of the freedom of it, because of the sense that there are marvelous, intensely interesting, important questions that you have a chance to try to deal with in an interesting way.
_	Modernism is a very important phase in the history of art in the sense that the de-constructivist phase is a necessary and vital condition for art to make the transition from the level of abstraction and generalization it possessed in figurative art for 40,000 years to a new paradigm in the future which will be at a far higher level of abstraction and generalization.
_	It does not appear to comply with a simple interpretation of Maxwell's equations in the sense that the magnetic field does not at any point pass through any closed winding to generate an electromagnetic effect.
_	In the sense that he founded a Catholic charism or pathway to holiness, Giussani can be thought of as being similar to Saint Teresa of Calcutta, Saint Francis of Assisi, Saint Dominic, Saint Ignatius of Loyola, Saint Elizabeth Ann Seton, Saint Katherine Drexel, Dorothy Day, or Chiara Lubich.
_	NBG and ZFC are equivalent set theories in the sense that any theorem not mentioning classes and provable in one theory can be proved in the other.
_	Kutch embroidery is unique in the sense that a net is woven on a cloth using thread.
_	The finals are notable in the sense that goal difference will not be a tiebreaking criterion; if both teams tie on points the decision will go directly to a penalty shootout.
_	This is true to life in the sense that participating in the underground economy gives people in the lower class the ability to make money and experience mobility.
_	If the probability matrix is a constant, in the sense that formula_9 for all formula_10, then the result is the Erdős–Rényi model formula_11.
_	Because the basic relation of meaning for most linguistic signs is based on social convention, linguistic signs can be considered arbitrary, in the sense that the convention is established socially and historically, rather than by means of a natural relation between a specific sign form and its meaning.
_	The method proceeds by attempting to derive a "fiducial distribution", which is a measure of the degree of faith that can be put on any given value of the unknown parameter and is faithful to the data in the sense that the method uses all available information.
_	The cooperation was referred to as "Academic Community", in the sense that the Press would facilitate the development of tourism discipline as an academic intermediary, while the research projects conducted by the Academy would provide the Press with publication sources.
_	Expressions such as "I was making fun of myself" convey the sense that fun is something that can be amusing and not to be taken seriously.
_	She calls them "bad scores" in the sense that they "do not offer performer the clearest instructions to produce an exact re-creation of the composer's authoritative creation... an .nfo score is more like a treasure map than an inclusive set of rules."
_	In this way, Tschumi's work is ethologically motivated, in the sense that Deleuze uses the term to propose an emergent ethics that depends on a reevaluation of self/identity and body.
_	Strictly speaking, the notion of an event is an idealization, in the sense that it specifies a definite time and place, whereas any actual event is bound to have a finite extent, both in time and in space.
_	While Dada was formed in 1916 as a criticism of the art culture in Europe, Surrealism stems from a similar mindset in the sense that it parodies or exaggerates an idea without losing its ground in reality.
_	Although these modulators may sound similar to the TAF-derived ECM components, they differ in the sense that they are responsible for the variation and turnover of the ECM.
_	"The good closure not on the love story, but the closure in the sense that Sonny has to go back to see his husband.
_	As a result of avoiding pointers and providing fully managed structured data types, EEL is "safe" in the sense that EEL programs should not be able to crash the virtual machine or the host application.
_	IL-1α is a unique member in the cytokine family in the sense that the structure of its initially synthesized precursor does not contain a signal peptide fragment (same is known for IL-1β and IL-18).
_	The second characteristic is that the data that is collected from these questions from women should directly result in research that is designed for women and the third characteristic says that gender should be investigated from the bottom up in the sense that those without the power should be the ones to analyze those in a position of power who are contributing to gender bias.
_	This strategy is optimal in the sense that it maximizes the voter's expected utility, subject to the constraints of the model and provided the number of other voters is sufficiently large.
_	DuPree-Bemis spoke of the new album in the band's press release, mentioning that, “Musically, you could say it’s classic Eisley, in the sense that it’s melodic, moody pop and is written from the heart.
_	latter is both left-continuous, in the sense that:
_	When employees get the sense that bullies "get away with it," a climate of fear may be the result.
_	BUCS organization is very different from the USA's NCAA in the sense that BUCS is not competitive to compete in like the NCAA.
_	Addiego, writing for the "San Francisco Examiner," did have a few enjoyable moments viewing the film but wrote, "You can't help cheering for Selena, but the good feeling is diminished by the sense that her story's been simplified and sanitized."
_	Jeff Jensen called the flashbacks "among the poorest and most clumsily integrated flashbacks we've seen so far", as he felt nothing new was learned, and also disliked Michael's on-Island storyline, noting he "got the sense that the actors and directors weren't quite sure what to make of these scenes".
_	This refers to his book "Jesus and his Church" (1938), based on a lecture delivered to the Methodist Conference in that year, which stated concisely the premise: "The Church is old in the sense that it is a continuation of the life of Israel, the People of God.
_	It is new in the sense that it is founded on the revelation made through Jesus Christ of God's final purpose for mankind."
_	Such an axiomatic model expresses "pure identity" in the sense that the model is not constrained by a specific application context.
_	Fagin's theorem, which he proved in his PhD thesis, states that existential second-order logic coincides with the complexity class NP in the sense that a decision problem can be expressed in existential second-order logic if and only if it can be solved by a non-deterministic Turing machine in polynomial time.
_	Mick LaSalle of the "San Francisco Chronicle" gave the film two out of four stars, saying "One gets the sense that directors Anthony Stacchi and Graham Annable have their hearts in the action sequences and not in the characters, and that's a problem."
_	The essential characteristic of this descriptive modality is that one must think of the "series of temporal positions" as being in "continual transformation", in the sense that an event is first part of the future, then part of the present, and then past.
_	Accordingly, the term is somewhat loose in the sense that a given cell or sample of cells may be deemed significantly more "deformable" by one means/metric relative to another means/metric.
_	Many of the characters face problems with infidelity and dishonesty in their narratives—whether they are the perpetrators or the victims, their paths eventually cross in more ways than one, often not in good ways (in the sense that they are often manipulated by or manipulating each other).
_	Lie algebra in the sense that there is always a faithful representation of formula_1 (in fact, on a finite-dimensional vector space by Ado's theorem if formula_1 is itself finite-dimensional.)
_	The O wave is the "ordinary" wave in the sense that its dispersion relation is the same as that in an unmagnetized plasma.
_	According to this doctrine, God is not divided in the sense that each person has a third of the whole; rather, each person is considered to be fully God (see Perichoresis).
_	Edwards' paintings also position themselves in a space between abstraction and realism in the sense that image making weaves in and out of cognition of subject matter.
_	S. Obuhov, the press-secretary to the Russian Duma, responded: "Zyuganov meant 'the last dog' as a Russian proverb and not in the sense that it sounds in English.
_	The measure μ does not necessarily coincide with the content λ on compact sets, However it does if λ is regular in the sense that
_	This dilemma was handled in the United States in "State v. Tally", , where the court ruled that: “The assistance given ... need not contribute to criminal result in the sense that but for it the result would not have ensued.
_	Harmonic oscillators occurring in a number of areas of engineering are equivalent in the sense that their mathematical models are identical (see universal oscillator equation above).
_	It is broader than that right, however, in the sense that reproduction requires fixation in copies or phonorecords, whereas the preparation of a derivative work, such as a ballet, pantomime, or improvised performance, may be an infringement even though nothing is ever fixed in tangible form.
_	Accordingly she states that the significance of the Venetian statute lies "in its broad and general character," in the sense that it attempted to "apply general rules to the granting of patents rather than conferring occasional individual favours (gratiae) in response to individual petitions."
_	The Y register is therefore an "index"-register in the sense that it is used to hold an actual "index" (as opposed to the X register in the 6800 where a base address was directly stored and to which an immediate offset could be added).
_	The main difference between them and the simpler Euler equations for inviscid flow is that Navier–Stokes equations also factor in the Froude limit (no external field) and are not conservation equations, but rather a dissipative system, in the sense that they cannot be put into the quasilinear homogeneous form:
_	Although the Southern United States was not specifically known for its antisemitism, Frank's northern culture and Jewish faith added to the sense that he was different.
_	Jews to be the "chosen people" in the sense that they have special role to "preserve God's revelations" or to "affirm our common humanity".
_	Restricted foster homes are different than regular foster homes in the sense that their caregiver approval is based specifically on the child they are looking to care for.
_	Elder was the first "Integrated" Catholic school in Cincinnati in the sense that it was attended by large numbers of students of both German and Irish descent.
_	still be used in the sense that on a short time scale
_	It is particularly important to note that the American military objective did not contemplate “winning” in the sense that the United States and its Allies had won World War II.
_	ABAC is policy-based in the sense that it uses policies rather than static permissions to define what is allowed or what is not allowed.
_	Moe felt strongly that writing should be "objective," in the sense that it removed the ego from the narrative.
_	Reusable sanitary pads are similar to disposable sanitary pads, but differ in the sense that they can be washed and used as many times as needed by the owner.
_	Symbolization, exaggeration and distortion are similar in the sense that they both use misleading headlines that creates negative symbols.
_	It has been suggested that Celia's role in the play is "subversive", in the sense that she adds to the sexual complications of the plot by her friendship with the cross-dressing Rosalind.
_	Orthogonal parameters are easy to deal with in the sense that their maximum likelihood estimates are independent and can be calculated separately.
_	The Markov trace is a trace operator in the sense that formula_7 and formula_8 for any formula_9.
_	However, my work is not post-modern in the sense that I am not making any statements—social, political, conceptual, even intellectual.
_	This hot pot cuisine, known as "daa bin lou" () in Cantonese, is unique in the sense that everyone is a chef.
_	Lastly, he explains how he does not believe that there is an afterlife except in the sense that people are remembered by the material possessions that they leave behind or the deeds that they did during their life that still affect the world.
_	The latter can be applied recursively, in the sense that an encoding step for a component of an ECN type may result in a further in-place modification of the remaining part of the ECN type that is being encoded.
_	"Super Monkey Ball Adventure" is a departure from the series in the sense that the puzzle-based gameplay is replaced by a more traditional 3D platform game world.
_	That is, in the sense that "in those [worlds] complex enough to contain self-aware substructures [they] will subjectively perceive themselves as existing in a physically 'real' world".
_	While AASHTO is not a government body, it does possess quasi-governmental powers in the sense that the organizations that supply its members customarily obey most AASHTO decisions.
_	Eden is not a skeleton language in the sense that skeletons are not provided as language constructs.
_	The Horner scheme for evaluation of polynomials is one of the most commonly used algorithms for this purpose and unlike Estrin's scheme it is optimal in the sense that it minimizes the number of multiplications and addition required to evaluate an arbitrary polynomial.
_	Texas Yaquis are not easily compared to Arizona Yaquis and are different in the sense that the Texas Band Yaquis descend from Mountain Yaqui Military Fighters and not Pueblo Village Yaquis.
_	Moreover, the socialist magazine "Jacobin" pointed out that Gehry's work can be summed up as architecture for the super-wealthy, in the sense that it is expensive, not resourceful, and does not serve the interests of the overwhelming majority.
_	However, in planar graphs, the Maximum-Cut Problem is dual to the route inspection problem (the problem of finding a shortest tour that visits each edge of a graph at least once), in the sense that the edges that do not belong to a maximum cut-set of a graph "G" are the duals of the edges that are doubled in an optimal inspection tour of the dual graph of "G".
_	Furthermore, data retention differs from data preservation in the sense that by definition, to retain an object (data) is to hold or keep possession or use of the object.
_	One of these fossil meteorites, dubbed Österplana 065, appears to represent a distinct type of meteorite that is "extinct" in the sense that it is no longer falling to Earth, the parent body having already been completely depleted from reservoir of Near Earth Objects.
_	A basic or tensorial form on "P" of type ρ is a "V"-valued form ω on "P" which is equivariant and horizontal in the sense that
_	Within the party, Oaten had been called a moderniser in the sense that he was keen to emphasise economic liberalism and to prevent the Liberal Democrats being sidelined as a 'party of the left'.
_	Jacobian conjecture: If "J" is a non-zero constant and "k" has characteristic 0, then "F" has an inverse function "G": "k" → "k", and "G" is regular (in the sense that its components are polynomials).
_	The name of the river is a composition of the Komi-permyak words "yay" (meat) and "va" (water), so it can be translated as "meat river", in the sense that it is rich with fish and animals.
_	This is a predictive confidence interval in the sense that if one uses a quantile range of 100"p"%, then on repeated applications of this computation, the future observation formula_16 will fall in the predicted interval 100"p"% of the time.
_	This puts pressure on Black in the sense that Black must carefully prepare any further pawn advancement when their bishop has no path of escape since White may attempt to capture that pawn after the eighth file pawn trade.
_	The Canadian government was starting to punish the rebels for their defiance, but the rebellion is still considered a success in the sense that the Metis were still able to acquire the land rights they hoped to achieve, as well as no longer being ignored when it came to federal matters.
_	If one consider the atomic network of silica as a mechanical truss, this structure is isostatic, in the sense that the number of constraints acting between the atoms equals the number of degrees of freedom of the latter.
_	Identity fusion can give people the sense that their existence is meaningful provided the person feels included within the society (e.g. In Japan, the definition of the word for self (jibun) roughly translates to “one’s share of the shared life space”).
_	The succession is supposed to be relatively conformable in the sense that breaks in deposition within the parasequence are much shorter than the time of deposition of the parasequence itself.
_	Currently it is used as a musical instrument similar to a MIDI controller in the sense that it has no inherent sound or effect, but rather produces control signals that can be used to control sound-production (or other effect.)
_	In response to the growing corruption, the economic dislocation, and the sense that reforms in the Soviet Union and Eastern Europe were leaving China behind, the Tiananmen Square protests erupted in 1989.
_	You get the sense that the band doesn’t care where they wind up as long as everything along the way is completely devastated."
_	It differs from the triangle in the sense that both boundary lines either slope up or down.
_	Then an Ehresmann connection "H" on "E" is said to be a principal (Ehresmann) connection if it is invariant with respect to the "G" action on "E" in the sense that
_	These two concepts are coordinately coherent in the sense that they arise jointly in the description of experiments of transfer of energy as heat.
_	It is asymmetrical in the sense that option modules (Digital terminology for expansion card) can communicate with the system module (Digital terminology for motherboard) and not with other option modules.
_	The importance of the Karhunen–Loève theorem is that it yields the best such basis in the sense that it minimizes the total mean squared error.
_	Bob has made a "mistake", in the sense that he has played differently from the way he would have played if he knew Carol held 8♦ 7♦, even though this "mistake" is almost certainly the best decision given the incomplete information available to him.
_	Rather, a system with a negative temperature is hotter than "any" system with a positive temperature, in the sense that if a negative-temperature system and a positive-temperature system come in contact, heat flows from the negative to the positive-temperature system.
_	Political leaders have at their disposal a great deal of patronage, in the sense that they make decisions on the appointment of officials inside and outside government (for example on quangos in the UK).
_	The above examples involving the harmonic series raise the question, whether there are monotone sequences such that decreases to 0 faster than but slower than in the sense that
_	A randomized algorithm that repeatedly replaces sets of "d" + 2 points by their Radon point can be used to compute an approximation to a centerpoint of any point set, in the sense that its
_	A subset "X" of a topological space "T" is compact with respect to the topology on "T" (in the sense that every open cover of "X" contains a finite subcover of "X") if and only if the set of open neighbourhoods of "X" is open with respect to the Scott topology.
_	She considers herself as “classic” in the sense that she works on fundamental elements such as form, color, material... that are universals and run through all of art history.
_	While the cards are not truly collectible, in the sense that the game is complete with a single purchase, it does feature deck design and deck optimization elements.
_	Spotnitz later explained, "it's similar […] in the sense that what you always thought happened to Samantha may not have actually happened.
_	According to her, "that fellowship gave me for the first time the sense that I was being taken seriously as a scientist.
_	Davis has compared these fictions to skyscrapers in the sense that they are surrounded by an imposing blank expanse.
_	Unlike the rest of the country, the Metropolitan Municipality has functions of regional government and is not part of any administrative region, according to Article 65. 27867 of the Law of Regional Governments enacted on 16 November 2002, 87 The previous political organization remains in the sense that a Governor is the political authority for the department and the city.
_	As it has been stated before, the condition of formula_52 is equivalent to the property that the best linear unbiased estimator of formula_53 is formula_54 (best in the sense that it has minimum variance).
_	The vector-function () resolves the constraint equations () in the sense that upon substituting () into () the equations () are fulfilled identically in formula_21.
_	But now we see that for "z" sufficiently close to "z" this has behavior asymptotically similar to the simpler polynomial formula_6, in the sense that (as is easy to check) the function formula_7 is bounded by some positive constant "M" in some neighborhood of "z".
_	Our performances fill a cultural gap in the sense that the majority of these are not staged in big theatres with a regular troupe of actors.
_	This method is not as general as variation of parameters in the sense that an annihilator does not always exist.
_	Forces contend wildly within the poem, not only without resolution, but without possibility of resolution; and the reader comes away from his experience with the sense that he has been in 'a wild Abyss'".
_	The gameplay is similar to "Civilization" style games in the sense that one controls the overall organization of the alien race on a scale far above that of controlling individual persons.
_	The freedom of speech conferred by section 58(1) of the Constitution is an absolute freedom in the sense that it is subject only to the rules and orders of the Assembly.
_	The Hamburg born critic Volker Hage identified in the three works "an underlying unity, not in the sense of a conventional trilogy ... but in the sense that they together form a single literary chord.
_	Capacity-building NGOs influence global affairs differently, in the sense that the incorporation of accountability measures in Southern NGOs affect "culture, structure, projects and daily operations".
_	This mission, though unsuccessful in the sense that Laika did not survive the mission, further established the USSR's position in the Cold War.
_	Yes and no: Yes in the sense that right now we aren't playing shows/touring.
_	The ferocity with which the Rainbow Snake guards or defends its sacred pools, or the reverence with which it was, and still is, thought of by Aboriginal tribes, indicates that it is a primal force in nature rather than a ‘God’ in the sense that many people in the Western world today would think of it.
_	"Every Day" and other short, mostly documentary films made within two or three years, reflected the concept of Free Cinema, films which were "free" in the sense that they were made outside the traditional structure of filmmaking.
_	In the United States, plenary regulation of theft exists only at the state level, in the sense that most thefts by default will be prosecuted by the state in which the theft occurred.
_	(Here the function "F" extends "f" in the sense that "f" is the restriction of "F" to formula_2.)
_	Unique in the sense that you can find the church, the convent and the Perpetual Adoration chapel all within the fort.
_	The modern almanac differs from Babylonian, Ptolemaic and Zij tables in the sense that "the entries found in the almanacs give directly the positions of the celestial bodies and need no further computation", in contrast to the more common "auxiliary astronomical tables" based on Ptolemy's "Almagest".
_	This motivated the States General to amend their resolution in the sense that the flotilla had to depart no later than 8 October.
_	He was lucky in the sense that his older brother, P.J. Hernon, played on the button accordion and was able to give him help whenever he got stuck in a tune.
_	Both routes are green in the sense that they do not generate stoichiometric amounts of salts.
_	"Esoteric sutras" comprise an important category of works that are esoteric, in the sense that they are often devoted to a particular mantra or dhāraṇī.
_	The cycle shapes are all balanced in the sense that they remain invariant under changing length "k" cycles to length "N"/"k" cycles for some integer "N" depending on the conjugacy class.
_	But it was miserable in the sense that it got recut by a very, very nice man [Monte Hellman]...
_	Most conservation laws are exact, or absolute, in the sense that they apply to all possible processes.
_	You really get the sense that Angelica's the smartest person in the room, and she reads Hamilton within a moment of meeting him."
_	These drawings are unique in the sense that although they depict stories from the ancient vedic culture, the characters' clothes, weapons, ornaments and other equipments and instruments are similar to those found in the 18th century.
_	The bridge is special in the sense that it is used both by the hourly local train travelling along the Kiel-Flensburg railway, and by car traffic.
_	This movement is also unusual in the sense that it is not in sonata form but rather a set of variations on a theme.
_	Privilege is absolute, in the sense that once it is established, it may not be weighed against any other countervailing public interest factor, but may only be overridden expressly by statute.
_	Others discuss ‘enforceability’ completeness in the sense that failing to specify key terms can lead a court to characterize a system as being too uncertain to enforce (May & Butcher v the King 1934), and hence a system may be complete with respect to enforceability.
_	It is unique in the sense that more than 250 species of birds are found here, but the speciality of the Abu sanctuary is the grey jungle fowl.
_	While Reyes compared it to Weezer, Rubano compared it to early Taking Back Sunday, in the sense that "it's a very simple song and about the energy you put behind it".
_	"This is an exhibition of contemporary art, not in the sense that it was done recently, but in that it is cased in the mentality, technology and philosophy of radical art of the most recent times.
_	Remains were recovered during all three of these JPAC missions, and the site was officially "closed" at the end of the 2008 mission, in the sense that JPAC believes that they have located all recoverable remains associated with the site.
_	Fundamental groups and homology and cohomology groups are not only "invariants" of the underlying topological space, in the sense that two topological spaces which are homeomorphic have the same associated groups, but their associated morphisms also correspond — a continuous mapping of spaces induces a group homomorphism on the associated groups, and these homomorphisms can be used to show non-existence (or, much more deeply, existence) of mappings.
_	According to anthropologist Stefan Goodwin, at his stage "faltering religious pluralism still existed in the sense that Orthodox Christians, Jews, and Muslims still constituted a substantial minority of the population."
_	Processing is flexible in the sense that it can even cope with partially ungrammatical or incomplete sentences.
_	This set is even "more uncountable" than R in the sense that the cardinality of this set is formula_5 (beth-two), which is larger than formula_4.
_	Additionally, every well-covered graph is a critical graph for vertex covering in the sense that, for every vertex , deleting from the graph produces a graph with a smaller minimum vertex cover.
_	I say seriously in the sense that like other kids go home and practice the violin or the piano or whatever, I used to go home from school every day, and I would write for about three hours.
_	In classical mechanics, a special status is assigned to time in the sense that it is treated as a classical background parameter, external to the system itself.
_	Perhaps merely the sense that someone had become too arrogant or prominent was enough to get someone's name onto an ostrakon.
_	Chemist Dean Tantillo from the University of California, Davis, commented to "Science News" that "[i]t's super important that people realize that, although we're taught carbon can only have four friends, carbon can be associated with more than four atoms" and added that the "carbon isn't making six bonds in the sense that we usually think of a carbon-carbon bond as a two-electron bond."
_	One of the basic dualities of string theory is T-duality, which states that a string propagating around a circle of radius formula_1 is equivalent to a string propagating around a circle of radius formula_2 in the sense that all observable quantities in one description are identified with quantities in the dual description.
_	Joel Coen cites Robert Altman's "The Long Goodbye" as a primary influence on their film, in the sense that "The Big Lebowski" "is just kind of informed by Chandler around the edges".
_	Röhl wrote that Eulenburg was not a homosexual in the sense that most people would understand the term—namely someone who has relationships only with people of the same sex—but was rather a bisexual with a strong preference for men over women.
_	This system was exceptional in the sense that it was one of the few traditional systems in western historical records of India that gave women some liberty and the right to property.
_	Although Hungary assured prosperity to the city, in the interpretation of autonomists, Hungarian rule was provisory in the sense that it could always have been receded.
_	Viewers have the sense that Vallejo is not yet finished with her social critique.
_	A classifier, therefore, implies that the object(s) referred to are countable in the sense that the speaker intends them to be enumerated, rather than considered as a unit (regardless of quantity).
_	This almost equilateral shape is therefore used as a setting for armorials from this "classical age" of heraldry, in the sense that it produced the best examples of the art.
_	Transfinite numbers are numbers that are "infinite" in the sense that they are larger than all finite numbers, yet not necessarily absolutely infinite.
_	This is only an "error" in the sense that it would automatically be corrected if the totality were itself assessed.
_	The answer to this question is negative, in the sense that no "process can be devised" for answering that question.
_	Abouet denies that "Aya" is autobiographical, except in the sense that it depicts the Ivory Coast that she is familiar with.
_	The pier emerged as a modern amusement park, virtually unique in the sense that there are rides as you first enter, with the rest dotted throughout the length of the pier.
_	Note that information can still be "private", in the sense that a person may not wish for it to become publicly known, without being personally identifiable.
_	Nonetheless, the experience impressed on the young Hazlitt, at 20, the sense that not only philosophy, to which he had devoted himself, but also poetry warranted appreciation for what it could teach, and the three-week visit stimulated him to pursue his own thinking and writing.
_	"The Autobiography of an Androgyne" also describes how June felt that she lived a double life in the sense that she was an educated, middle-class white male scholar but also had intense yearnings for performing sexual acts that actually distracted her and caused her suffering.
_	The more recently developed framework of violator spaces generalizes LP-type problems, in the sense that every LP-type problem can be modeled by a violator space but not necessarily vice versa.
_	The concept is akin to that of a text font or a MIDI instrument in the sense that the same input may easily be represented in several different ways based on the design of each font.
_	This may convey the sense that a person is boring or unduly fussy and be intended as an insult, mainly when used in the second or third person.
_	Jon Hughes in Berlin and Clark Lagarias at UC Davis subsequently showed that this gene indeed encoded a "bona fide" phytochrome (named Cph1) in the sense that it is a red/far-red reversible chromoprotein.
_	The decomposition () expresses the Riemann tensor as an orthogonal direct sum, in the sense that
_	When solved as described here, the curve will be arbitrage free in the sense that it is exactly consistent with the selected prices; see Rational pricing#Fixed income securities and Bond valuation#Arbitrage-free pricing approach.
_	A wildcard "blocks itself" in the sense that a wildcard does not match its own subdomains.
_	Duo Interpretation differs from the other events in the sense that the most important element is how well the duo partners work with each other.
_	The routine of putting an apron on before doing ones work can even begin to feel slightly ceremonial, in the sense that it prepares them mentally and physically for the task at hand.
_	An EDS is a divisibility sequence in the sense that
_	It is known that this list is strictly increasing in difficulty in the sense that there are examples of contact 3-manifolds with weak but no strong filling, and others that have strong but no Stein filling.
_	NATRES is a corps in the sense that it is a regiment which recruits nationally.
_	AllMusic reviewed the album giving it a score of 4 out of 5, saying "The most striking aspect of Ufabulum is the sense that Jenkinson is building on top of foundations he laid himself.
_	The differential equation preserves symplecticity in the sense that
_	The Hebrew word "Merari" means "sad", "bitter" or "strong" (in the sense that a dish with a bitter taste might be said to have a "strong" taste).
_	Consequently, a feature image can be seen as an image in the sense that it is a function of the same spatial (or temporal) variables as the original image, but where the pixel values hold information about image features instead of intensity or color.
_	The 100 hp engine was also an overhead-valve engine in the sense that the port opened directly into the cylinder head, though the valves were mounted horizontally.
_	We say that a natural transformation is tensor-preserving if it is the identity map on the trivial representation of "G", and if it preserves tensor products in the sense that formula_15.
_	All these concepts are effective, in the sense that their definition include a method of computation.
_	This interpretation became influential, but Richter argues that while the Grand Council served an important ceremonial role, it was not a government in the sense that Morgan thought.
_	Here it is "best" in the sense that it minimised the asymptotic variance and thus both minimised the expected absolute value of the error, and maximised the probability that the estimate would lie in any symmetric interval about the unknown coefficient, no matter what the error distribution.
_	When the structure is laid out in memory, the compiler will produce interleaved data, in the sense that all the structures will be contiguous but there will be a constant offset between, say, the "size" attribute of a structure instance and the same element of the following instance.
_	This proof could be counter-intuitive, in the sense that the departure process of a birth-death process is independent of the service offered.
_	With this CD, as with her past projects, you get the sense that Dawn Robinson will always embrace the opportunity to experiment.
_	To some degree their "esprit de corps" depended on the myth, which they themselves created, of a movement that was more "authentically Russian," in the sense that it was closer to the native soil, than the classic academy.
_	Wh. The energy in such a calculation is virtual in the sense that it was never consumed but rather saved due to some energy efficiency investment being made.
_	Thus, in Arundell's view, even if the basement sealing expense was not ordinary in the sense that it was unique expense in the life of Midland as an individual, it still could be "ordinary" within the meaning of 23(a) because taking steps to protect a business from the seepage of oil to protect one's property was a common, normal thing for businesses to do in general.
_	stellar pulsations are only weakly nonlinear in the sense that one can limit oneself to low powers of the pulsation amplitudes to describe them.
_	For Spinoza "knowledge" is "life", not in the sense that contemplation is the highest life, but in the sense that knowledge is the means of holding together the threads of life in a systematic unity that can fill its proper place in the cosmic system.
_	"Comic Shop News", in their 2011 Red K Awards, gave the "Done and Undone" Award to the crossover, criticizing its "blink or you'll miss it" practice of killing characters in the miniseries and then resurrecting them in the "Point-One" aftermath books, and the sense that no change to the status quo had taken place by the end of the entire series.
_	So, baptism is necessary in the sense that the Lord commands us to administer baptism: it is not for us to decide whether or not we are going to do what the Lord says."
_	This typical set consists of the likely errors in the sense that
_	Ti(IV) compound in the sense that it is tetrahedral and diamagnetic.
_	Another difficulty with antagonistic pleiotropy and other theories that suppose that ageing is an adverse side effect of some beneficial function is that the linkage between adverse and beneficial effects would need to be "rigid" in the sense that the evolution process would not be able to evolve a way to accomplish the benefit without incurring the adverse effect even over a very long time span.
_	The table is (partly) sorted from smallest to largest, in the sense that o, O, Θ, ∼, (Knuth's version of) Ω, ω on functions correspond to <, ≤, ≈, =, ≥, > on the real line (the Hardy-Littlewood version of Ω, however, doesn't correspond to any such description).
_	Manava would have not have been a mathematician in the sense that we would understand it today.
_	By contrast, several thousands of these four-character compounds are true idioms in the sense that they have a particular meaning that may not be deducted from the literal meanings of the component words.
_	Weaver's philosophy shares an epistemological orientation with some forms of existentialism in that it posits that the axioms underlying all human belief systems are ultimately arbitrary (in the sense that they cannot be derived, or anchored in something anterior) and are thus a product of the exercise of ultimate choice rather than empirical evidence.
_	It is a framework in the sense that it prescribes steps to reach the common goal rather than adopting the more traditional limit value approach.
_	Princeton University poetry professor Craig Dworkin, said that he did not like the poem, but added "I do like the sense that a poet can be disturbing and not necessarily comforting or consensus-building."
_	The second transition is tonally unnecessary, in the sense that the episode has already landed back on the tonic, E flat, with an emphatic cadence; but Schubert disguises this fact by carrying out a feint towards F major again, the key in which the first episode had ended.
_	Local helioseismology is thus somewhat closer in spirit to geoseismology in the sense that it studies the complete wavefield.
_	The real power was invested in the three permanent members of the "Raad van State", the High Council, Cardinal Granvelle, Viglius and Berlaymont (later the three were called the Consultá; they were permanent members in the sense that for their office they stayed at court, while the non-permanent members mostly executed functions abroad).
_	The village was self-sufficient in the sense that it had all that was required for a village community, viz, provisional stores, tea shops, hotels, textile shops, tailor shops, "Vaidyans", small lodges, library, an upper primary school, ration shop, slaughter houses and mosque, etc.
_	In some color spaces, including the LMS and XYZ spaces, the primary colors used are not real colors in the sense that they cannot be generated in any light spectrum.
_	SIOP, and its renamed successors, is most importantly an "integrated" plan that uses both Air Force and Navy delivery systems; it is "single" only in the sense that it comes out of one planning group.
_	Talk rated the film 1/5 stars and said, ""Zombie Wars" is not a terrible film in the sense that it is not completely unwatchable.
_	It is not a physical door, in the sense that it be found at a single location, but rather a collection of locations.
_	He said, "It's a serial in the sense that we have continuing stories, and in that sense the show is one big novel."
_	The word is derived from the word 'aqiba meaning heel, from here the word is understood in the sense that it follows the following as his heels at the heels of putting the race.
_	Values of Y drawn from a high-slope region are unstable, in the sense that a small change in X causes a large change in Y; values of Y drawn from a low-slope region are conversely stable, in that they are little perturbed by large changes in X. Stevens proposed in 1968 that the stability of low-slope regions makes them more likely to be chosen as discrete linguistic units (phonemes) by the languages of the world, and that the distinction between any pair of phonemes tends similarly to occur across an unstable high-slope boundary region.
_	In 2017, the philosopher Marco Stango, in a paper on John Dewey's approach to the problem of consciousness (which preceded Chalmers' formulation of the hard problem by over half a century), noted that Dewey's approach would see the hard problem as the consequence of an unjustified assumption that feelings and functional behaviors are not the same physical process: "For the Deweyan philosopher, the 'hard problem' of consciousness is a 'conceptual fact' only in the sense that it is a : the mistake of failing to see that the physical can be had as an episode of immediate sentiency."
_	Nicholas Lezard wrote that the music of the period "was avant-garde, open to any musical possibilities that suggested themselves, united only in the sense that it was very often cerebral, concocted by brainy young men and women interested as much in disturbing the audience, or making them think, as in making a pop song".
_	It was penal also in the sense that it was for double damages in case of denial, but this alone did not cause an action to be regarded as penal.
_	This aspect also relates to the curriculum in the sense that lessons and activities provide focus on various aspects of the student and not just rote memorization through note taking and lecturing.
_	... individuals are subjects-of-a-life if they have beliefs and desires; perception, memory, and a sense of the future, including their own future; an emotional life together with feelings of pleasure and pain; preference- and welfare-interests; the ability to initiate action in pursuit of their desires and goals; a psychophysical identity over time; and an individual welfare in the sense that their experiential life fares well or ill for them, logically independently of their utility for others and logically independently of their being the object of anyone else's interests.
_	A material that does not satisfy these criteria is often found to be unstable in the sense that application of a load to a material point can lead to arbitrary deformations at that material point unless an additional length or time scale is specified in the constitutive relations.
_	They are particularly important when "X" has infinite dimension, in the sense that the "X" do not become constant as
_	The Code adopts a principles-based approach in the sense that it provides general guidelines of best practice.
_	Secondly, "x" is a rational class, in the sense that it lies in the image of the abelian group homomorphism
_	This treatise is unique in the sense that this is an independent work, not a commentary of an earlier work, which was the common practice of the day.
_	Many mom-and-pop businesses line the avenue, giving the sense that entrepreneurial activity is greater than most other neighborhoods of Newark.
_	However, assertiveness training did have a potential flaw in the sense that it could not be applied to other kinds of phobias.
_	As for shoelaces in the sense that we know them in modern times, the Museum of London has documented examples of medieval footwear dating from as far back as the 12th century, which clearly show the lacing passing through a series of hooks or eyelets down the front or side of the shoe.
_	Ejemar said "Perhaps the album has been called "Perfect" in the sense that there is no harm or personality here." saying the most exciting part is "the sparkling background Andersson poses in front of the cover".
_	For them, breastfeeding was considered unfashionable, in the sense that it not only prevented these women from being able to wear the fashionable clothing of their time but it was also thought to ruin their figures.
_	Norwegian student loans are similar "subsidized" federal loans in the United States, in the sense that no interest is paid until graduation or an interruption of the education.
_	Or, the privilege may be regarded as absolute in the sense that the court will not permit an inquiry into motive or purpose, since this could result in subjecting the honest person to harassing litigation and claims.
_	Upon the opening of that extension in 1962, Norwegian railway construction was complete, in the sense that all subsequent work can be regarded as modernization or capacity expansion of existing railways:
_	Let be a sequence of closed intervals, and suppose that these intervals are nested in the sense that
_	Stevens used the rule to "explain" greater species diversity in the tropics in the sense that latitudinal gradients in species diversity and the rule have identical exceptional data and so must have the same underlying cause.
_	The Installation itself is like a “black hole” in the sense that people arrive from the outside, but nobody ever seems to leave - except perhaps in death.
_	There were no intact skeletons, indicating the site was not used as a burial place in the sense that bodies were placed there immediately after or even close to the time of death.
_	He has mastered more than 30 languages in the sense that he has the theoretical and practical knowledge that makes it possible for him to communicate in them, but he can make translations, read, and write in others.
_	It is a natural question to ask: under which conditions can two categories be considered "essentially the same", in the sense that theorems about one category can readily be transformed into theorems about the other category?
_	Suppose that γ("t") is a curve in "M" with , which is "differentiable" in the sense that its composition with any chart is a differentiable curve in R.
_	However there is no official "national identity card" in the United States, in the sense that there is no federal agency with nationwide jurisdiction that directly issues an identity document to all US citizens for mandatory regular use.
_	When he actually achieved unification, he renamed the temple Samhwasa (lit. “Harmony of the Three” Temple) in the sense that Goryeo, Later Baekje and Silla would end their ongoing conflict and coexist in harmony.
_	The two approaches are equivalent in the sense that knowing one of the functions it is always possible to find the other, yet they provide different insights for understanding the features of the random variable.
_	Once the annexation took place, the Department approved of the action "in the sense that it represents a logical development of the situation which took place as a result of a free expression of the will of the people...
_	They are modern art in the sense that he broke with the artistic conventions of the past, but they remained figurative art with a narrative.
_	You get the sense that there's some hurt there, some pain that's stopped him becoming involved with other women [...] he likes the spirit of her.
_	Money is tamper-evident in the sense that it should be difficult to produce a financial token without authorization, even if starting from a token of lower value.
_	In particular, if "X" is simply connected then it is a geodesic space in the sense that any two points are connected by a unique minimizing geodesic, and hence contractible.
_	The term "prime minister" in the sense that we know it originated in the 18th century in the United Kingdom when members of parliament disparagingly used the title in reference to Sir Robert Walpole.
_	Determinacy refers to the fact that, under appropriate assumptions, certain two-player games of perfect information are determined from the start in the sense that one player must have a winning strategy.
_	These were not volunteers in the sense that they were unpaid staffers volunteering their time, rather Benson paid their salaries out of his own pocket, making them volunteers in the sense that they did not draw state salaries.
_	Marx's analysis of value was dialectical, in the sense that he thought value phenomena could only be understood dynamically, holistically and relationally, but he did not spell out all the conceptual, quantitative and logical implications of his position with great exactitude.
_	In the sense that the purpose of precise attribution is to extend the scholarly convention of giving citation credit, the provenance of a piece of scholarship (observation or data deposition) is recognized to give credit and priority to a preceding author.
_	Such functions are robust to parameters in the sense that they are independent of the values of the parameters, but not robust to the model in the sense that they assume an underlying model (parametric family), and in fact such functions are often very sensitive to violations of the model assumptions.
_	From SO(6) onwards they are almost simple in the sense that the factor groups of their centres are simple groups.
_	Maus thinks that Mapes drew too fine a line between vehicular cyclists like John Forester and more mainstream cycling advocates, saying "I think some readers might get the sense that the battle for ideas between VC advocates and more mainstream advocates... is greater than it actually is."
_	Both theorems are best possible in the sense that, given any formula_16, the list formula_17 has total degree formula_16 and only the trivial solution.
_	The "Los Angeles Times" reported at the time that the Chaplin Studio "has been more or less sacrosanct, in the sense that outsiders were practically never permitted to work there."
_	The reader gets the sense that Grimes is a very busy character, as he makes reference to separate adventures happening during lulls in the current escapade, where other writers might simply use phrases like "two weeks later..." etc.
_	Conversely, () characterizes the Laplace–Beltrami operator completely, in the sense that it is the only operator with this property.
_	The different treatment of photographs and other artistic works was eliminated by European Union Directive 93/98/EEC (Art. 6), which states that the only applicable criterion for copyright protection is that the photograph be "original in the sense that they are the author's own intellectual creation", a lower criterion than used until then, but equivalent to the criterion used for other copyright works.
_	1. One can show that this operator interacts nicely with the Chas–Sullivan product in the sense that they form together the structure of a Batalin–Vilkovisky algebra on formula_52.
_	Cells on the extreme right are actually 'adjacent' to those on the far left, in the sense that the corresponding input values only differ by one bit's; similarly, so are those at the very top and those at the bottom.
_	She claimed that the tracks in which featured guest artists "get the sense that the guys she's trading verses with are trying to keep up with her and not the other way around," noting that the platinum edition "launched the monster hit "Quiero Bailar".
_	Duluth FC is unique in the sense that it requires its players and supporters to follow certain rules when it comes to match day behavior, requesting that both avoid swearing and other forms of offensive language.
_	This view does not preclude a belief that God also has a relationship with other peoples—rather, Judaism holds that God had entered into a covenant with all humanity as Noachides, and that Jews and non-Jews alike have a relationship with God, as well as being universal in the sense that it is open to all mankind.
_	One set of plates to which the Book of Mormon refers was "sealed up" in the sense that they were written in a language that could not be read.
_	Brazilian jiu-jitsu and judo matches do not allow striking, but are full-contact in the sense that full force is applied in the permitted grappling and submission techniques.
_	Competitions held by the World Taekwondo Federation requires the use of Headgear and padded vest, but are full contact in the sense that full force is applied to strikes to the head and body, and win by knockout is possible.
_	There’s nothing too heady here, but if the show has one tone that it's nailed almost completely consistently, it’s the feeling of teenage romance, the sense that the person you're in love with is the only person you will ever be in love with [...] followed almost immediately by the crippling feeling of heartbreak, of losing that person too soon.
_	"There can be a development of doctrine in the sense that we can understand the same doctrine in a different way, but a change whereby, overnight, you say that what was wrong is now right, that is just not on the cards."
_	in the sense that the ratio of the left-hand side to the right-hand side converges to 1 as "n" → ∞.
_	GPUE is a way to "weigh" the PUE to better see which data centers are truly green in the sense that they indirectly cause the least amount of CO to be emitted by their use of sustainable or unsustainable energy sources.
_	You wanted to get the sense that the conversation was drawing them closer".
_	The reason this analysis is possible at all is due to the digestive system not being entirely efficient, in the sense that not everything that passes through the digestive system is destroyed.
_	When asked why the video is "so stark", Beattie compared it to kōans and haikus in the sense that "it tries to ask the question in the most interesting manner possible," and added that "[they] wanted the effects to be done right in front of your eyes" so that "the magic and illusion are all the more powerful."
_	Conversely, the thirds and sixths were tempered severely from pure ratios, and in practice usually treated as dissonances in the sense that they had to resolve to form complete perfect cadences and stable sonorities .
_	Barbour did not believe that the rail, Zapata sparrow and Zapata wren were relics in the sense that they once ranged widely over Cuba (as did, for example, the dwarf hutia and the Cuban crocodile), since the birds are so highly modified for swamp conditions.
_	A satellite "link" is one that orbits a companion knot "K" in the sense that it lies inside a regular neighborhood of the companion.
_	In the report, the authors advocate to maintain unequal distribution of wealth in the sense that "…society and governments need to be amenable to disproportionately allow/encourage the few to retain that fatter profit share.
_	It may not be a net contributor in the sense that it works on organic material which used up atmospheric carbon dioxide when it was created, but its overall effect is to convert the carbon dioxide into methane which is a much more potent greenhouse gas.
_	For example, in the above blood type example, only three of the four dummy variables are independent, in the sense that once the values of three of the variables are known, the fourth is automatically determined.
_	"The New York Times" reporter Binyamin Appelbaum compared Disney's spectacular success with the "Frozen" merchandise brand to the pharmaceutical industry, in the sense that the actual consumer of the product is usually not the person who is stuck with the bill:
_	Such a resolution is unique up to isomorphism, and is a minimal flat resolution in the sense that any flat resolution of "M" factors through it.
_	The Hawk 200 differs from the earlier Hawks in the sense that it has a new forward fuselage whereby the forward cockpit area which normally houses a pilot is replaced by an electronics bay for avionics and onboard systems, including a fire control computer, multi-mode radar, laser rangefinder and forward-looking infrared (FLIR).
_	Her theory differed in the sense that the human being could not exist until the divine soul/mind coexisted with the body/matter.
_	"I believe that 'the dead command,' although not in the sense that reactionaries have traditionally given the phrase.
_	"TransGeneration" is provocative, yes, but only in the sense that it's straightforward, unflinching, and, in the end, wholly unsensational."
_	The virions of certain viruses sometimes exhibit pleomorphism, in the sense that their appearances can vary.
_	Questions have however been raised about such an approach when it is more than merely instrumental, in the sense that "reverse psychology implies a clever manipulation of the misbehaving child" and nothing more.
_	It is a model-free measure in the sense that it simply relies on calculating the estimator again with a different sample.
_	Delhi was closed, in the sense that all the malls, shops, offices, and call-centers in Delhi were closed before and during the ceremony.
_	Unique in the sense that one can actually get a summary of what to expect from the town just be looking at the figures.
_	However, this feature is optional in the sense that a program written with Muesli still compiles and runs on a single-core, multi-node cluster computer without changes to the source code, i.e. backward compatibility is guaranteed.
_	The Verma module is one particular such highest-weight module, one that is maximal in the sense that every other highest-weight module with highest weight formula_1 is a quotient of the Verma module.
_	It's metaphorical in the sense that it depicts both aspects of my life; light and darkness.
_	While these arts are based on historical traditions of folklore, they are not "historical" in the sense that they reconstruct or preserve a historical system from a specific era.
_	Although it never uses the term, The Church of Jesus Christ of Latter-day Saints (LDS Church) is episcopal, rather than presbyterian or congregational, in the sense that it has a strict hierarchy of leadership from the local bishop/branch president up to a single prophet/president, believed to be personally authorized and guided by Jesus Christ.
_	After the release of his debut solo album "Justified" in 2002, Timberlake thought he "lost his voice" in the sense that he did not like what he was doing.
_	Two morphisms between sheaves determine a continuous map of the corresponding étalé spaces that is compatible with the projection maps (in the sense that every germ is mapped to a germ over the same point).
_	“Rule by democratic elites is more democratic than thick democratic participation – in the sense that it is more likely, at least in theory, to protect civil liberties and minority rights.”.
_	The metaphor is apt in the sense that the software "robot" is now mimicking or replacing a function classically associated with a person, for example in IVR voice recognition and chatbot technology as a means of data collection and distribution, in place of a person conducting a telephone conversation, for example.
_	They are trivial in the sense that their existence is relatively easy to prove, for example, from being 0 in the functional equation.
_	When employees get the sense that bullies are tolerated, a climate of fear may be the result.
_	As varies, is assumed to be a smooth function in the sense that
_	has shown that it measures the difference between the algebraic K-theory of Z and R, the integers and the reals, respectively, in the sense that there is a homotopy fiber sequence
_	FRIIs appear to be able to transport energy efficiently to the ends of the lobes, while FRI beams are inefficient in the sense that they radiate a significant amount of their energy away as they travel.
_	An acnode is a critical point, or singularity, of the defining polynomial function, in the sense that both partial derivatives formula_7 and formula_8 vanish.
_	Not in the sense that, like so many other European composers, he based his music exclusively on folk music, but more in his exploitation of national themes.
_	This is the most serious of the games, in the sense that its ostensible object (to create a funny poem on the spot) is precisely the actual object for which the panellists are aiming.
_	By contrast, the EM far-field is composed of "radiation" that is free of the transmitter in the sense that (unlike the case in an electrical transformer) the transmitter requires the same power to send these changes in the fields out, whether the signal is immediately picked up or not.
_	This causes them to be independent in the sense that their existence and their energy, after they have left the transmitter, is completely independent of both transmitter and receiver.
_	Suppose the two particles are perfectly anti-correlated—in the sense that whenever both measured in the same direction, one gets identically opposite outcomes, when both measured in opposite directions they always give the same outcome.
_	Compare also the particles used in the names of two of the books of the Māori Bible: "Te Pukapuka a Heremaia" (The Book of Jeremiah) with "Te Pukapuka o Hōhua" (The Book of Joshua); the former belongs to Jeremiah in the sense that he was the author, but the Book of Joshua was written by someone else about Joshua.
_	These isomorphisms are "natural" in the sense that they define a natural transformation between the two involved functors .
_	Moreover, the pair ("Q", "q") must be universal in the sense that given any other such pair ("Q"′, "q"′) there exists a unique morphism "u" : "Q" → "Q"′ for which the following diagram commutes:
_	In theoretical computer science a simulation preorder is a relation between state transition systems associating systems which behave in the same way in the sense that one system "simulates" the other.
_	The issue of file sharing is becoming especially problematic for the entertainment industry in the sense that fast broadband connections have become even more common within Mexico, doubling to 61 percent of Web-enabled Mexicans in the last two years.
_	However, recent historical/archaeological sources challenge the Abyssinian paradigm in the sense that Adulis was the center of a kingdom that was not a constituent part of the Axumite kingdom, on the earlier period prior to the emergence of Aksum.
_	are equivalent, in the sense that whenever one of statements (i–iv) is true, all other statements also hold.
_	I am really, therefore, quite happy that I, at least, should have ended this way, in the sense that it may serve to urge self-reflection on many more members of the military of that time.
_	Accordingly a religious person is devout in the sense that he has no doubt of the significance of those super-personal objects and goals which neither require nor are capable of rational foundation ...
_	We all found it bewildering, but I had the sense that Chris probably felt this more so than the rest of us."
_	"Of Natural History" has a continuity in the sense that all the songs sequence into each other, thus holding the narrative element(s) of the album better together.
_	Furthermore, it is economic in the sense that it requires a number of model evaluations that is linear in the number of model factors.
_	The matrix expressing with respect to is almost upper triangular, in the sense that the coefficients are the only nonzero sub-diagonal coefficients.
_	One of the most present criticisms presented by Ortiz is that many Mapuche parents do not consider IBE to be an adequate program for their children in the sense that it does not equip students with the sufficient, necessary tools for them to obtain social upward mobility in mainstream Chilean society.
_	A person with ENS may complain of pain in their nose or face, an inability to sleep and fatigue, and feeling irritated, depressed, or anxious; they may be constantly distracted by the sense that they are not getting enough air.
_	The simplest theory is the more informative, in the sense that it requires less information to a question.
_	"Congruence" is used in the sense that two entities, linguistic categories in this case, are congruent if they correspond in respect of relevant qualities.
_	Lateef is referring here to the complete in the sense that it contains the completeness of his musical vision at a given time... an album that is as fine as any of his Prestige or Impulse!
_	TO is different from shape optimization and sizing optimization in the sense that the design can attain any shape within the design space, instead of dealing with predefined configurations.
_	Writer Patrick Ferris said he has "a mass appeal in the sense that any audience between the age of 2 and 102 are captivated by his vaudeville antics, hilarious lyrics and animated guitar playing...
_	The calls for a "Topklasse" largely stemmed from the professionalization of amateur football clubs in the Netherlands in recent years, in the sense that many Hoofdklasse club players now receive a salary.
_	"ALEC is unique in the sense that it puts legislators and companies together and they create policy collectively," said Scott Pruitt, then an Oklahoma state representative and ALEC task force chair.
_	Though the composition sounds "static", in the sense that its length makes it seem like a solid "lump" of sound, it features many unstable elements that change in both timbre and volume over its entirety.
_	It is to Caus that the term "work" is owed in the sense that it is used in the field of mechanics.
_	The harmonic mean is a Schur-concave function, and dominated by the minimum of its arguments, in the sense that for any positive set of arguments, formula_6.
_	Experience has shown that the formulation of maximin models can be subtle in the sense that problems that 'do not look like' maximin problems can be formulated as such.
_	The "Art of Fighting" series follows the conventions of the time in the sense that the player faces a variety of opponents in best two-out-of-three matches.
_	Motivational interviewing (MI) is similar to motivational therapy in the sense that it attempts not to create change within an individual but give foundation and support to the change the individual finds within him or her self.
_	A company can utilize these different categories like a series of levers in the sense that all are usually available, but only one or two may drive revenue in a given situation.
_	in the sense that the ratio of and that fraction approaches 1 when tends to infinity.
_	The financial accelerator also exists in emerging market crises in the sense that adverse shocks to a small open economy may be amplified by worsening international financial market conditions.
_	According to the authors of "The Architecture of Georgia", his La Grange houses, built in the 1830's, look "old-fashioned" in the sense that they followed the pattern set by Daniel Pratt in Milledgeville in the 1820's.
_	This kingdom was "southern" in the sense that it was located south of other Baiyue kingdoms such as Minyue and Ouyue, located in modern Fujian and Zhejiang.
_	Suppose also that we can realize "T" as convolution against a kernel "K" in the sense that, whenever "f" and "g" are smooth and have disjoint support
_	These were harmonised by article 6, which states that the only permissible criterion for full protection (70 years pma) is that the photograph is "original in the sense that [it is] the author's own intellectual creation".
_	The imagery is figurative in the sense that the demons represented visually in the icon are the sins that man battles with internally.
_	"Entertainment Weekly"s Dylan Kickham compared the song to that of Banks' work on her debut album, in the sense that both contain "fast, aggressive rap verses over a dancefloor-ready electronic beat and a sing-song bridge", although did not clarify whether this was good or bad.
_	in the sense that formula_27.
_	Although the term had a prior history, Haseltine is credited with widespread use of the term "regenerative medicine," particularly in the sense that it is used today.
_	The strategy is optimal in the sense that the strategy will maximize the voter's expected utility when the number of voters is sufficiently large.
_	And Anglican theologian and bishop Hugh Montefiore says, "Baptism is efficacious if it is asked for in faith, in the sense that it enacts sacramentally what has been begun spiritually, and the very fact that it is an outward and visible sign both strengthens the faith of the baptized and is a public witness to that faith."
_	The axioms of a biquandle are "minimal" in the sense that they are the weakest restrictions that can be placed on the two binary operations while making the biquandle of a virtual knot invariant under Reidemeister moves.
_	Looking back at the last century, with its devastating wars and holocausts and the shock of ecological vulnerability, I have the sense that religious traditions must now have a wider mission, and it is in the recognition of this mission, I believe, that interreligious dialogue becomes something not only polite and interesting, but also essential."
_	Social media has created a new market for sports that was not around before in the sense that players and fans have instant access to information related to sports.
_	"Ṭahor", by contrast, is defined as "pure" in the sense that the person or object is in a clear state and can/may potentially serve as a conduit for Divine and Godly manifestation.
_	Indeed, Lisa Appignanesi has written that 'her memoir sometimes fills one with the sense that she experienced her own existence to be an "as if" — living her life first "as if" a socialist in her identification with Lieberman; "as if" a conventional wife with Felix; "as if" a mother...then "as if" a psychoanalyst in the identification with Freud'.<ref name="Appignanesi/Forrester, p. 322">Appignanesi/Forrester, p. 322</ref>
_	These phenomena became known as cellular senescence, and could be viewed as both helpful and harmful to an organism; It could be helpful in a sense that the senescence could act as a powerful tumor-suppressive mechanism, but harmful in the sense that it could result in the accumulation of non-dividing cells in healthy tissues which could lead to impaired regenerative capacity and function.
_	They were still excluded from Parliament in the sense that the oath required before taking a seat was repugnant to them, and from the higher offices, and from being king's counsel, but in all other respects they were placed on a level with Protestants.
_	Notwithstanding its traces of etymology, the 1911 orthography aimed to be phonetic in the sense that, given the spelling of a word, there would be no ambiguity about its pronunciation.
_	They are invariant by translation (changing the frame of reference so that directions are not altered), by rotation (turning the frame of reference around some axis), or parity (changing the sense of axes) in the sense that the interaction does not change under any of these operations.
_	Once the object ball is moving it is like a "time-bomb" in the sense that when it stops moving the location of the cue ball on the table will (may) determine the winner of the point, i.e. if the cue ball is on your side of table when the object ball stops moving, you lose the point.
_	They are immortal in the sense that they don't die of old age or disease (the eldest of them is roughly four and one half billion years old), though they can be killed or die from grief.
_	This program increases the number of workers available, and makes several key changes, such as allowing "permanent" guest workers (in the sense that the nonimmigrant agricultural visa would be portable from employer to employer as seasons change, rather than requiring a new visa for each season as the current H-2A program does) rather than only seasonal workers as the current H-2A program does.
_	Alison Kelly wrote, "[T]he best stories in NOON are, indeed, stunning, in the sense that they leave one conscious of powerful meanings not yet fully absorbed.
_	So it is a sharp village, but not in the sense that people are sharp.
_	Grocery delivery differs greatly from meal delivery in the sense that its is usually sent as a parcel through common mailing services like USPS or FedEx.
_	The court then examined the beta crystalline form of imatinib mesylate and wrote that it, "for the sake of argument, may be accepted to be new, in the sense that it is not known from the Zimmermann patent.
_	so-called , which in a filtered probability space describes the information up to the random time formula_29 in the sense that, if the filtered probability space is interpreted as a random experiment, the maximum information that can be found out about the experiment from arbitrarily often repeating it until the time formula_29 is formula_31.
_	"The Independent"'s review was also positive, saying "what really holds the thing together is an underlying sympathy, the sense that these characters might be comically foolish but they aren't (with some exceptions) contemptible."
_	Bellanton was unusual in the sense that she started and developed her business by herself rather than on money left to her by a former white lover.
_	MTM was the first of a series of predetermined motion time systems, predetermined in the sense that estimates of time are not determined in loco but are derived from an industry standard.
_	This time Marais accused De Klerk and his cronies of being "retarded (slow) communists", in the sense that they were handing concession after concession to the ANC/SACP alliance.
_	This means that if the preferences are represented by a utility function, its value is an "ordinal" utility in the sense that it is meaningful so far as the greater value indicates the better alternative.
_	Sutton-Smith argues that the seventh rhetoric, frivolity, serves as a responsive rhetoric, in the sense that nonhegemonic forms of play are often deemed frivolous.
_	The sabbatarian Churches of God persist in their worship of Jesus and the Father; insisting that in their worship of the "plural" God, "Elohim" (Gods), as multiple separate and individual God-beings of which only the Father and Son are now very God, they are practicing monotheism, in the sense that "Elohim" is one family unit.
_	Nor is it typical in the sense of common or frequently occurring in the population, though it appears familiar, and is typical in the sense that it is a good example of a face that is representative of the category of faces.
_	He actually co-founded The Great Society along with Jerry, Darby, and Grace Slick as well as Bard Du Pont, in the sense that he was there from the start.
_	Although it has the Supreme Court of South-West Africa as its predecessor, the latter was not a supreme court in the sense that appeals against its rulings would be allowed; the "Appellate Division" of the Supreme Court of South Africa would hear those, and they would be prosecuted by the Supreme Court of South-West Africa.
_	Dynamic Data Masking is similar to On-the-Fly Data Masking but it differs in the sense that On-the-Fly Data Masking is about copying data from one source to another source so that the latter can be shared.
_	The constant 2 is optimal, in the sense that for any constant larger than 2, one can find a state for which the inequality is violated with that constant.
_	These titles express the sense that the Anglo-Saxons were a Christian people with a king anointed by God.
_	More likely, they conveyed the sense that he possessed the required attributes of a king and so could easily have been one.
_	The creation of SUS was important in the sense that more than 80% of the Brazilian population depend on it to receive medical treatment.
_	Plunkett comes to the conclusion that his own goal should become "invisibility" in the sense that he can move through life as nondescript as possible.
_	Psychologists today consider this classical form of behaviorism to be "wrong" in the sense that modern cognitive research has attempted to clearly demonstrate the role of mental processes in psychology.
_	And I do get the sense that it's kind of liberating for people to be able to just talk freely and ask questions using those words — it's the words themselves — I think everybody should just spend an hour just saying: 'clitoris, masturbation, penis, penis, penis, clitoris, clitoris' — just saying it over and over until it doesn't sound strange.
_	Portions of the community are visible through the window, which gives the sense that the community is large, though not how large or how extensive it is.
_	He goes on to say that the experience gave him the sense that the philosophy of Hegel was true.
_	In mathematics, a normal number is a real number whose infinite sequence of digits in every positive integer base b is distributed uniformly in the sense that each of the b digit values has the same natural density 1/b, also all possible b pairs of digits are equally likely with density b, all b triplets of digits equally likely with density b, etc.
_	It is unique in the sense that the two layers are laid facing one another, each looking down (or up; the terms are relative here) at the other.
_	It is the generalisation of the Laplace operator in the sense that it is the differential operator which is invariant under the isometry group of the underlying space and it reduces to the Laplace operator if restricted to time-independent functions.
_	Many contemporary computer strategy games can be considered wargames, in the sense that they are a simulation of warfare on some level.
_	The beneficial interest could lie with (1) the lender, (2) the borrower, (3) an ultimate purpose, and (4) no-one, in the sense that the beneficial interest remains "in suspense".
_	The moments determine the cumulants in the sense that any two probability distributions whose moments are identical will have identical cumulants as well, and similarly the cumulants determine the moments.
_	This injection is "non-canonical "in the sense that it depends on the choice of the mollifier φ, which should be "C", of integral one and have all its derivatives at 0 vanishing.
_	The time evolution of wave functions is deterministic in the sense that - given a wave function at an "initial" time - it makes a definite prediction of what the wave function will be at any "later" time.
_	Every other integral representation "H" at the same level becomes a module for the vertex algebra, in the sense that for each "a" there is a vertex operator on "H" such that
_	"“Since this building was “pioneering” in the sense that was the first commercial tower for many years in this precinct, the client did not see it as superficially “prestigious” (as in a Collins Street address).
_	However, the compact Hausdorff spaces are "absolutely closed", in the sense that, if you embed a compact Hausdorff space "K" in an arbitrary Hausdorff space "X", then "K" will always be a closed subset of "X"; the "surrounding space" does not matter here.
_	It's a strange work in the sense that it's never really resolved, his story.
_	The free will theorem of John H. Conway and Simon B. Kochen states that if we have a free will in the sense that our choices are not a function of the past, then, subject to certain assumptions, so must some elementary particles.
_	Jerseys over the years, although in keeping with the red and white tradition, have varied slightly in the sense that certain seasons saw Derry wear thinner stripes while others saw thicker or stripes with varying thicknesses being worn by the players on the field.
_	Besides providing information about a potential mole, Kulak gave the FBI details on Soviet agents, which led to the FBI making a number of arrests and imprisonments, adding to the sense that he was a genuine volunteer.
_	They are only a generalization in the sense that although the Brinkmann metric form is preserved, they are not necessarily the vacuum solutions studied by Ehlers and Kundt, Sippel and Gönner, etc.
_	Gödel’s doctoral dissertation proved that Frege's rules were "complete" "... in the sense that every valid formula is provable".
_	In animals, elastic mechanisms never add energy to the system; they amplify power in the sense that the energy is released more rapidly than it is stored.
_	Enver's attempts to emulate the Japanese at Port Arthur were successful in the sense that he sent his men forward on frontal attacks against the Russian lines which likewise resulted in the same heavy losses as the Japanese had suffered at Port Arthur, but there was a crucial lesson that Enver had failed to learn.
_	Many of these evolves in a self-similar fashion in the sense that data obtained from the snapshot at any fixed time is similar to the respective data taken from the snapshot of any earlier or later time.
_	This response to changes in temperature (mentioned above) is related to metabolism in the sense that limitations will be placed on the extent to which ectotherms’ metabolism can change.
_	The Historical Scenarios were expansions in the sense that parts from "Settlers" were required to complete the game equipment pieces - otherwise, it was an entirely self-contained game where the "Settlers" game mechanics were applied to historical situations; the historical scenarios were, to some extent, the precursors to the "Catan Histories" series of games.
_	Moreover, such a dilation is unique (up to unitary equivalence) when one assumes "K" is minimal, in the sense that the linear span of ∪"UK" is dense in "K".
_	Adaptive dimensional search algorithms differ from nature-inspired metaheuristic techniques in the sense that they do not use any metaphor as an underlying principle for implementation.
_	They propose that libertarian paternalism is paternalism in the sense that "it tries to influence choices in a way that will make choosers better off, as judged by themselves" (p. 5); note and consider, the concept paternalism specifically requires a restriction of choice.
_	It is libertarian in the sense that it aims to ensure that "people should be free to opt out of specified arrangements if they choose to do so" (p. 1161).
_	Sir Alfred Brian Pippard wrote, "There is thus no justification for the view, often glibly repeated, that the Second Law of Thermodynamics is only statistically true, in the sense that microscopic violations repeatedly occur, but never violations of any serious magnitude.
_	It is a meta-algorithm in the sense that it is built from more basic algorithms that perform projections onto constraint sets.
_	Mick LaSalle of the "San Francisco Chronicle" said "Standing Ovation is an innovative film in the sense that every minute or so it comes up with a different way of being annoying."
_	The main body of the song occurs in the following stanzas, and usually draw out a variety of relationships with the "exordium"; formally, aside from the envoi(s), which are not always present, a canso is made of stanzas all having the same sequence of verses, in the sense that each verse has the same number of metrical syllables.
_	Gulliver believes humans are similar to Yahoos in the sense that they make "no other use of reason, than to improve and multiply...vices"
_	Professor of literature Basil Willey commented in 1956, "In 'Ulysses' the sense that he must press on and not moulder in idleness is expressed objectively, through the classical story, and not subjectively as his own experience.
_	Deconcentration of attention is opposite to concentration and can be interpreted as a process of dismantling of the figures in the field of perception and transformation of the perceptual field into a uniform (in the sense that no individual elements could be construed as a perceptual figure) background.
_	The autoepistemics semantics of a pure Prolog program P with NAF literals is obtained by "expanding" P with a set of ground (variable-free) NAF literals Δ that is stable in the sense that
_	Is it English, in the sense that we use the
_	The surprising fact that they are essentially equivalent, in the sense that they are all encodable into each other, supports the Church-Turing thesis.
_	Under these systems the cycle of fifths is not circular in the sense that a pitch at one end of the cycle (e.g., G) is not tuned the same as the enharmonic equivalent at its other end (A); they are different by an amount known as a "comma".
_	While Filipchenko self-identified as a Darwinist, he only did so in the sense that he believed in the idea of evolution.
_	The shop was unique in the sense that children were encouraged to touch and play with the toys on display.
_	In 1726 he publishes statements in the sense that the vacant positions in the churches of the Spanish Empire, and therefore the rents and moneys providing their support for whathever earlier reasons, belong to the King ("regalism" from the French churches, hence the marquis title given to him "de la Regalía" by the thankful Bourbon King Philip V of Spain, bringing "over 1 million "reales"" to the Crown).
_	The unification and harmonisation of laws are similar in the sense that both constitute the process of approximating several legal systems and both are also oriented towards some level of integration after transitioning from a condition characterized by diversity.
_	The Sabres Aerobatic Team is the most unusual in the air force in the sense that it is a combination of two aerobatic teams, the Red Aces of the 7TFS and the Golden Sabres of the 9TFS.
_	The year 1929 is most significant in the sense that V. T. Bhattathiripad wrote his play "Adukkalayil Ninnu Arangathekku".
_	Newer developments like those in Norwich, Connecticut and the San Gabriel Valley, which are not necessarily considered "Chinatowns" in the sense that they do not necessarily contain the Chinese architectures or Chinese language signs as signatures of an officially sanctioned area that was designated either in law or signage stating so, differentiate areas that are called "Chinatowns" versus locations that have "significant" populations of people of Chinese descent.
_	As we must overcome levelling, Hubert Dreyfus and Jane Rubin argue that Kierkegaard's interest, "in an increasingly nihilistic age, is in how we can recover the sense that our lives are meaningful".
_	The level of attachment security that a father had with his parents when he was a child may influence his own child’s attachment security in the sense that his child may end up having a similar level of attachment security.
_	Sub-Poissonian fields violate this, and hence are nonclassical in the sense that there can be no underlying positive definite probability distribution for photon number (or intensity).
_	Let's just assume for simplicity here that the symmetry in question is local (not local in the sense of a gauge symmetry, but in the sense that the transformed value of the field at any given point under an infinitesimal transformation would only depend on the field configuration over an arbitrarily small neighborhood of the point in question).
_	Let's also assume that the action is local in the sense that it is the integral over spacetime of a Lagrangian, and that
_	My work's political in the sense that it's about communicating, about being able to understand people's struggles, to learn how we can live together."
_	Bazan described the tracks in the third full-length from Pedro the Lion as a return to the songwriting characterized by "Friend" and the "Secure" EP in the sense that there was no "pretense of anything bigger", an allusion to his previous concept albums.
_	British Chief Justice John Fineux stated in 1519 that "the Law of God and the Law of the Land are all one" in the sense that they both protect the public good.
_	Halloran House, while never openly "haunted" in the sense that Hill House claimed to be, is the site of at least two ghostly visitations.
_	He meant that the real numbers form the "largest" Archimedean field in the sense that every other Archimedean field is a subfield of R. Thus R is "complete" in the sense that nothing further can be added to it without making it no longer an Archimedean field.
_	Nevertheless, when I apprehend the content of thinking, a concept, this is self-justifying, in the sense that it can be asked why I feel this or that way about something, but not why it produces in me this or that concept.
_	The "Jerusema" (or "Mbenede") dance of the Zezuru people in Zimbabwe is an interesting kind of hybrid war dance—"hybrid" in the sense that music and dance formed a part of the actual battle-field preparations, themselves, as well as of the ritual dance recalling the battle.
_	In many railways, modern technology has seen the positions of Signalman and Train Controller united (or reunited, in the sense that traffic regulation and train path allocation were originally duties of the Signalman anyway).
_	Every variety of general type is extremely rigid, in the sense that its birational automorphism group is finite.
_	About 4,500 years ago, the Egyptians believed that the unmovable area the stars encircled by 10 degrees each, was heaven in the sense that it was the place of the afterlife.
_	He might be called the first "interpreter" of flamenco music, in the sense that he borrows these traditional works by Sabicas, Carlos Montoya and Paco de Lucía, and employs them in his own fashion, a practice to which they agree."
_	Furthermore, geocentrism boils down to product differentiation, diversifying functions in the sense that different markets require dissimilar behavior, and lastly geographic location.
_	Some of the confusion among his readers about his position on African leaders of the independence generation has to do with his own background since he was an integral part of that generation in the sense that he witnessed the end of colonial rule and the emergence of the newly independent African states although he was not old enough to have participated in the independence struggle.
_	The moral character of the norm may encourage the sense that following it is an imperative rather than a choice, and failing to reciprocate should create feelings of self-reproach and guilt.
_	Although "polynomial regression" fits a nonlinear model to the data, as a statistical estimation problem it is linear, in the sense that the regression function E("y" | "x") is linear in the unknown parameters that are estimated from the data.
_	Some orders of heterotardigrades are marine, others are terrestrial, but as for all tardigrades, all are aquatic in the sense that they must be surrounded by at least a film of moisture in order to be active - though they can survive in a dormant state if the habitat dries out.
_	Then formula_34 is a lift of formula_9 in the sense that formula_207, where formula_16 is the quotient map from formula_193 to formula_210.
_	A manifold is asymptotically flat if it is weakly asymptotically simple and asymptotically empty in the sense that its Ricci tensor vanishes in a neighbourhood of the boundary of formula_2.
_	They are abstract in the sense that the viewer tends to concentrate on the surface of the canvas, its weave and the pigment upon it.
_	The use of the Roman parazonium tended to be somewhat theatrical in the sense that it was a mark of rank and it was used to rally the troops.
_	Introduced by the European Commission (EC) and launched in 2005, the EU ETS is similar to the UK ETS in the sense that it is a cap-and-trade scheme, but it is mandatory and its participants account for 40% of the EU’s total GHG emissions.
_	According to Le Cam, the French school of probability interprets the word "central" in the sense that "it describes the behaviour of the centre of the distribution as opposed to its tails".
_	I wanted to give the sense that they had gone to school together.
_	As extended Smart Antenna technology, MIMO supports spatial information processing, in the sense that conventional research on Smart Antennas has focused on how to provide a digital beamforming advantage by the use of spatial signal processing in wireless channels.
_	It was a distinctly "Ukrainian" state, in the sense that it was not a conglomerate of diverse peoples and principalities.
_	Depersonalization also differs from delusion in the sense that the patient is able to differentiate between reality and the symptoms they may experience.
_	"Common sense" includes consistency with Aristotelian logic in the sense that logically equivalent propositions shall have the same plausibility.
_	By using data on banking crises that goes back to 1800 (or to the year of independence of each country, whatever comes first), they showed that banking crises have long been an "equal opportunity menace", in the sense that the incidence of banking crises proves to be remarkably similar in the high-income countries and in the middle-to-low-income countries.
_	An implication of this position is that all arguments are "person relative" in the sense that one non-Christian might be persuaded by a particular argument and another might not be, depending on their background and experiences; even if the argument constitutes logically valid proof.
_	It could not have been intended to mean that the bank would not be liable even if it was the bank itself that stole in the sense that those who were the "controlling minds" of the bank had committed the theft.
_	An important factor to consider is the fact that organ gifting differs from the gifting of blood or semen in the sense that organs are scarce.
_	What set Farthing's work apart from theirs is that he was addressing his defence of the British system from the perspective of "outsider," in the sense that what he was defending was no longer "de rigueur" politically.
_	Then ⊓"x"("p"("x")⊔¬"p"("x"))⟜⊓"x"("q"("x")⊔¬"q"("x")) expresses the problem of Turing-reducing "q" to "p" (in the sense that "q" is Turing reducible to "p" if and only if the interactive problem ⊓"x"("p"("x")⊔¬"p"("x"))⟜⊓"x"("q"("x")⊔¬"q"("x")) is computable). ⊓"x"("p"("x")⊔¬"p"("x"))→⊓"x"("q"("x")⊔¬"q"("x")) does the same but for the stronger version of Turing reduction where the oracle for "p" can be queried only once. ⊓x⊔"y"("q"("x")↔"p"("y")) does the same for the problem of many-one reducing "q" to "p".
_	Even where it is not accurate, it is usually faithful, in the sense that reducing the Elmore delay will almost always reduce the true delay, so it is still useful in optimization.
_	His mature style was a free iambic form, free in the sense that verses rarely rhyme and are usually from 10 to 17 syllables.
_	The party, at least in the beginning, is best described as Soviet nationalist (nationalist in the sense that they are nostalgic for the Soviet Union).
_	The term means obviously "king of the gods," in the sense that one god, generally Śiva, was recognized as higher than others in the Hindu pantheon and through his authority brought order to heaven.
_	However the agent is Pareto optimal in the sense that no other agent will do better than this agent in this environment, without doing worse in another environment.
_	For such more general theories the KS theorem is applicable only if the measurement is assumed to be a faithful one, in the sense that there is a "deterministic" relation between a subquantum element of physical reality and the value of the observable found on measurement.
_	Since then, the increasingly excessive length of the "molad" interval caused its apparent reference meridian to drift progressively eastward at an accelerating rate — in the present era it is at a longitude near Qandahar, Afghanistan, in the sense that today near that meridian a mean solar time clock matches the traditional "molad" at that moment, provided that the start of each date is taken as local mean sunset.
_	Computational criminology is interdisciplinary in the sense that both criminologists and computing scientists work together to ensure that computational models properly match their theoretical and real-world counterparts.
_	Assume type A individuals are low risk compared to type B, in the sense that the expected return on type B projects is a mean preserving spread of type A projects; they have the same expected return, but higher variance.
_	Diplomat doesn't have traditional distribution in the sense that each of its artists have deals with individual labels.
_	Present supporters of the non-epistemic theory thus regard sensations as only data in the sense that they are "given" (Latin "datum", "given") and fundamentally involuntary, which is a good reason for not regarding them as basically mental.
_	The rationale for this perspective is that the Rasch model embodies requirements which must be met in order to obtain measurement, in the sense that measurement is generally understood in the physical sciences.
_	Bernard was not a rationalist in the sense that he adopts the ‘geometrical method’ which characterised the writings of Descartes, Spinoza and Leibniz.
_	This leads to the questions of the relevant notion of "possibility": is the scenario described in premise 3 possible in the sense that is suggested in premise 2?
_	Realism in computer animation can mean making each frame look photorealistic, in the sense that the scene is rendered to resemble a photograph or make the characters' animation believable and lifelike.
_	Note that the four points formula_9, formula_335, formula_339, and formula_340 form a rectangle in Euclidean space (in the sense that formula_341, formula_342, and formula_343 and formula_344 are orthogonal).
_	Wired All Wrong has been described as functioning similar to God Lives Underwater, Turzo's former band, in the sense that the two founding members, Turzo and Mahaffey, write, record and produce all the music then perform it live alongside a full band.
_	The Reed–Solomon code is a ["n", "k", "n" − "k" + 1] code; in other words, it is a linear block code of length "n" (over "F") with dimension "k" and minimum Hamming distance "n" − "k" + 1. The Reed–Solomon code is optimal in the sense that the minimum distance has the maximum value possible for a linear code of size ("n", "k"); this is known as the Singleton bound.
_	The economic structure of Middle Eastern nations are different in the sense that while some nations are heavily dependent on export of only oil and oil-related products (such as Saudi Arabia, the UAE and Kuwait), others have a highly diverse economic base (such as Cyprus, Israel, Turkey and Egypt).
_	Soon, there were allegations that Strelka was a clone of Rybka 1.0 beta, in the sense that it was a reverse-engineered and slightly modified version of Rybka.
_	The Buddha's epistemology has been compared to empiricism, in the sense that it was based on experience of the world through the senses.
_	Many extensions of first-order logic, including infinitary logics and higher-order logics, are more expressive in the sense that they do permit categorical axiomatizations of the natural numbers or real numbers.
_	in the sense that
_	In graph theory, complete coloring is the opposite of harmonious coloring in the sense that it is a vertex coloring in which every pair of colors appears on at least one pair of adjacent vertices.
_	Equivalently, a complete coloring is minimal in the sense that it cannot be transformed into a proper coloring with fewer colors by merging pairs of color classes.
_	In Woman, Culture, and Society (1974), Michelle Rosaldo emphasizes the idea that these separate spheres can be explained in terms of a dichotomy, in the sense that these gender-oriented domains are viewed as so totally separate that it only reinforces the ideology of gender separation and inequality.
_	Given a certain number of joints, this is the minimum number of members, in the sense that if any member is taken out (or fails), then the truss as a whole fails.
_	All federal subjects are of equal federal rights in the sense that they have equal representation—two delegates each—in the Federation Council (upper house of the Federal Assembly).
_	At the same time he criticized Hegel for having given an interpretation of history which was closed to the future, in the sense that it left no room for novelty.
_	The Court states "although there is no source confusion in the sense that consumers know they are patronizing West Coast rather than Brookfield, there is nevertheless initial interest confusion in the sense that, by using "moviebuff.com" or "MovieBuff" to divert people looking for "MovieBuff" to its web site, West Coast improperly benefits from the goodwill that Brookfield developed in its trademark."
_	Specifically on this subject matter, he had the occasion, at the European Congress on Conflict Prevention in Amsterdam, Netherlands, in 1997, to publicly outline his thinking, namely the idea of political stability as essential to security in the sense that, whereas at the time stability was an idea intrinsically linked with social and economic development, political stability as well as sustainability were paramount to an environment of security and an essential condition both for development as well as for conflict prevention : “Sampaio stressed that stability (a core concept of security policy) embraced the notion of dynamism” .
_	The gradient is linear in the sense that if and are two real-valued functions differentiable at the point , and and are two constants, then is differentiable at , and moreover
_	Most standards are voluntary in the sense that they are offered for adoption by people or industry without being mandated in law.
_	Anthropologists Robert Murphy and Leonard Kasdan describe preferential parallel cousin marriage as leading to social fission, in the sense that "feud and fission are not at all dysfunctional factors but are necessary to the persistence and viability of Bedouin society".
_	However a Guardian critic wrote: "Most worrying of all is the sense that any self-respecting youth audience is going to see through Glyndebourne's attempt to get with the kids as a patronising gesture of trendy inclusivity" and a Telegraph critic referred to it as "derivative drivel" which he said would "will never convert the iPod generation".
_	The majority of his works are in black and white, and he extends Torres García's phrase in the sense that reality is multi-coloured, whilst we tend to represent the truth in black and white.
_	Pushouts are equivalent to coproducts and coequalizers (if there is an initial object) in the sense that:
_	position operator in basic quantum mechanics in the sense that at low momenta it
_	He referred to the conclusion of the Dean O'Dell story arc as the closure to a conventional mystery in the sense that Veronica and Keith slowly built up evidence instead of stumbling on one incriminating object by chance.
_	She further added that "It isn't merely filmi in the sense that it features over-the-top melodrama; there are also a fair number of larger-than-life events to contend with.
_	In the sense that they exist independently of extant personalities and histories, they are believed to be fictional characters and fictional time frames.
_	These are equivalent in the sense that, in the presence of other basic axioms of set theory, they imply the axiom of choice and are implied by it.
_	The battles were described by GameSpot as "particularly intense", enhanced by friendly non-player characters being "surprisingly responsive" in combat, giving the player the sense that they are "not doing all the fighting by [themselves]".
_	A "fetus in fetu" can be considered alive, but only in the sense that its component tissues have not yet died or been eliminated.
_	Score voting is independent of clones in the sense that if there is a set of candidates such that every voter gives the same rating to every candidate in this set, then the probability that the winner is in this set is independent of how many candidates are in the set.
_	It has thus been argued that Phillipson's theory is patronizing in the sense that it does not regard developing countries as being capable of independent decision-making (to adopt or not to adopt ELT).
_	Zorn's lemma is equivalent to the well-ordering theorem and also to the axiom of choice, in the sense that any one of the three, together with the Zermelo–Fraenkel axioms of set theory, is sufficient to prove the other two.
_	You don't get the sense that the material is being exploited for its sensational qualities.
_	Like all other members of his race, Pluto is immortal in the sense that he is immune to the effects of aging.
_	He also had the sense that he was being pigeon-holed as a "gypsy poet".
_	"The Times" goes on to describe him as "a simple-minded man, in the sense that he never saw evil in anyone."
_	It has nothing to do with what the accused intended or desired or wanted to do; it is concerned merely with whether or not the accused's actions were controlled by his conscious will, in the sense that the accused was physically able to direct them, prevent them or stop them, if he chose to do so.
_	The term "unreasonable" connotes the sense that a constitutional search has a rational basis, that it is not an excessive imposition upon the individual given the circumstances and is in accordance with societal norms.
_	Approximately a third of all the possible crosses between species are compatible, in the sense that the gametes will fuse and lead to individual hybrids.
_	The 105 mm evolved from the 88 mm in the sense that it was more accurate and had more power due to the ammunition it fired.
_	The map formula_6 is slightly problematic, in the sense that the indices of the P-vertices are naturally odd integers whereas the indices of Q-vertices are naturally even integers.
_	At the same time, however, Violet and Dash are opposites in the sense that while Violet initially dislikes having superpowers, Dash, who possesses superhuman speed, is "in love" with his own abilities, thus the siblings constantly bicker about their differences.
_	Iris is strong in the sense that she fights and fights up until she can’t fight it anymore, and even then she still tries.
_	American ports are often run by private entities in the sense that day-to-day functions are financed and managed with the primary goal of creating revenue.
_	Let formula_9 be a function from projection operators to the unit interval with the property that, if a set formula_10 of projection operators sum to the identity matrix—that is, if they correspond to an orthonormal basis—thenformula_11Such a function expresses an assignment of probability values to the outcomes of measurements, an assignment that is "noncontextual" in the sense that the probability for an outcome does not depend upon which measurement that outcome is embedded within, but only upon the mathematical representation of that specific outcome, i.e., its projection operator.
_	Many English phrasal verbs are separable, in the sense that if they are transitive then the object is placed between the core verb and the particle if the object is a pronoun (and optionally if it is a short noun phrase, but not if it is a long noun phrase as in the example above).
_	Sheaves on this site grow in the sense that they can be extended from open sets to infinitesimal extensions of open sets.
_	The bass pattern is an arpeggiation in the sense that its middle note (V) first arises as the fifth of the elaborated chord (I), of which it is the upper-fifth divider.
_	Blench believes that there is in fact no "apical" ancestor of Austronesian in the sense that there was no true single Proto-Austronesian language that gave rise to present-day Austronesian languages.
_	There, the ECJ allowed the mark to be registered based on a “synctactical change,” thus perhaps lowering the standard for trademark subject matter in the sense that there was no secondary meaning (consumer perception) requirement.
_	The station was unusual for the network in the sense that it only had one platform, serving only trains heading towards Primera Junta (the terminus at the time), with the opposite platform located some metres away at Pasco station.
_	The notion of inner automorphism for Lie algebras is compatible with the notion for groups in the sense that an inner automorphism of a Lie group induces a unique inner automorphism of the corresponding Lie algebra.
_	The reason this analysis is possible at all is due to the digestive system not being entirely efficient, in the sense that not everything that passes through the digestive system is destroyed.
_	John Milios also argues for a monetary theory of value, where "Money is the necessary form of appearance of value (and of capital) in the sense that prices constitute the only form of appearance of the value of commodities."
_	In this case the only reference is the sharp interface model, in the sense that it should be recovered when performing the small interface width limit of the phase field model.
_	This is an exhibition of contemporary art, not in the sense that it was done recently, but in that it is cased in the mentality, technology and philosophy of radical art of the most recent times.
_	Individual selection acts on the individual, in the sense that adaptations are "for" the benefit of the individual, and result from selection among individuals.
_	Namely, this should be equivalent to "X" being special in the sense that "X" has no rational fibration over a positive-dimensional orbifold of general type.
_	Although cardiac muscle and smooth muscle are not directly connected to the skeleton, they also have tonus in the sense that although their contractions are not matched with those of antagonist muscles, the non-contractile state is characterized by (sometimes random) enervation.
_	Many of the Highland Games competitions around the world have traditionally not been invitational, in the sense that novices can step up to compete, or at the more established events the competitors were very much more selected from the nation in which the competition was held.
_	The outcome of such procedure is obligatory in the sense that a judge cannot free himself or herself from passing his/her decision.
_	The see of Dublin was not included, as Dublin hitherto had been under primacy from Canterbury, but according to Martin Holland, a place was left open for it, in the sense that only eleven dioceses was declared under Cashel.
_	For example, any irrational number , such as , is a "gap" in the sense that it is a real number that can be approximated arbitrarily closely by rational numbers , in the sense that distance of and given by the absolute value is as small as desired.
_	The studies in late 1990s indicated that the EPEA were difficult to compile, i.e. in the sense that numerous types of statistics were required and the gaps of information in the tables provided results that were uncertain at best.
_	In the isoinertial method the resistance is adapted in every moment and is proportional to the force developed in the sense that the greater the force expressed by the subject in the concentric phase, the greater will be the acceleration with which the flywheel reacts.
_	VanDerWerff agreed, and added that with each episode the writers got bolder in the sense that they added new scenes not included in the book to round out the source material.
_	The three boundary curves connecting these three vertices must be convex, in the sense that any line segment connecting two points on the same boundary curve must lie entirely outside or on the boundary of the pseudotriangle.
_	The gallery operates alternatively to traditional galleries in the sense that artists do not submit proposals, and Mitchell and Logue act as “feral curators”, which means they look to friends and peers to suggest which artists to show.
_	Until its sale to the Educational Media Foundation, it was unique in the sense that it was locally owned and operated, while most radio stations in Columbia are corporate owned.
_	Moreover, formula_68 becomes graded by formula_64, in the sense that
_	Several factors contributed to this decision, including both excitement at being part of the zoo, and the sense that his studies were putting too much of a strain on his family's finances.
_	In a review in "The New Yorker", David Remnick writes, "Mearsheimer and Walt give you the sense that, if the Israelis and the Palestinians come to terms, bin Laden will return to the family construction business.
_	In subsequent writings, Dunn maintained that the group responsible for the murder was an "offshoot" or schism of the Church of Almighty God, in the sense that its members had once belonged to the church but had left it from many years at the time of the crime and had formed an independent movement.
_	In mathematical set theory and model theory, a stationary set is one that is not too small in the sense that it intersects all club sets, and is analogous to a set of non-zero measure in set theory.
_	An operating system is also “unified” in the sense that it presents the user with a common, easy to understand computer interface for executing numerous tasks.
_	In Stage 3, too much variable input is being used relative to the available fixed inputs: variable inputs are over-utilized in the sense that their presence on the margin obstructs the production process rather than enhancing it.
_	Cage refers to his pieces as sonata in the sense that these works are cast in the form that early classical keyboard sonatas (such as those of Scarlatti) were: AABB.
_	Namely, for every variety "X" over a field of characteristic zero such that "X" has canonical singularities (for example, rational Gorenstein singularities), there is a variety "Y" with Q-factorial terminal singularities and a birational projective morphism "f": "Y" → "X" which is crepant in the sense that "K" = "f"*"K".
_	The SMART-L and APAR are highly complementary, in the sense that SMART-L is a L band radar providing very long range surveillance while APAR is an I band radar providing precise target tracking, a highly capable horizon search capability, and missile guidance using the Interrupted Continuous Wave Illumination (ICWI) technique, thus allowing guidance of 32 semi-active radar homing missiles in flight simultaneously, including 16 in the terminal guidance phase.
_	An original Aramaic version of Matthew does not exist in the sense that no copy survives in the original language today.
_	After socializing briefly, Sidney determines that there are no other carbon copies or xeroxes of the play in existence and escalates the sense that he may kill Clifford.
_	A society of states comes into existence "when a group of states, conscious of certain common interests and common values, form a society in the sense that they conceive themselves to be bound by a common set of rules in their relations with one another, and share in the working of common institutions."
_	IRMA is a unique institution in the sense that it provides professional education to train managers for rural management.
_	In "Colonial Mutual Life Assurance Society v MacDonald", the court held that the employee was subject to the control of the employer in the sense that the latter had the right to prescribe not only what work had to be done, but also the manner in which that work had to be done.
_	Thus politically, he helped Syria towards Ottomanism in the sense that the edicts allowed participation of citizens of the state regardless of religious affiliation.
_	The drives are partial, not in the sense that they are a part of a whole (a genital drive), but in that they only represent sexuality partially: they convey the dimension of "jouissance".
_	The city of Lomé is a typical African city in the sense that many styles, influences, and traditions are mixed.
_	There is some overlap here, in the sense that some classical groups arising from pseudo-quadratic spaces can be obtained from quadrangular algebras (which Weiss calls special), but there are other, non-special ones.
_	He's not a musician in the sense that Paul is ... but he does know what he wants in music and he has very firm ideas."
_	with the theory formula_2, in the sense that
_	There is also a less technical use of the term "substitution" in discussion about atonement when it is used in "the sense that [Jesus, through his death,] did for us that which we can never do for ourselves".
_	The thesis is a "minimalism" in the sense that it eschews the additional requirements piled on top of true belief and argues that the intuitive reasons given for the justified true belief (JTB) analysis and its descendants are either misleading or misunderstood.
_	The ETR 610 / RABe 503 (also known as the Cisalpino Due as it was the second class of tilting trains exploited by Cisalpino) primarily differs from the ETR 600 in the sense that the ETR 610 / RABe 503 supports the voltage and signalling systems used in Switzerland and Germany.
_	To me, it's dream logic in the sense that they're in a nightmare, and when you're in a nightmare there's no solving the nightmare.
_	The July 2007 announcement by Chinook's team stating that the game had been solved must be understood in the sense that, with perfect play on both sides, the game will always finish with a draw.
_	Thus, public health was a political concern in the sense that the state hoped citizens would be more productive if they lived longer.
_	Feminine terms such as "actress", "usherette" and "comedienne" are marked with respect to the masculine ("actor", "usher", "comedian") both formally (i.e. something is added to the masculine form) and in the sense that only the masculine form can be used generically to describe a mixed-gender group of people.
_	As Stein outlined, this would have changed community life in the sense that the installation of the telephone eradicated the need for long distance travel between Shaker communities.
_	The vertex operator superalgebra is holomorphic, in the sense that all modules are direct sums of itself, i.e., the module category is equivalent to the category of vector spaces.
_	A direct limit of the direct system formula_35 is a "universally repelling target" formula_37 in the sense that formula_37 is a target and for each target formula_47, there is a unique morphism formula_48 such that formula_49 for each "i".
_	The Greek philosophers, including Aristotle and the Stoics are credited with distinguishing between man-made laws and a natural law of universal validity, but Gerhard Kittel states that the Stoic philosophers were not able to combine the concepts of νόμος (law) and φύσις (nature) to produce the concept of "natural law" in the sense that was made possible by Judeo-Christian theology.
_	Specific yield of soils differ from each other in the sense that some soil types have strong molecular attraction with the water held in their pores while others have less.
_	The second half of the nineteenth century was a turning point in the sense that it marked the end a long period of deep divisions within and between the various kingdoms located in the northern part of the country known as the Era of Princes or Zemene Mesafint (1769–1855).
_	Because of its association with the supposed position of Peter among the Apostles, the function that, within the Roman Catholic Church, is exercised by the Bishop of Rome among the bishops as a whole is referred to as the Petrine function, and is generally believed to be of divine institution, in the sense that the historical and sociological factors that influenced its development are seen as guided by the Holy Spirit.
_	The lakalaka is a living dance in the sense that new compositions are still daily made.
_	Newspapers of the time reported that the society promoted free love, but the society promoted free love only in the sense that consenting adults had a right to change partners and even to have more than one partner at a time.
_	The rival will be unable to capture the sale of B even though it is equally efficient, in the sense that its production costs for B are the same as those faced by the dominant firm.
_	Rather, it should be subsumed under irrationality, in the sense that if an executive decision is disproportionate it can be said to be irrational in that no reasonable authority could have come to such a decision.
_	Carlos Fuentes raised the possibility that Cervantes and Shakespeare were the same person, in the sense that Homer, Dante, Defoe, Dickens, Balzac, and Joyce are all the same writer whose spirit wanders through the centuries.
_	Taking him home would have properly been the role of his grandmother, and "[h]e didn't really respect her, in the sense that he wouldn't listen to her ...
_	It can be shown that ω is a principal connection in the sense that it reproduces the generators of the right "G" action on F"E", and equivariantly intertwines the right action on T(F"E") with the adjoint representation of "G".
_	In his theory he uses "identification" with the father in the sense that the son will follow the sex role provided by his father and then for the father to be able identify the difference of the "cross sex" parent for his daughter.
_	One of the reasons for that is the dominance of the written text over the spoken word (in the sense that those who have left written texts are more likely to be recorded by historians).
_	Even though it is based on an elementary principle of words copying, this complexity measure is not too restrictive in the sense that it satisfies the main qualities expected by such a measure: sequences with a certain regularity do not have a too large complexity, and the complexity grows as the sequence grows in length and irregularity.
_	As noted above, post-left anarchist Bob Black in his book-length critique of Bookchin's philosophy entitled "Anarchy After Leftism" said of post-left anarchy: "It is, unlike Bookchinism, "individualistic" in the sense that if the freedom and happiness of the individual — i.e., each and every really existing person, every Tom, Dick and Murray — is not the measure of the good society, what is?".
_	It would, however, be mandatory in the sense that "each domain name application would, in the domain name agreement, be required to submit to the procedure if a claim was initiated against it by a third party
_	It deals with right conduct and living a good life, in the sense that a highly, or at least relatively high valuable action may be regarded as ethically "good" (adjective sense), and that an action of low value, or relatively low in value, may be regarded as "bad".
_	For d-regular graphs which are pseudo-random in the sense that their adjacency matrix has second largest eigenvalue (in absolute value) at most , d is the optimal number of colors .
_	In the sense that attrition warfare represents an attempt to grind down an opponent and is superior numbers, it represents the opposite of the usual principles of war in which one attempts to achieve decisive victories by using minimal necessary resources and in minimal amount of time, through manoeuvre, concentration of force, surprise, and the like.
_	It is portable in the sense that it moves from machine to machine, irrespective of operating system or computer architecture.
_	The last motif, which Roy also focused on his 2008 "Syncretism" series, is also joined by "abstract works" (abstract in the sense that they utilize Non-Objectivist visualities in painting) that combine both fluid color-washes (of the style associated with Louis Morris) with thick, nervously-drawn gestural strokes with thick textures (like Sam Frances as loosened up by graffiti art), but combined in a visual montage of bright colors and sensual forms verging on an erotic descriptive intermingled with the materiality of daily life.
_	England's ethnography highlights the complexities of diasporic identities are defined both against and through notions of territoriality, nation, and indigeneity; such identities are defined against territoriality in the sense that they privilege the solidarity and identity of the geographically dispersed diaspora over the territorial nationalism of the countries of residence of its members.
_	Flourishing people are happy and satisfied; they tend to see their lives as having a purpose; they feel some degree of mastery and accept all parts of themselves; they have a sense of personal growth in the sense that they are always growing, evolving, and changing; finally, they have a sense of autonomy and an internal locus of control, they chose their fate in life instead of being victims of fate.
_	Haag's theorem says that there can be no interaction picture — that we cannot use the Fock space of noninteracting particles as a Hilbert space — in the sense that we would identify Hilbert spaces via field polynomials acting on a vacuum at a certain time.
_	The Pan American Games are a sort of warm up for the Olympic Games in the sense that they are held every four years and occur one year prior to the Summer Olympic Games each cycle.
_	The NFC is unique in the sense that it takes an extremely dangerous and difficult rapid, and forces the racers to make different maneuvers in the rapid that are very challenging and that they wouldn’t normally choose to run.
_	In astronomy, NMF is a promising method for dimension reduction in the sense that astrophysical signals are non-negative.
_	may be considered homogeneous coordinates for "L", in the sense that all pairs ("λd:"λm), for "λ" ≠ 0, can be produced by points on "L" and only "L", and any such pair determines a unique line so long as d is not zero and d•m = 0.
_	Sustainable energy is also distinct from low-carbon energy, which is sustainable only in the sense that it does not add to the CO in the atmosphere.
_	In fact, for some effectively calculable functions it can be shown that any algorithm that computes them will be very inefficient in the sense that the running time of the algorithm increases exponentially (or even superexponentially) with the length of the input.
_	It’s the sense that you’ve heard every synthesized squelch and ambient breakdown before."
_	Falcom staff have compared this style of gameplay to the enjoyment of popping air bubble sheets, in the sense that it took the tedious task of level-grinding and turned it into something similar to a high-score-based arcade game.
_	It gives them the sense that anything is possible,” she said.
_	Critic Rajiv Vijayakar of "Bollywood Hungama" stated, "This is a decent A.R. Rahman score after a long gap, in the sense that it will appeal even to those who are not hardcore fans of the composer and his musical grammar (and composition!)."
_	However, on 27 March 2014 he was sidelined by Muqrin in the sense that Muqrin was appointed to the new position of deputy crown prince.
_	"Ogygia" is associated with the Ogygian deluge and with the mythological figure Ogyges, in the sense that the word "Ogygian" means "primeval", "", and "at earliest dawn", which would suggest that Homer's Ogygia was a primeval island.
_	In 1869 he did a series jointly with Yoshitoshi, a more "modern" artist in the sense that he depicted faces realistically.
_	Moscovici's images, though modern, may be described as postmodernist in the sense that they are more archetypal than abstract.
_	Ulti is a unique bid in the sense that it carries an additional 4 points penalty if lost (8 for Ulti of Hearts).
_	The theorem is constructive in the sense that a fixed computable function maps an index for "Q" into the index "p".
_	Self-organizing maps differ from other artificial neural networks as they apply competitive learning as opposed to error-correction learning (such as backpropagation with gradient descent), and in the sense that they use a neighborhood function to preserve the topological properties of the input space.
_	The pharaoh was no longer a god-king in the sense that only he was allowed in the next life due to his status here, now he was merely the ruler of the population who upon his death would be leveled down towards the plane of the mortals.
_	It has often been said by biologists that in sexual differentiation in mammals, the female is the "default" developmental pathway, in the sense that elimination of any of several gene actions necessary for formation of male genitalia leads to the development of external female genitalia (though development of functional ovaries requires effective action of several less understood sex-specific genes).
_	The same characterization applies to graphs that are locally tree-like, in the sense that low-diameter neighborhoods of every vertex are acyclic: if a graph has girth eight or more (so that, for every vertex , the subgraph of vertices within distance three of is acyclic) then it is well-covered if and only if every vertex of degree greater than one has exactly one neighbor of degree one.
_	Les Marecottes is different in the sense that it is the only of the 6 ski resorts which owns itself, all the other were bought by Téléverbier (The operator of Verbier ski lifts).
_	Festinger "et al.", agreed with Le Bon’s perception of behavior in a crowd in the sense that they believed individuals do become submerged into the crowd leading to their reduced accountability.
_	This molecule is not a disulfide in the sense that it lacks a S-S bond.
_	As in the case of traditional programs, each element of any stable model of a disjunctive program formula_36 is a head atom of formula_36, in the sense that it occurs in the head of one of the rules of formula_36.
_	Iorgu Iordan considers that his work, though not very sizeable, has a "definitive character, in the sense that following research did not challenge its essence".
_	Ma's initial practical training in advertising fostered in her "a production and design aesthetic … in the sense that she is responsive to the qualities and needs of materials as well as to the demands of place and public," while remaining critical of market and client.
_	The doctrine of internal relations is the philosophical doctrine that all relations are internal to their bearers, in the sense that they are essential to them and the bearers would not be what they are without them.
_	Anneke Smelik analyzed the film, writing "It is Oedipal in the sense that it is about a family, but instead of featuring the triangle of father, mother and child, the film establishes a line of mothers and daughters."
_	The script was by J.B.Priestley and reflects both optimism about an eventual victory and the sense that the post war world would have to be different from that of the 1930s.
_	In her review for the "Los Angeles Times", Carina Chocano wrote, "You get the sense that Kelly is too angry to really find any of it funny.
_	With his calibre to perform any challenging role and a flexible mindset that prompted him to occasionally do minor roles (with some new elements), Krishnan Nair was probably the pioneering Kathakali artiste who was a hardcore professional—in the sense that he was the arguably the first to dictate the rate for each of his performances.
_	Municipal elections in Texas are nonpartisan in the sense that candidates do not appear on the ballot on party lines, and do not run as party tickets.
_	It is local in the sense that the sliding window of terms and sentences used to determine the co-occurrence of terms is relatively small.
_	He argues that even the telephone can be regarded as an online experience in some circumstances, and that the blurring of the distinctions between the uses of various technologies (such as PDA versus mobile phone, internet television versus internet, and telephone versus Voice over Internet Protocol) has made it "impossible to use the term "online" meaningfully in the sense that was employed by the first generation of Internet research".
_	You get the sense that we'll get those answers eventually.
_	Eisenhower biographer Stephen Ambrose, who helped edit "Other Losses", wrote "I quarrel with many of your interpretations, [but] I am not arguing with the basic truth of your discovery" and acknowledged that Bacque had made a "major historical discovery", in the sense that very little attention had hitherto been paid to the treatment of German POWs in Allied hands.
_	Many of his single and EP recordings were hits in the sense that they were singles from his hit "Billboard" 200 albums.
_	Horner's method is optimal, in the sense that any algorithm to evaluate an arbitrary polynomial must use at least as many operations.
_	One of the earliest type of calculations resembling modern CFD are those by Lewis Fry Richardson, in the sense that these calculations used finite differences and divided the physical space in cells.
_	When both eggs hatch successfully, the second chick, or B-chick, is known as the marginal offspring; otherwise stated, it is marginal in the sense that it can add to or subtract from the evolutionary success of its family members.
_	She was a practical pacifist in the sense that she helped the war effort by working as a fire warden and by travelling around the country raising funds for the Peace Pledge Union's food relief campaign.
_	This ability would allow a quantum computer to break many of the cryptographic systems in use today, in the sense that there would be a polynomial time (in the number of digits of the integer) algorithm for solving the problem.
_	The construction via nilpotent elements is more fundamental in the sense that an idempotent may then be produced from it.
_	Falcom staff have compared this style of gameplay to the enjoyment of popping air bubble sheets, in the sense that it took the tedious task of level-grinding and turned it into something similar to a high-score-based arcade game.
_	This project is developed at length in his influential 1994 book, "Making It Explicit", and more briefly in "Articulating Reasons: An Introduction to Inferentialism" (2000); a chapter of that latter work, "Semantic Inferentialism and Logical Expressivism", outlines the main themes of representationalism (the tradition of basing semantics on the concept of representation) vs. inferentialism (the conviction for an expression to be meaningful is has to be governed by a certain kind of inferential rules) and inferentialism's relationship to logical expressivism (the conviction that "logic is expressive in the sense that it makes explicit or codifies certain aspects of the inferential structure of our discursive practice").
_	Clearly, the second type of relation is more general in the sense that it must include the first type as a special case.
_	Furthermore, as Johnstone put it, ST is "logic-free" in the sense that it contains no logical connectives or quantifiers in its formulae.
_	In topology and related branches of mathematics, a totally disconnected space is a topological space that is maximally disconnected, in the sense that it has no non-trivial connected subsets.
_	This can be more easily understood when considering facticity in relation to the temporal dimension of our past: one's past is what one is, in the sense that it co-constitutes oneself.
_	While Austin denied that he was an anarchist or a socialist "in the sense that most men understand the term" he did admit that a "new social system' was required xiv.
_	This will lead to the aggregate price level (which we can think of as an average of the individual prices) becoming "sluggish" or "sticky" in the sense that it does not respond to macroeconomic shocks as much as it would if all prices were flexible.
_	In his "The General Theory of Employment, Interest and Money", John Maynard Keynes argued that nominal wages display downward rigidity, in the sense that workers are reluctant to accept cuts in nominal wages.
_	This was a new venture for him in the sense that never before had he collected the raw data for a new regional map.
_	The metaphysical conceit differs from an extended analogy in the sense that it does not have a clear-cut relationship between the things being compared.
_	I wanted to give the sense that these four are more than a match for forty because they're so skilled at what they do: use of explosives, automatic weapons fire, interlocking fields of fire.
_	Even though the original conditions of the Fujiwara–Moritani reaction are not practical, this reaction has significant importance in the sense that it showed the possibility for other transformations that were later developed.
_	"Pudgala", like other "dravya"s except "kala" is called "astikaya" in the sense that it occupies space.
_	Finally, it is important to realize that Lighthill's equation is exact in the sense that no approximations of any kind have been made in its derivation.
_	Recently See has remarked: “I’ve been very lucky in the sense that I don’t write what I think people might like.
_	Once identical, eventually these terms became complementary, in the sense that their definitions began to fill in parts of what the other lacked.
_	In other words, virtue is something that is both internal and external in the sense that one can practice internal good dispositions and also the expression of these good dispositions.
_	Miller also states that in the original screenplay for "Friday the 13th", Ralph was known as "Ralphie the Rat Boy" and describes the character as "one of those crazies you see in "Deliverance", a demented person who knows the truth, a character who gives you the sense that the world you're in is not what it seems, a soothsayer right out of Shakespeare.
_	Structural violence affects the availability of health care in the sense that physicians often need to pay attention to broad social forces (racism, gender inequality, classism, etc.) to determine who falls ill and who will be given access to care.
_	I get the sense that the creators' hearts were in the right places, but for whatever reason they couldn't execute.
_	This revitalisation project is different from other past projects in the sense that no extra resources is required to be put onto it.
_	He characterized the resulting methodology as "self-validating" in the sense that it cannot "not" be accepted without self-referential inconsistency.
_	There are actually "many" different versions of SUGRA out there which are inequivalent in the sense that their actions and constraints upon the torsion tensor are different, but ultimately equivalent in that we can always perform a field redefinition of the supervierbeins and spin connection to get from one version to another.
_	He was a true revolutionary in the sense that he believed that nations which had undergone a revolution, in this instance France, should give aid to oppressed countries.
_	Otten explained, in "A manual of the history of dogmas", that the first four of these propositions are absolutely condemned as heretical; while the fifth is condemned as heretical when taken in the sense that Christ died only for the predestined.
_	Falun Gong can be said to be highly centralized in the sense that neither spiritual nor practical authority is dispersed.
_	One of these African characteristics that Senghor theorised was asserted when he wrote "the Negro has reactions that are more "lived," in the sense that they are more direct and concrete expressions of the sensation and of the stimulus, and so of the object itself with all its original qualities and power."
_	Commuters are more likely to be anxious, dissatisfied and have the sense that their daily activities lack meaning than those who don’t have to travel to work even if they are paid more.
_	In theoretical computer science a bisimulation is a binary relation between state transition systems, associating systems that behave in the same way in the sense that one system simulates the other and vice versa.
_	Aside from this, "Karate Champ — Player vs Player" is very similar to the original in the sense that they use the same hardware, have the same sprites and title screen, and the play mechanics are essentially the same although the computer AI and speech quality is greatly improved along with control and hit detection.
_	characterize the trace completely in the sense that follows.
_	However, they are alienable in the sense that they can generally be surrendered.
_	With less than 10 full-time employees, it is not large by normal standards, but large in the sense that it produces maple sugar products used throughout northwestern New Brunswick and northern Maine.
_	It is hypothetical in the sense that the principles to be derived are what the parties would, under certain legitimating conditions, agree to, not what they have agreed to.
_	It is ahistorical in the sense that it is not supposed that the agreement has ever been, or indeed could ever have been, derived in the real world outside of carefully limited experimental exercises.
_	Chinese calligraphy differs from western calligraphic script in the sense that it was done with a brush instead of metal implements or a quill.
_	Koochiching County is unique in Minnesota, in the sense that there are no organized civil township governments within the county, due to legislative action taken by the county to absorb existing township governments.
_	Something that was moving and ethereal but that gave the sense that you could walk around and explore but to not loose all the sinister qualities of the Fetch."
_	Under the new constitution of 1848 the Council of State was reformed in the sense that its structure and functions were delegated to an Organic Law.
_	The Paneitz operator is conformally invariant in the sense that it sends conformal densities of weight to conformal densities of weight .
_	Upon verification of the digital signature, the public key is "explicitly" verified, in the sense that the party identified in the certificate knows the associated private key and is the only party who can know the private key.
_	Many of these operators are partial in the sense that they are not defined for certain applications.
_	Large electrostatic loudspeakers may be considered as full-range speakers in the sense that they are capable of reproducing most of the audio frequency band.
_	Although this definition gives the Darboux integral the appearance of being a special case of the Riemann integral, they are, in fact, equivalent, in the sense that a function is Darboux integrable if and only if it is Riemann integrable, and the values of the integrals are equal.
_	This type of security can be thought as a “stock on a country” in the sense that it has “equity-like” features.
_	According to E. S. Kennedy, it was after this development in Islamic mathematics that "the first real trigonometry emerged, in the sense that only then did the object of study become the spherical or plane triangle, its sides and angles."
_	They're pre-Freudian in the sense that the Greeks and Shakespeare worked with similar assumptions.
_	It is a generalization of the majority criterion in the sense that it relates to groups of supported candidates (solid coalitions) instead of just one candidate, and there may be more than one seat to be filled.
_	Dowd herself has said, "She is in my head in the sense that I want to inform and amuse the reader."
_	The Bachelor of Divinity degree offered in the region of South Asia by the affiliated colleges under the Senate of Serampore College is a graduate degree with post-graduate requirement for admission, in the sense that only graduates can register for BD.
_	The heat flux vector and viscous shear tensor are "transverse" to the world lines, in the sense that
_	The psychological manipulation works, in the sense that Alphonso begins to value the Queen only after he thinks he has lost her to another man.
_	Liouville theory has been solved, in the sense that its three-point structure constants are explicitly known.
_	Robert David Sullivan of "The A.V. Club" gave the episode a B–, saying "It’s not a very funny episode, but you get the sense that the animators enjoyed getting out of Springfield, and the score for the Iceland scenes, by indie rock group Sigur Ros, is at least a welcome change from the old-timey music that the show has been inexplicably fond of this season."
_	The "quadriagon" is related to the diagon in the sense that its longer side is produced by projecting the diagonal of a quarter of a square.
_	CDM projects are "credited" against this baseline, in the sense that developing countries gain credit for producing these emission cuts.
_	in the sense that if any human trait is purely conditioned by culture, any undesired trait (such as crime or aggression) may be engineered away by purely cultural (political means).
_	Espiritismo de Cordon is different from other religions in the sense that it does not have a set doctrine of beliefs.
_	Quine is a physicalist, in the sense that he considers it a scientific error not to adopt a theory which makes reference to physical objects.
_	A smart gun, by popular usage, is a firearm that is smart but only in the sense that it can detect its authorized user(s) or something that is normally only possessed by its authorized user(s).
_	In full generality, the word link is essentially the same as the word "knot" – the context is that one has a submanifold "M" of a manifold "N" (considered to be trivially embedded) and a non-trivial embedding of "M" in "N", non-trivial in the sense that the 2nd embedding is not isotopic to the 1st.
_	She is significant in the sense that she started off with a virtual company and has turned Bionomics into a notable Biotechnology/Biomedical firm.
_	It is notable among blue supergiant stars in the sense that while its pulsations are powered by the nuclear reactions in a hydrogen-burning shell that is at least partially non-convective, the star also burns helium in its core.
_	Tales of the Comedian's Vietnam War experiences were floated because "The 'Nam" was popular at the time, while another suggestion was, according to Gibbons, for a "Nite Owl/Rorschach team" (in the manner of "Randall and Hopkirk (Deceased)", and also in the sense that the original Charlton characters Blue Beetle and The Question had worked together as a team from time-to-time).
_	She also said that the new additions to the game world, and improvements to the 3D rendering engine, "add to the sense that Rubi-Ka is a busy planet."
_	Thus a projective module is "locally free" (in the sense that its localization at every prime ideal is free over the corresponding localization of the ring).
_	This was interesting in the sense that he was confident enough to question his own theory even after it was widely accepted.
_	Schwarz was described by the University of Stellenbosch as "one of the conceptual and moral fathers of the new South Africa" in the sense that he had not only been one of apartheid's most prominent opponents, but his ideas and the initiatives he had taken had played a key role in the development of the concept of a negotiated democracy in South Africa, based on the principles of freedom and justice.
_	This test is still a one way test, in the sense that there is still a remote chance that the tubing that passes this test can still be incompatible for the application since the combination of borderline compatibility and mechanical flexing can push the tube over the edge, resulting in premature tube failure.
_	All ISSF shooting events consist of "precision" shooting in the sense that only the position of the shot on the target determines the result, not the time used to produce that shot (provided the time was within the set constraints, of course).
_	Until then, his age and size had prevented him from participating in sports and left him with the sense that he was a misfit.
_	Then a vector field is said to be parallel if in the sense that for any vector field , .
_	However, the received signal may still have a strong spatial signature in the sense that stronger average signal gains are received from certain spatial directions.
_	Smokers tend to act experientially in the sense that they give little conscious thought to the risks before they start.
_	Other factors of spending are largely political in the sense that politicians who can effectively argue for more spending get the most spending for their states.
_	This approach is ""ex ante"", in the sense that the change is not evaluated after the fact but assessed before the fact without knowing whether one would actually benefit or suffer from it.
_	In 1822, Gauss was able to state that the least-squares approach to regression analysis is optimal in the sense that in a linear model where the errors have a mean of zero, are uncorrelated, and have equal variances, the best linear unbiased estimator of the coefficients is the least-squares estimator.
_	Their music is unique in the sense that it fuses traditional soul-like song structures with elements of electronic music (notably vocoders and synthesizers), and vocal harmonies.
_	All constituted governments are, to some degree, necessarily centralized, in the sense that a theoretically federal state exerts an authority or prerogative beyond that of its constituent parts.
_	It is private in the sense that it covers its own costs through research grants and donations.
_	Also, there are frequently used verbs that can indicate the subject of the sentence in certain contexts: "kureru" (くれる) means "give" in the sense that "somebody gives something to me or to somebody very close to me."
_	"ageru" (あげる) also means "give", but in the sense that "someone gives something to someone other than me."
_	The fact that tracks from her first two albums take up more than half the album, while her strongest releases - "Birds" and "Belle" - only get seven tracks between them, heightens the sense that though it's certainly reflective of Runga's whole career, Anthology is not truly a "best of""
_	In an interview with BBC Radio, Karpinski claimed that Major General Geoffrey Miller, who was sent from Camp X-Ray in Guantanamo Bay to improve interrogations at the Iraqi prison, told her to treat prisoners "like dogs" in the sense that "if you allow them to believe at any point that they are more than a dog then you've lost control of them".
_	In examining particular manifestations of the capitalist mode of production in particular regions and epochs, it is possible to find exceptions to these main defining criteria, but the exceptions prove the rule in the sense that over time the exceptional circumstances tend to disappear.
_	The Banach–Tarski paradox is a theorem in measure theory that is paradoxical in the sense that it contradicts common intuitions about volume in three-dimensional space.
_	Tsuen Wan New Town was special in the sense that it had more than one town centre, situated around Tsuen Wan Station and Kwai Fong Station (and later Tsing Yi Station after Tsuen Wan New Town extended to Tsing Yi).
_	He explained how the heightened state of emotional energy achieved during totemic rituals transported individuals above themselves giving them the sense that they were in the presence of a higher power, a force, that was embedded in the sacred objects that were worshipped.
_	The collection "A" is monotone decreasing, in the sense that it is closed under containment (i.e., if a given subset "B" is in the collection "A", so are all of the subsets of "B").
_	The infinite qualitative distinction is opposed to rational theology in the sense that, whereas the latter argues one can prove empirically Jesus is God incarnate, the former argues that empirical evidence is ultimately insufficient in making that conclusion.
_	There is a report suggesting that in recent years, the lists are more fluid than in previous years, in the sense that there is more wait list activity—which have become more of a safety net for colleges rather than students.
_	Goddard described the band's approach to song-writing as a "mix of things [with] a lot of very careful thinking about rhythms, and interlaying a lot of different ideas and influences" though, at certain points, there would be the sense that something needed to occur and these elements in songs were created spontaneously from the interaction between himself and Taylor: "this melody will somehow suddenly explode in your mind.
_	The effort is certainly there and the results aren't "bad" by any means, but there is a certain lackluster quality where one gets the sense that any forward progress is being provided by McPhee, with the others straining to keep up".
_	In structural complexity theory, the Berman–Hartmanis conjecture is an unsolved conjecture named after Leonard C. Berman and Juris Hartmanis that states that all NP-complete languages look alike, in the sense that they can be related to each other by polynomial time isomorphisms.
_	In both his poetry and his work as a historian, Sinclair was a nationalist, in the sense that he was concerned with forging a national identity for New Zealand that was independent of its colonial origins.
_	The referendum would include the Faroe Islands, but neither Iceland nor Greenland, nor would it include the West Indian Islands, and it would be non-binding in the sense that in the case of a majority in favour of the sale the parliament would still have the right to reject it.
_	This approach was deficit-focused, in the sense that speech errors were thought to arise randomly and should be corrected.
_	This construction therefore has a more geometric flavor, in the sense that the notion of "first infinitesimal neighbourhood" of the diagonal is thereby captured, via functions vanishing modulo functions vanishing at least to second order (see cotangent space for related notions).
_	Lord Millett suggests that there are four possible answers: (1) the lender, (2) the borrower, (3) the ultimate purpose and (4) no one in the sense that the beneficial interest remains "in suspense".
_	Anderson finally concludes on a negative note: "I get the sense that he wants his oeuvre to culminate in a pure act of attention, and I’m not convinced that the novel is the best medium in which to do that.
_	Unexplained infertility is infertility that is idiopathic in the sense that its cause remains unknown even after an infertility work-up, usually including semen analysis in the man and assessment of ovulation and fallopian tubes in the woman.
_	In the sense that the word is used in "The Damoiselle" and in English Renaissance drama generally, an "ordinary" is a public eating establishment, comparable to modern restaurants and cafeterias.
_	Circular migrants are marginal in the area of destination in the sense that their true home is back in their home area, and they do not plan on living in the host area permanently.
_	Conversion of the West and East Germanic tribes sometimes took place "top to bottom", in the sense that missionaries sometimes aimed at converting Germanic nobility first, after which time their societies would begin a gradual process of Christianization that would generally take a matter of centuries, with some traces of earlier beliefs remaining.
_	(In Greek religion, Hades was the ruler of the dead or shades, but not "per se" a god of evil, except in the sense that death might be considered a bad thing – , "kakon".)
_	There is the possibility...that, after the rate of interest has fallen to a certain level, liquidity-preference may become virtually absolute in the sense that almost everyone prefers cash to holding a debt which yields so low a rate of interest.
_	converges absolutely in the sense that
_	As such they are dense in D′("U") with respect to the topology on D′("U") in the sense that for any distribution "T" ∈ D′("U"), there is a sequence "φ" ∈ D("U") such that
_	"Next Generation" describes it as a predecessor to the core idea of "Pokémon" in the sense that the protagonist does not himself fight, but sends out his robots to do so.
_	It is said that the album "[shook] the status quo" of the contemporary musical climate, in the sense that its eclectic experimental pop leanings distanced it from the music "primarily being made by men with guitars" that was popular at the time, such as grunge and the burgeoning britpop.
_	The Hillbilly Bears appeared in a Cartoon Network Shortie, "Miss Understanding," where Maw takes them on a "Jerry Springer"-like show due to the fact she cannot understand Paw, although the audience assumes that she means she does not "understand" him in the sense that she does not know who he is anymore.
_	Ancestral asen, which honor the dead, are authentic ritual sculptures in the sense that they are made by African artists for religious purposes and not for the tourist trade.
_	Thus the class of NP-complete problems contains the most difficult problems in NP, in the sense that they are the ones most likely not to be in P.
_	This protein complex is functionally similar to the TIC/TOC Complex located on the inner and outer membranes of the chloroplast, in the sense that it transports proteins into the membrane of the mitochondria.
_	A policy was adopted, narrowly, called "The Bedford Resolution", which read: "That the fraternity's tradition be maintained in the sense that there be no pledging or initiating of Negro men until such time as they are acceptable to all chapters."
_	One class of problem that can benefit from the fully quantum approach is that of 'learning' unknown quantum states, processes or measurements, in the sense that one can subsequently reproduce them on another quantum system.
_	In ALGOL-like languages such as Pascal, Delphi, and Ada (in the sense that they allow nested function definitions), and in Python, and many functional languages, among others, assignment operators cannot appear in an expression (including codice_47 clauses), thus precluding this class of error.
_	This notion is local in the sense that it may be defined by looking at what occurs in a neighborhood of any generic point of this component.
_	Everything stored in tmpfs is temporary in the sense that no files will be created on the hard drive; however, swap space is used as backing store in case of low memory situations.
_	Pantomath is typically used to convey the sense that a great individual has achieved a pinnacle of learning, that an "automath" has taken autodidacticism to an endpoint.
_	Radiosity is a global illumination algorithm in the sense that the illumination arriving on a surface comes not just directly from the light sources, but also from other surfaces reflecting light.
_	The Commander also tries to get closer to Kate, in the sense that he feels if she enjoyed herself more she would become a better handmaid.
_	where "U" is a unitary operator and Γ is "completely non-unitary" in the sense that it has no reducing subspaces on which its restriction is unitary.
_	Burke's stance on the French Revolution was similar to Fitzwilliam's, and the two advocated for their mutual position, which included a restoration of the French monarchy and the sense that a peace with France would be a humiliation and a defeat for Britain.
_	Let T be a Turing machine which "represents" me in the sense that T can prove just the mathematical statements I prove.
_	Maximum-likelihood estimators have no optimum properties for finite samples, in the sense that (when evaluated on finite samples) other estimators may have greater concentration around the true parameter-value.
_	As Szasz put it, "the classification by slave owners and slave traders of certain individuals as Negroes was scientific, in the sense that whites were rarely classified as blacks.
_	"Well, there's a kind of timelessness to it in the sense that I don't want things to run on a 24-hour clock.
_	While the real line thus has large parts that contain no chromatic roots for any graph, every point in the complex plane is arbitrarily close to a chromatic root in the sense that there exists an infinite family of graphs whose chromatic roots are dense in the complex plane.
_	For "The Boston Globe", Isaac Feldberg praised "the sense that Brockhampton’s creative energies thrive most when every member’s strengths, and stories, are being utilized", stating that the album "is entirely of a piece with its two predecessors; the disc exudes confidence on every front, though the group’s ambitions seem scaled up to world domination."
_	It is cloud-based in the sense that files are scanned on a remote server without using processing power of the user's machine.
_	Yet, the sense that children do not deserve to be exposed to criminal punishment in the same way as adults remains strong.
_	The conceptually similar Barlow–Levick model is deficient in the sense that a stimulus presented to only one receptor of the pair is sufficient to generate a response.
_	Finley says "this argument appears too simple and schematic, but it is correct in the sense that only then did Rome take the essential decision of creating a fleet, without which there was no hope of fighting the Carthaginians on equal terms.".
_	In the sense that we know a story and we want to share it with you.
_	It was shown in Ref. 1 that RDFs are unique is the sense that a particular RDF generates a particular time trajectory (in a statistical sense), and a time trajectory is associated with only one RDF.
_	It means "free" in the sense that some good or service is supplied without need for payment, even though it may have value.
_	The other roots "β" are close to "α", in the sense that |"β" − "α"| = 1, 2, 3, ..., 19 is less than |"α"| = 20. For "t" = −2 the first-order approximation 20 − "t"·20/19! = 25.137... to the perturbed root 20.84...
_	For example, the name P. Chidambaram, tends to be expanded to Palaniyappan Chidambaram, which is incorrect in the sense that it implies that the person's first name is "Palaniyappan", and the family name is "Chidambaram".
_	Relationships with Martha Muhs, Maggie Clougherty, and Phyllis Ideal, and the general atmosphere of the 1970s engendered the sense that whatever strategies worked for Matson needed to include women.
_	Others are "nonparametric" in the sense that a change in the model structure itself is needed ("e.g.", when extrapolating to a pregnant female, equations for the foetus should be added).
_	Several such scholars have described Lenin as a dictator; Ryan stated that he was "not a dictator in the sense that all his recommendations were accepted and implemented", for many of his colleagues disagreed with him on various issues.
_	Conceived by Sigbert Prais and Christopher Winsten in 1954, it is a modification of Cochrane–Orcutt estimation in the sense that it does not lose the first observation, which leads to more efficiency as a result and makes it a special case of feasible generalized least squares.
_	Martin Heidegger, the German philosopher, on the one hand showed death as something conclusively determined, in the sense that it is inevitable for every human being, while on the other hand, it unmasks its indeterminate nature via the truth that one never knows when or how death is going to come.
_	The Dharma is a like a raft in the sense that it is only a pragmatic tool for attaining nirvana ("for the purpose of crossing over, not for the purpose of holding onto", MN 22) once one has done this, one can discard the raft.
_	For example, Covenant or Flood forces never spawn in the same places when the player restarts from checkpoints, which gives the player "the sense that the [alien] creatures have things to do besides killing humans".
_	The key role of RBMT systems is that they help fill the gap left in the translation process of s-p → p-t, in the sense that these parallels are included in the SMT model for s-t.
_	Parallels are drawn between the new Jaime and her 90s female action hero predecessors, some commentators remarking on a likeness to Buffy Summers, protagonist of supernatural drama "Buffy the Vampire Slayer", in the sense that she has been unwillingly given a superhuman burden.
_	Traditionally in Indonesia, bathing is almost always "public", in the sense that people might converge in riverbanks, pools or watersprings either for bathing or washing laundry.
_	The suspension and loop space functors form an adjoint pair of functors, in the sense that there is a natural isomorphism
_	The "quantum" Hilbert space is then the space of sections that depend only on the formula_89 chosen variables, in the sense that they are covariantly constant in the other formula_89 directions.
_	The primitive is used to carry out this assignment, and ensures that the assignment is atomic in the sense that concurrent readers will either see a pointer or a valid pointer to the new structure, but not some mash-up of the two values.
_	This notion of causality fits together with the "causality" of the above causal action in the sense that if two space-time points formula_52 are space-like separated, then the Lagrangian formula_62 vanishes.
_	It is foundational in the sense that the subsequent theory for curves tries to refine the information it yields (for example in the Brill–Noether theory).
_	Independence logic corresponds to existential second-order logic, in the sense that a non-empty class of teams is definable by an independence logic formula if and only if the corresponding class of relations is definable by an existential second-order formula.
_	Markov logic networks generalize first-order logic, in the sense that, in a certain limit, all unsatisfiable statements have a probability of zero, and all tautologies have probability one.
_	The employee adopts a proactive role in the sense that he, after viewing all the vacant shifts, offers his service for the shifts he is willing to work for, as compared to the employer offering the employee a shift that he or she might not want.
_	Note that this factor is "constant" in the sense that it is not a function of "Y", which is the variable over which the probability distribution is defined.
_	This has led to most modern wide players having a more demanding role in the sense that they are expected to provide defensive cover for their full-backs and track back to repossess the ball, as well as provide skillful crosses for centre forwards and strikers.
_	These new extensions are at least as good as the originals, in the sense that, given one extension, the new extension contains exactly the things that satisfy the "definiens" for a particular circular predicate.
_	The process is a highly collaborative one in the sense that it requires interaction of actors, widely acting independently from each other.
_	"Enteral/enteric administration" usually includes "oral" (through the mouth) and "rectal" (into the rectum) administration, in the sense that these are taken up by the intestines.
_	Although the thousands of demonstrators outside gave the sense that the lynching was a spontaneous outburst, the killings were carried out by a relatively small, disciplined "execution squad" led by Parkerson and three other city leaders: Walter Denegre, lawyer; James D. Houston, politician and businessman; and John C. Wickliffe, editor of the "New Delta" newspaper.
_	He was just a tremendous talent; a true artist in the sense that he never compromised.
_	The hospital was revolutionary at the time in the sense that it was a departure from the asylums of folklore, which were overcrowded places where gross human rights abuses often occurred.
_	Farsu magru means "false lean", meaning "lean" in the sense that a relatively small amount of meat ingredients are used to prepare the dish, which is otherwise substantial in size.
_	The act was universal, in the sense that it covered the entire workforce.
_	He stated that "In the course of the discussion the ambassador referred to 'little Israel' in the sense that it is geographically small, but that nevertheless the scale of the consequences is huge and the repercussions around the world are tremendous."
_	Part of the Roman disdain for Christianity, then, arose in large part from the sense that it was bad for society.
_	Although Rathjens was not the first to collect information on weather and climate in Yemen, his work can be recognized as pioneering work in the sense that it was initiated and supported by the state.
_	The emergency response officer is 3 in 1 in the sense that he attended to all incidences and emergency situations but particularly in the security, medical and fire.
_	It must be probable in the sense that it could well happen."
_	Merredin's history varies from that of other wheat-belt towns in Western Australia in the sense that it started as a stopping place on the way to the goldfields.
_	Aseem Chhabra of Rediff gave the film a rating of 4 out of 5 and said that, "A Death in the Gunj is not a happy film at all times, but it is very entertaining -- not in a loud way, but in the sense that watching it is a very satisfying experience."
_	Sometimes, the Lie superalgebra is embedded within A in the sense that there is a homomorphism from the universal enveloping algebra of the Lie superalgebra to A.
_	This involves the writer changing in the sense that voice and identity are established and the writer has a sense of his or her self.
_	The „know thy numbers to know thyself” slogan of the Quantified Self movement is inconsistent, it has been claimed, in the sense that it does not fully acknowledge the need for auxiliary skills of health literacy to actually get to „know thyself”.
_	It tells a story, one that is visually rich and emotionally compelling and charged with one of the great director's favorite concepts – expectation, the sense that something always new and marvelous will come along".
_	The tactical binocular is similar to a laser-designator, in the sense that it allows the player to identify friendly and enemy units, weapon stashes, explosives, and objectives in the field.
_	Ralph Kirkpatrick says that these chords "are not clusters in the sense that they are arbitrary blobs of dissonance, nor are they necessarily haphazard fillings up of diatonic intervals or simultaneous soundings of neighboring tones; they are logical expressions of Scarlatti’s harmonic language and organic manifestations of his tonal structure".
_	Both of these ideas contribute to ERB in the sense that and that they are not included in the formal job description.
_	It is often compared to So Sick in the sense that there is a huge difference in contrast between the two.
_	"SINdie" noted how although "the inevitable family melodrama in Neo’s films maybe [sic] tedious, but that doesn’t dissipate the warmth that drives this project... there is the sense that the people behind "Long Long Time Ago" are more than collaborators, but rather a collaborative community akin to a family".
_	This then gave rise to the Vedic image of the deified Kala as devourer of all things, in the sense that time devours all.
_	Non-spiking neurons are primitive in the sense that they have no on or off switch, and are more sensitive to signal noise than spiking neurons with membrane potentials.
_	Computable functions are the formalized analogue of the intuitive notion of algorithm, in the sense that a function is computable if there exists an algorithm that can do the job of the function, i.e. given an input of the function domain it can return the corresponding output.
_	Housman wrote his poem in the sense that, “Love has to be separated from the daily business of living before any pleasure can be found in it (though even that pleasure can cause the lover to be viewed as an almost ridiculous figure)” (Blocksidge).
_	Developing countries benefit in the sense that they are not truly losing their skilled migrants, as these workers will return after a period of time to continue working.
_	In the seminal paper which introduced categories, Saunders Mac Lane and S. Eilenberg stated: "This may be regarded as a continuation of the Klein Erlanger Program, in the sense that a geometrical space with its group of transformations is generalized to a category with its algebra of mappings"
_	Contemporary retirement planning models have yet to be validated in the sense that the models purport to project a future that has yet to manifest itself.
_	SLD are specific in the sense that these disorders each significantly affect a relatively narrow range of academic and performance outcomes.
_	Boyd Hilton from "Heat" said of the series, "Sue Perkins has created a sitcom that seems different to everything else out there, but is also quite old-fashioned in the sense that it actually has loads of funny bits all the way through."
_	Citizenship is seen by most scholars as culture-specific, in the sense that the meaning of the term varies considerably from culture to culture, and over time.
_	They are different from restricted foster homes in the sense that these families don’t usually know the child before they are placed in their care.
_	Kripke's proposal is also problematic in the sense that while the language contains a "truth" predicate of itself (at least a partial one), some of its sentences – such as the liar sentence ("this sentence is false") – have an undefined truth value, but the language does not contain its own "undefined" predicate.
_	If formula_1 is suitably regular in the sense that there exist certain extension operators, then also the Sobolev–Slobodeckij spaces form a scale of Banach spaces, i.e. one has the continuous injections or embeddings
_	"Constructed knowledge" is similar to Perry's commitment in the sense that both incorporate the role of the knower in knowledge.
_	The finals are notable in the sense that goal difference will not be a tiebreaking criterion: if both teams tie on points the decision will go directly to a penalty shootout.
_	Conversely, an Ehresmann connection "H"⊂"TP" (or "v":"TP"→"V") on "P" defines a principal "G"-connection "ω" if and only if it is "G"-equivariant in the sense that formula_15.
_	The concept of "lateral collinearity" expands on the traditional view of multicollinearity, comprising also collinearity between explanatory and criteria (i.e., explained) variables, in the sense that they may be measuring almost the same thing as each other.
_	The partition on the right-hand side should be the transpose of the partition on the left-hand side, in the sense that if "A" is an "m"-by-"n" block then "E" should be an "n"-by-"m" block.
_	The Herbert-Stevens model was not a behavioral model in the sense that it did not try to map from micro to macro behavior.
_	The running of the coupling constants, i.e. their scale dependence described by the renormalization group (RG), is thus special in its UV limit in the sense that all their dimensionless combinations remain finite.
_	Before the 1960s the majority of woman-made artwork did not portray feminist content, in the sense that it neither addressed nor criticized the conditions that women have historically faced.
_	It makes the zone particularly unique, together with that of the zones of Olot and Cabo de Gata, in the sense that it is one of the few important zones of volcanic origin in the Iberian Peninsula.
_	Adorno felt that Damrosch's musical pedagogy was a justification of class oppression, in which the conductor, without actually "working" at least in the sense that the musicians "work", is shown as "above" the mere musicians, none of whom can be said to play other than a part.
_	In the preface to the Venezuelan edition of his book "The sea throws its gold coins", José Ramón Ripoll, musicologist, editor of the Atlantic Magazine and one of the most acclaimed masters of modern Spanish poetry, wrote "Fernando Denis is a versatile poet, dense and full, in the sense that he looks and names the world without fuss, making all his experience in poetic material, from the high peaks of the mountains to the splash of the tread on his shoes puddles."
_	Since Baruch Sheamar and Yishtabach are both blessings, this gives the sense that Pesukei Dezimra is one single prayer.
_	The method is centralized in the sense that it is directed by neither a parent nor a teacher.
_	The fundamental components of protein are nitrogen-containing amino acids, some of which are essential in the sense that humans cannot make them internally.
_	When employees get the sense that bullies are tolerated, a climate of fear may be the result.
_	It is a non-deterministic algorithm in the sense that it produces a reasonable result only with a certain probability, with this probability increasing as more iterations are allowed.
_	The shape of the cross itself is somewhat different in the sense that the cross and crown are made of non-enamelled silver.
_	First, it must be "new", in the sense that propagating or harvested material has not been sold or otherwise disposed of for purposes of exploitation for more than one year in the United States, or more than four years in any foreign jurisdiction (or six years in the case of a tree or vine).
_	Third, the variety must be "uniform", in the sense that any variations are describable, predictable, and commercially acceptable.
_	Finally, the variety must be "stable", in the sense that the variety, when reproduced, will remain unchanged with regard to its essential and distinctive characteristics within a reasonable degree of commercial reliability.
_	This interpretation has been variously described as “stative” or “subject-oriented” (in the sense that it ascribes a property to the subject, rather than focusing on the event itself) in the descriptive literature.
_	Layer II contains the largest density of pure grid cells, in the sense that they fire equally regardless of the direction in which an animal traverses a grid location.
_	The idea is, instead of formula_37, one simulates formula_38, whose solution agrees with that of formula_37 in the sense that formula_40.
_	It is superior in the sense that its jurisdiction to hear civil and criminal cases is unlimited compared to the Subordinate Courts of Singapore, and it hears appeals from lower courts.
_	""I have never been a party politician in the sense that I would obey the orders of any political junta who would tell me to do a thing, whether I considered it right or wrong.""
_	According to an interview, Boris Boo said that Lim Teck of Clover Films "approached (him) to make a film about an unlucky person", and that he is "always very fascinated with the state of mind of human being", in the sense that a person "will blame any failure on luck" when he thinks he is unlucky, and if "something happened on this guy, and makes him think that there is a change in his luck, then out of a sudden, he will think he has the world under his feet", and "not only he becomes confident, but also takes failures on his stride and will brush them off easily".
_	Grandreefite, while not a valuable mineral in terms of commercial use, is useful in the sense that it is a good indicator of the very specific environment in which it forms and therefore the same conditions required to produce minerals similar to it in structure, composition, etc.
_	Cross-ratio is a projective invariant in the sense that it is preserved by the projective transformations of a projective line.
_	Mysterio decided to change his plan and focus on Daredevil, whom he had encountered recently during an insurance scam that the hero had thwarted; Mysterio believed that he had found a 'kindred spirit' in Daredevil, in the sense that both were second stringers with little reputation outside their homes.
_	After completing his Valse des fleurs, which is similar to them in the sense that they were composed for his little children to play with him, Stravinsky decided to write pieces for four hands to teach them how to play the piano.
_	Holi celebrated at Barsana is unique in the sense that here women chase men away with sticks.
_	It can also be considered the group's final "genuine" album as a group in the sense that the following two albums, "No Regrets" and "Lines", would not only change musical direction, but would also not include any original material.
_	Adlerian psychotherapy is unique in the sense that each client has their own individual type of therapy.
_	The phrase in , "and the word of God came unto Jonah the second time," is interpreted by Rabbi Akiva, however, to imply that God spoke only twice to him; therefore the "word of God" to him in has no reference to a prophecy which Jonah delivered in the days of Jeroboam II., but must be taken in the sense that as at Nineveh Jonah's words changed evil to good, so under Jeroboam, Israel experienced a change of fortune (Yeb. 98a).
_	B is sharp in the sense that if for all coherent sheaves on a complex manifold (resp. quasi-coherent sheaves on a noetherian scheme ), then is Stein (resp. affine); see (resp. and ).
_	While not a classical skeleton framework, in the sense that no skeletons are provided, ASSIST's generic "parmod" can be specialized into classical skeletons such as: "farm", "map", etc.
_	In projective geometry, all conics are equivalent in the sense that every theorem that can be stated for one can be stated for the others.
_	The atomic mass and relative isotopic mass are sometimes confused, or incorrectly used, as synonyms of standard atomic weight (also known as atomic weight) and the standard atomic weight (a particular variety of atomic weight, in the sense that is a standardized atomic weight).
_	It is not a typical second cycle chorale cantata in the sense that it was based on a prose text (lacking the metre of a hymn text) and a Gregorian chant melody (lacking a musical metre).
_	The beginnings of the terms of almost all the first five rajas of Mysore are similar in the sense that they represented the Vijayanagara Empire, and in the prosperity of the Vijayanagara Empire lied that of their Mysore Kingdom.
_	Their production could be linked in the sense that they are bi-products (referred to as "complements in production") or in the sense that they can be produced by the same inputs (referred to as "substitutes in production").
_	Using Vinogradov's method, Chudakov, Van der Corput, and Estermann showed that almost all even numbers can be written as the sum of two primes (in the sense that the fraction of even numbers which can be so written tends towards 1).
